CHAPTER I.
Filled with the face of heaven, which from afar,
Comes down upon the waters; all its hues,
From the rich sunset to the rising star,
Their magical variety diffuse:
And now they change; a paler shadow strews
Its mantle o'er the mountains; parting day
Dies like the dolphin, whom each pang imbues
With a new colour as it gasps away,
The last still loveliest, till  'tis gone  and all is grey.
Childe Harold
.
The
charms of the Tyrrhenian Sea have been sung since
the days of Homer. That the Mediterranean, generally,
and its beautiful boundaries of Alps and Apennines, with its
deeply indented and irregular shores, forms the most delightful
region of the known earth, in all that relates to climate,
productions, and physical formation, will be readily enough
conceded by the traveller. The countries that border on
this midland water, with their promontories buttressing a
mimic oceantheir mountain-sides teeming with the
picturesque
of human life  their heights crowned with
watch-towers
their
rocky shelves consecrated by hermitages, and
their unrivalled sheet dotted with sails, rigged, as it might be,
expressly to produce effect in a picture, form a sort of world
apart, that is replete with delights to all who have the happy
fortune to feel charms, which not only fascinate the beholder,
but which linger in the memories of the absent like visions
of a glorious past.
Our present business is with this fragment of a creation
that is so eminently beautiful, even in its worst aspects, but
which is so often marred by the passions of man, in its best.
While all admit how much nature has done for the
Mediterranean
,
none will deny that, until quite recently, it has been
the scene of more ruthless violence, and of deeper personal
wrongs, perhaps, than any other portion of the globe. With
different races, more widely separated by destinies, than even
by origin, habits and religion, occupying its northern and
southern shores, the outwork, as it might be, of Christianity
and Mohammedanism, and of an antiquity that defies history,
the bosom of this blue expanse has mirrored more violence,
has witnessed more scenes of slaughter, and heard more
shouts of victory, between the days of Agamemnon and
Nelson, than all the rest of the dominions of Neptune together.
Nature and the passions have united to render it like the
human countenance, which conceals by its smiles and
godlike
expression, the furnace that so often glows within the
heart, and the volcano that consumes our happiness. For
centuries, the Turk and the Moor rendered it unsafe for the
European to navigate these smiling coasts; and when the
barbarian's power temporarily ceased, it was merely to give
place to the struggles of those who drove him from the
arena by their larger resources.
The circumstances which rendered the period that occurred
between the years 1790 and 1815, the most eventful of
modern times, are familiar to all; though the incidents which
chequered that memorable quarter of a century, have already
passed into history. All the elements of strife that then
agitated the world, appear now to have subsided as
completely
as if they owed their existence to a remote age; and
living men recall the events of their youth, as they regard
the recorded incidents of other centuries. Then, each month
brought its defeat, or its victory; its account of a
government
overturned, or of a province conquered. The world
was agitated like men in a tumult. On that epoch the timid
look back with wonder; the young, with doubt; and the
restless, with envy.
The years 1798 and 1799 were two of the most
memorable
of this ever-memorable period; and to that stirring and
teeming season we must carry the mind of the reader, in
order to place it in the midst of the scenes it is our object to
portray.
Towards the close of a fine day in the month of August,
a light fairy-like craft was fanning her way, before a gentle
westerly air, into what is called the Canal of Piombino,
steering easterly. The rigs of the Mediterranean are
proverbial
for their picturesque beauty and quaintness,
embracing
the xebeque, the felucca, the polacre, and the
bombarda, or ketch; all unknown, or nearly so, to our own
seas; and occasionally the lugger. The latter, a species of
craft, however, much less common in the waters of Italy,
than in the Bay of Biscay and the British Channel, was the
construction of the vessel in question; a circumstance that
the mariners who eyed her from the shores of Elba, deemed
indicative of mischief. A three-masted lugger, that spread
a wide breadth of canvass, with a low, dark hull, relieved
by a single and almost imperceptible line of red beneath her
channels, and a waist so deep that nothing was visible above
it but the hat of some mariner, taller than common, was
considered a suspicious vessel, and not even a fisherman
would have ventured out within reach of a shot, so long as
her character was unknown. Privateers, or corsairs, as it
was the fashion to term them, (and the name, with even its
English signification, was often merited by their acts,) not
unfrequently glided down that coast; and it was sometimes
dangerous for those who belonged to friendly nations to
meet them, in moments when the plunder that a relic of
barbarism still legalizes, had failed.
The lugger was actually of about one hundred and fifty
tons admeasurement; but her dark paint, and low hull, gave
her an appearance of being much smaller than she really
was; still, the spread of her canvass, as she came down
before the wind wing-and-wing, as seamen term it, or with
a sail fanning like the heavy pinions of a sea-fowl, on each
side, betrayed her pursuits; and, as has been intimated, the
mariners on the shore, who watched her movements, shook
their heads in distrust, as they communed among themselves,
in very indifferent Italian, concerning her destination and
object. This observation, with its accompanying discourse,
occurred on the rocky bluff above the town of Porto Ferrajo,
in the Island of Elba, a spot that has since become so
renowned
as the capital of the mimic dominion of Napoleon.
Indeed, the very dwelling which was subsequently used by
the fallen emperor as a palace, stood within a hundred yards
of the speakers, looking out towards the entrance of the
canal, and the mountains of Tuscany; or rather, of the
little principality of Piombino, the system of merging the
smaller in the larger states of Europe not having yet been
brought into extensive operation. This house, a building
of the size of a better sort of country residence of our own,
was then, as now, occupied by the Florentine governor of
the Tuscan portion of the island. It stands on the extremity
of a low rocky promontory that forms the western ramparts
of the deep extensive bay, on the side of which, ensconced
behind a very convenient curvature of the rocks, which here
incline westward in the form of a hook, lies the small port,
completely concealed from the sea, as if in dread of visits
like those which might be expected from craft resembling
the suspicious stranger. This little port, not as large in
itself as a modern dock in places like London or Liverpool,
was sufficiently protected against any probable dangers, by
suitable batteries; and as for the elements, a vessel laid upon
a shelf in a closet would be scarcely more secure. In this
domestic little basin, which, with the exception of a narrow
entrance was completely surrounded by buildings, lay a
few feluccas, that traded between the island and the
adjacent
main, and a solitary Austrian ship, which had come
from the head of the Adriatic, in quest of iron, as it was
pretended, but as much to assume the appearance of trade
with the Italian dependency, as with any other purpose.
At the moment of which we are writing, however, but a
dozen living beings were visible in or about all these craft.
The intelligence that a strange lugger, resembling the one
described, was in the offing, had drawn nearly all the
mariners
ashore; and most of the habitus of the port had
followed
them up the broad steps of the crooked streets which
led to the heights behind the town; or to the rocky
elevation
that overlooks the sea from north-east to west. The
approach of the lugger had produced some such effect on the
mariners of this unsophisticated and little-frequented port,
as that of the hawk is known to excite among the timid
tenants of the barn-yard. The rig of the stranger, in itself
a suspicious circumstance, had been noted two hours before,
by one or two old coasters, who habitually passed their idle
moments on the heights, examining the signs of the weather,
and indulging in gossip; and their conjectures had drawn to
the Porto Ferrajo mall some twenty men, who fancied
themselves
,
or who actually were,
cognoscenti
in matters of the
sea. When, however, the low, long, dark hull, which
upheld such wide sheets of canvass, became fairly visible,
the omens thickened, rumours spread, and hundreds collected
on the spot, which, in Manhattanese parlance, would
probably
have been called a battery. Nor would the name have
been altogether inappropriate, as a small battery was
established
there, and that, too, in a position which would easily
throw a shot two-thirds of a league, into the offing; or about
the distance that the stranger was now from the shore.
Tommaso Tonti was the oldest mariner of Elba, and,
luckily, being a sober, and usually a discreet man, he was
the oracle of the island, in most things that related to the
sea. As each citizen, wine-dealer, grocer, innkeeper, or
worker in iron, came upon the height, he incontinently
inquired
for Tonti, or 'Maso, as he was generally called; and
getting the bearings and distance of the grey-headed old
seaman, he invariably made his way to his side, until a
group of some two hundred men, women and children, had
clustered near the person of the
pilota
, as the faithful
gather about a favourite expounder of the law, in moments
of religious excitement. It was worthy of remark, too, with
how much consideration this little crowd of gentle Italians
treated their aged seaman, on this occasion; none bawling
out their questions, and all using the greatest care not to get
in front of his person, lest they might intercept his means
of observation. Five or six old sailors, like himself, were
close at his side: these, it is true, did not hesitate to speak
as became their experience. But Tonti had obtained no
small part of his reputation by exercising great moderation
in delivering his oracles, and, perhaps, by seeming to know
more than he actually revealed. He was reserved, therefore;
and while his brethren of the sea ventured on sundry
conflicting
opinions concerning the character of the stranger,
and a hundred idle conjectures had flown from mouth to
mouth, among the landsmen and females, not a syllable that
could commit the old man, had escaped his lips. He let the
others talk at will; as for himself, it suited his habits, and
possibly his difficulties in deciding, to maintain a grave and
portentous silence.
We have spoken of females: as a matter of course, an
event like this, in a town of some three or four thousand
souls, would be likely to draw a due proportion of the gentler
sex to the heights. Most of them contrived to get as near
as possible to the aged seaman, in order to obtain the first
intelligence, that it might be the sooner circulated; but, it
would seem, that among the younger of these, there was
also a sort of oracle of their own, about whose person
gathered a dozen of the prettiest girls; either anxious to hear
what Ghita might have to say in the premises, or, perhaps,
influenced by the pride and modesty of their sex and
condition
,
which taught them to maintain a little more reserve
than was necessary to the less refined portion of their
companions
.
In speaking of condition, however, the word must
be understood with an exceedingly limited meaning. Porto
Ferrajo had but two classes of society, the trades-people and
the labourers; although there were, perhaps, a dozen
exceptions
,
in the persons of a few humble functionaries of the
government, an avvacato, a medico, and a few priests. The
governor of the island was a Tuscan of rank, but he seldom
honoured the place with his presence, and his deputy was a
professional man, a native of the town, whose original
position was too well known to allow him to give himself airs
on the spot where he was born. Ghita's companions, then,
were daughters of shopkeepers, and persons of that class,
who, having been taught to read, and occasionally going to
Leghorn, beside being admitted by the deputy to the presence
of his housekeeper, had got to regard themselves as a little
elevated above the more vulgar curiosity of the less
cultivated
girls of the port. Ghita herself, however, owed her
ascendency to her qualities, rather than to the adventitious
advantage of being a grocer's or an inkeeper's daughter, her
origin being unknown to most of those around her, as indeed
was her family name. She had been landed six weeks
before, and left by one who passed for her father, at the inn
of Cristoforo Dovi, as a boarder, and had acquired all her
influence, as so many reach notoriety in our own simple
society, by the distinction of having travelled; aided,
somewhat
,
by her strong sense, great decision of character,
perfect
Vol. I.  2
modesty and propriety of deportment, with a form which
was singularly graceful and feminine, and a face, that, while
it could scarcely be called beautiful, was, in the highest
degree, winning and attractive. No one thought of asking
her family name; and she never appeared to deem it necessary
to mention it. Ghita was sufficient; it was familiar to every
one; and, although there were two or three others of the
same appellation, in Porto Ferrajo, this, by common consent,
got to be
the
Ghita, within a week after she had landed.
Ghita, it was known, had travelled, for she had publicly
reached Elba in a felucca, coming, as was said, from the
Neapolitan states. If this were true, she was probably the
only person of her sex in the town, who had ever seen
Vesuvius
,
or planted her eyes on the wonders of a part of Italy
that has a reputation second only to that of Rome. Of course,
if any girl in Porto Ferrajo could imagine the character of
the stranger, it must be Ghita; and it was on this
supposition
that she had unwittingly, and, if the truth must be owned,
unwillingly, collected around her a
clientelle
of at least a
dozen girls of her own age, and apparently of her own class.
The latter, however, felt no necessity for the reserve
maintained
by the curious who pressed near 'Maso; for, while
they respected their guest and friend, and would rather listen
to her surmises than those of any other person, they had
such a prompting desire to hear their own voices, that not a
minute escaped without a question, or a conjecture, both
volubly and quite audibly expressed. The interjections, too,
were somewhat numerous, as the guesses were crude and
absurd. One said it was a vessel with despatches from
Livorno, possibly with His Eccellenza on board; but she
was reminded that Leghorn lay to the north, and not to
the west. Another thought it was a cargo of priests, going
from Corsica to Rome; but she was told that priests were
not in sufficient favour, just then, in France, to get a vessel
so obviously superior to the ordinary craft of the
Mediterranean
,
to carry them about. While a third, more
imaginative
than either, ventured to doubt whether it was a vessel
at all; deceptive appearances of this sort not being of rare
occurrence, and usually taking the aspect of something out
of the ordinary way.
Si
, said Annina, but that would be a miracle, Maria;
and why should we have a miracle, now that Lent and most
of the holidays are past?
I
believe it is a real vessel.
The others laughed, and, after a good deal of eager
chattering
on the subject, it was quite generally admitted that
the stranger was a
bon fide
craft, of some species or
another
,
though all agreed she was not a felucca, a bombarda,
or a sparanara. All this time Ghita was thoughtful and
silent; quite as much so, indeed, as Tommaso himself, though
from a very different motive. Notwithstanding all the gossip,
and the many ludicrous opinions of her companions, her
eyes scarcely turned an instant from the lugger, on which
they seemed to be riveted by a sort of fascination. Had
there been one, there, sufficiently unoccupied to observe this
interesting girl, he might have been struck with the varying
expression of a countenance that was teeming with sensibility,
and which too often reflected the passing emotions of its
mistress's mind. Now an expression of anxiety, and even
of alarm, would have been detected by such an observer, if
acute enough to separate these emotions, in the liveliness of
sentiment, from the more vulgar feelings of her companions;
and now, something like gleamings of delight and happiness
flashed across her eloquent countenance. The colour came
and went often; and there was an instant, during which the
lugger varied her course, hauling to the wind, and then
falling
off again, like a dolphin at its sports, when the radiance
of the pleasure that glowed about her soft blue eyes, rendered
the girl perfectly beautiful. But none of these passing
expressions were noted by the garrulous group around the
stranger female, who was left very much to the indulgence
of the impulses that gave them birth, unquestioned, and
altogether unsuspected.
Although the cluster of girls had, with feminine
sensitiveness
,
gathered a little apart from the general crowd, there
were but a few yards between the spot where it stood, and
that occupied by 'Maso; so that when the latter spoke, an
attentive listener among the former might hear his words.
This was an office that Tonti did not choose to undertake,
however, until he was questioned by the podest, Vito Viti,
who now appeared on the hill in person, puffing like a whale
that rises to breathe, from the vigour of his ascent.
What dost thou make of her, good 'Maso? demanded
the magistrate, after he had examined the stranger himself
some time in silence, feeling authorized, in virtue of his
office, to question whom he pleased.
Signore, it is a lugger; was the brief, and, certainly, the
accurate reply.
Ay, a lugger; we all understand that, neighbour Tonti;
but what sort of a lugger? There are felucca-luggers, and
polacre-luggers, and bombarda-luggers, and all sorts of
luggers
;
which sort of lugger is this?
Signor Podest, this is not the language of the port.
We call a felucca, a felucca; a bombarda, a bombarda; a
polacre, a polacre; and a lugger, a lugger. This is,
therefore
,
a lugger.
'Maso spoke authoritatively, for he felt that he was now
not out of his depth, and it was grateful to him to let the
public know how much better he understood all these
matters
than a magistrate. On the other hand, the podest was
nettled, and disappointed into the bargain, for he really
imagined he was drawing nice distinctions, much as it was
his wont to do in legal proceedings; and it was his ambition
to be thought to know something of every thing.
Well, Tonti, answered Signor Viti, in a protecting
manner, and with an affable smile, as this is not an affair
that is likely to go to the higher courts at Florence, your
explanations may be taken as sufficient, and I have no wish
to disturb thema lugger, is a lugger.
Si, Signore; that is just what we say in the port. A
lugger, is a lugger.
And yonder strange craft, you maintain, and at need
are ready to swear, is a lugger?
Now 'Maso seeing no necessity for any oath in the affair,
and being always somewhat conscientious in such matters,
whenever the custom-house officers did not hold the book,
was a little startled at this suggestion, and he took another,
and a long look at the stranger, before he answered.
Si, Signore, he replied, after satisfying his mind once
more, through his eyes, I
will
swear that the stranger,
yonder, is a lugger.
And canst thou add, honest Tonti, of what nation? The
nation
is of as much moment, in these troubled times, as the
rig
.
You say truly, Signor Podest; for if an Algerine, or a
Moor, or even a Frenchman, he will be an unwelcome visiter
in the Canal of Elba. There are many different signs about
him, that sometimes make me think he belongs to one people,
and then to another; and I crave your pardon, if I ask a
little leisure, to let him draw nearer, before I give a positive
opinion.
As this request was reasonable, no objection was raised.
The podest turned aside, and observing Ghita, who had
visited his niece, and of whose intelligence he entertained
a favourable opinion, he drew nearer to the girl, determined
to lose a moment in dignified trifling.
Honest 'Maso, poor fellow, is sadly puzzled, he
observed
,
smiling benevolently, as if in pity for the pilot's
embarrassment
;
he wishes to persuade us that the strange craft
yonder is a lugger, though he cannot, himself, say to what
country she belongs!
It is a lugger, Signore, returned the girl, drawing a long
breath, as if relieved by hearing the sound of her own voice.
How! dost thou pretend to be so skilled in vessels, as
to distinguish these particulars at the distance of a league?
I do not think it a league, Signorenot more than half
a league; and the distance lessens fast, though the wind is
so light. As for knowing a lugger from a felucca, it is as
easy as to know a house from a church; or one of the
reverend padri, in the streets, from a mariner.
Ay, so I would have told 'Maso on the spot, had the
obstinate old fellow been inclined to hear me. The
distance
is just about what you say; and nothing is easier than
to see that the stranger is a lugger. As to the nation?
That may not be so easily told, Signore, unless the
vessel
show us her flag.
By San Antonio! thou art right, child; and it is fitting
she should show us her flag. Nothing has a right to
approach
so near the port of his Imperial and Royal Highness,
that does not show its flag, thereby declaring its honest
purpose, and its nation. My friends, are the guns in the
battery loaded, as usual?
The answer being in the affirmative, there was a hurried
consultation among some of the principal men in the crowd,
and then the podest walked towards the government-house
2 *
with an important air. In five minutes soldiers were seen
in the batteries, and preparations were made for levelling an
eighteen-pounder in the direction of the stranger. Most of
the females turned aside, and stopped their ears, the battery
being within a hundred yards of the spot where they stood;
but Ghita, with a face that was pale, certainly, though with
an eye that was steady, and without the least indications of
fear, as respected herself, intensely watched every
movement
.
When it was evident the artillerists were about to
fire, anxiety induced her to break silence.
They surely will not aim
at
the lugger! she exclaimed.
That
cannot be necessary, Signor Podest, to make the
stranger hoist his flag. Never have I seen
that
done in the
south.
You are unacquainted with our Tuscan bombardiers,
Signorina, answered the magistrate, with a bland smile,
and an exulting gesture. It is well for Europe that the
grand duchy is so small, since such troops might prove even
more troublesome than the French!
Ghita, however, paid no attention to this touch of
provincial
pride, but pressing her hands on her heart, she stood
like a statue of suspense, while the men in the battery
executed
their duty. In a minute the match was applied, and
the gun was discharged. Though all her companions
uttered invocations to the saints, and other exclamations, and
some even crouched to the earth in terror, Ghita, the most
delicate of any, in appearance, and with more real sensibility
than all united expressed in her face, stood firm and erect.
The flash and the explosion evidently had no effect on her;
not an artillerist among them was less unmoved in frame, at
the report, than this slight girl. She even imitated the
manner of the soldiers, by turning to watch the flight of the
shot, though she clasped her hands as she did so, and
appeared
to await the result with trembling. The few seconds
of suspense were soon past, when the ball was seen to strike
the water fully a quarter of a mile astern of the lugger, and
to skip along the placid sea for twice that distance further,
when it sunk to the bottom by its own gravity.
Santa Maria be praised! murmured the girl, a smile
half pleasure, half irony, lighting her face, as unconsciously
to herself she spoke, these Tuscan artillerists are no fatal
marksmen!
That was most dexterously done, bella Ghita!
exclaimed
the magistrate, removing his two hands from his
ears; that was amazingly well aimed! Another such
shot as far ahead, with a third fairly between the two, and
the stranger will learn to respect the rights of Tuscany.
What say'st thou now, honest 'Maso  will this lugger tell
us her country, or will she further brave our power?
If wise, she will hoist her ensign; and yet I see no signs
of preparation for such an act.
Sure enough, the stranger, though quite within effective
range of shot from the heights, showed no disposition to
gratify the curiosity, or to appease the apprehensions of
those in the town. Two or three of her people were visible
in her rigging, but even these did not hasten their work, or
in any manner seem deranged at the salutation they had
just received. After a few minutes, however, the lugger
jibed her mainsail, and then hauled up a little, so as to look
more towards the head-land, as if disposed to steer for the
bay, by doubling the promontory. This movement caused
the artillerists to suspend their own, and the lugger had fairly
come within a mile of the cliffs, ere she lazily turned aside
again, and shaped her course once more in the direction of
the entrance of the Canal. This drew another shot, which
effectually justified the magistrate's eulogy, for it certainly
flew as much ahead of the stranger, as the first had flown
astern.
There, Signore, cried Ghita eagerly, as she turned to
the magistrate, they are about to hoist their ensign, for
now they know your wishes. The soldiers surely will not
fire again!
That would be in the teeth of the law of nations,
Signorina
,
and a blot on Tuscan civilization. Ah! you perceive
the artillerists are aware of what you say, and are putting
aside their tools. Cospetto! 'tis a thousand pities, too, they
couldn't fire the third shot, that you might see it strike the
lugger; as yet, you have only beheld their preparations.
It is enough, Signor Podest, returned Ghita, smiling,
for she could smile now that she saw the soldiers intended
no furthermischief; we have all heard of your Elba gunners,
and what I
have
seen convinces me of what they can do,
when there is occasion. Look, Signore! the lugger is about
to satisfy our curiosity.
Sure enough, the stranger saw fit to comply with the
usages of nations. It has been said, already, that the
lugger
was coming down before the wind wing-and-wing, or
with a sail expanded to the air on each side of her hull, a
disposition of the canvass that gives to the felucca, and to
the lugger in particular, the most picturesque of all their
graceful attitudes. Unlike the narrow-headed sails that a
want of hands has introduced among ourselves, these foreign,
we might almost say classical mariners, send forth their
long pointed yards aloft, confining the width below by the
necessary limits of the sheet, making up for the difference
in elevation, by the greater breadth of their canvass. The
idea of the felucca's sails, in particular, would seem to have
been literally taken from the wing of the large sea-fowl, the
shape so nearly corresponding, that, with the canvass spread
in the manner just mentioned, one of those light craft has a
very close resemblance to the gull or the hawk, as it poises
itself in the air, or is swooping down upon its prey. The
lugger has less of the beauty that adorns a picture, perhaps,
than the strictly latine rig; but it approaches so near it as
to be always pleasing to the eye, and, in the particular
evolution
described, is scarcely less attractive. To the seaman,
however, it brings with it an air of greater service, being a
mode of carrying canvass that will buffet with the heaviest
gales, or the roughest seas, while it appears so pleasant to
the eye in the blandest airs, and smoothest water.
The lugger that was now beneath the heights of Elba had
three masts, though sails were spread only on the two that
were forward. The third mast was stepped on the taffrail;
it was small, and carried a little sail, that, in English, is
termed a jigger, its principal use being to press the bows of
the craft up to the wind, when close hauled, and render her
what is termed weatherly. On the present occasion, there
could scarcely be said to be anything deserving the name of
wind, though Ghita felt her cheek, which was warmed with
the rich blood of her country, fanned by an air so gentle,
that occasionally it blew aside tresses, that seemed to vie
with the floss silk of her native land. Had the natural
ringlets been less light, however, so gentle a respiration of
the sea air could scarcely have disturbed them. But the
lugger had her lightest duck spread  reserving the heavier
canvass for the storms  and it opened like the folds of a
balloon, even before these gentle impulses; occasionally
collapsing
,
it is true, as the ground-swell swung the yards to
and fro, but, on the whole, standing out and receiving the
air, as if guided more by volition than any mechanical power.
The effect on the hull was almost magical; for,
notwithstanding
the nearly imperceptible force of the propelling
power, owing to the lightness and exquisite mould of the
craft, it served to urge her through the water at the rate of
some three or four knots in the hour; or quite as fast as an
ordinarily active man is apt to walk. Her motion was
nearly unobservable to all on board, and might rather be
termed gliding than sailing, the ripple under her cut-water
not much exceeding that which is made by the finger, as it
is moved swiftly through the element; still the slightest
variation of the helm changed her course, and this so easily
and gracefully, as to render her deviations and inclinations
like those of the duck. In her present situation, too, the
jigger, which was brailed, and hung festooned from its light
yard, ready for use, should occasion suddenly demand it,
added singularly to the smart air which everything wore
about this craft, giving her, in the seaman's eyes, that
particularly
knowing and suspicious look, which had awakened
'Maso's distrust.
The preparations to show the ensign, which had caught
the quick and understanding glance of Ghita, and which had
not escaped even the duller vision of the artillerists, were
made at the outer end of this jigger-yard. A boy had
appeared on the taffrail, and he was evidently clearing the
ensign-halyards for that purpose. In half a minute,
however
,
he disappeared, and then a flag rose steadily, and by
a continued pull, to its station. At first the bunting hung
suspended in a line, so as to evade all examination; but, as
if everything on board this light craft were on a scale as
airy and buoyant as herself, the folds soon expanded,
showing
a white field, traversed at right angles with a red cross,
and having a union of the same tint in its upper and inner
corner.
Inglese!
exclaimed 'Maso, infinitely aided in this
conjecture
by the sight of the stranger's ensign  Si, Signore;
it is an Englishman; I
thought
so, from the first, but as the
lugger is not a common rig for vessels of that nation, I did
not like to risk anything, by saying it.
Well, honest Tommaso, it is a happiness to have a
mariner
as skilful as yourself, in these troublesome times, at one's
elbow! I do not know how else we should ever have found
out the stranger's country. An Inglese! Corpo di Bacco!
Who would have thought that a nation so maritime, and
which lies so far off, would send so small a craft this vast
distance! Why, Ghita, it is a voyage from Elba to Livorno,
and yet, I dare say, England is twenty times farther.
Signore, I know little of England, but I have heard that
it lies beyond our own sea. This is the flag of the country,
however; for
that
have I often beheld. Many ships of that
nation come upon the coast, further south.
Yes, it is a great country for mariners; though they
tell me it has neither wine nor oil. They are allies of the
emperor, too, and deadly enemies of the French, who have
done so much harm in upper Italy. That is something,
Ghita, and every Italian should honour the flag. I fear this
stranger does not intend to enter our harbour!
He steers as if he did not, certainly, Signor Podest,
said Ghita, sighing so gently that the respiration was audible
only to herself. Perhaps he is in search of some of the
French, of which they say so many were seen, last year,
going east.
Ay, that was truly an enterprise! answered the
magistrate
,
gesticulating on a large scale, and opening his eyes
by way of accompaniments. General Bonaparte, he who
had been playing the devil in the Milanese, and the states
of the Pope, for the last two years, sailed, they sent us word,
with two or three hundred ships, the saints, at first, knew
whither. Some said, it was to destroy the holy sepulchre;
some, to overturn the Grand Turk; and some thought, to
seize the islands. There was a craft in here, the same
week, which said he had got possession of the Island of
Malta; in which case we might look out for trouble in Elba.
I had my suspicions, from the first!
All this I heard, at the time, Signore, and my uncle
probably
could tell you morehow we all felt at the tidings!
Well, that is all over now, and the French are in Egypt.
Your uncle, Ghita, has gone upon the main, I hear? this
was said inquiringly, and it was intended to be said
carelessly
;
but the podest could not prevent a glance of suspicion
from accompanying the question.
Signore, I believe he has; but I know little of his affairs.
The time has come, however, when I ought to expect him.
See, Eccellenza, a title that never failed to mollify the
magistrate, and turn his attention from others entirely to
himself, the lugger really appears disposed to look into
your bay, if not actually to enter it!
This sufficed to change the discourse. Nor was it said
altogether without reason; the lugger, which by this time
had passed the western promontory, actually appearing
disposed
to do as Ghita conjectured. She had jibed her
mainsail
brought both sheets of canvass on her larboard side,
and luffed a little, so as to cause her head to look towards
the opposite side of the bay, instead of standing in, as before,
in the direction of the canal. This change in the lugger's
course produced a general movement in the crowd, which
began to quit the heights, hastening to descend the terraced
streets, in order to reach the haven. 'Maso and the podest
led the van, in this descent; and the girls, with Ghita in their
midst, followed with equal curiosity, but with eager steps.
By the time the throng was assembled on the quays, in the
streets, on the decks of feluccas, or at other points that
commanded the view, the stranger was seen gliding past, in
the centre of the wide and deep bay, with his jigger hauled
out, and his sheets aft, looking up nearly into the wind's eye,
if that could be called wind, which was still little more than
the sighing of the classical zephyr. His motion was
necessarily
slow, but it continued light, easy, and graceful. After
passing the entrance of the port a mile or more, he tacked
and looked up towards the haven. By this time, however,
he had got so near in to the western cliffs, that their lee
deprived
him of all air; and after keeping his canvass open
half an hour in the little roads, it was all suddenly drawn to
the yards, and the lugger anchored.
CHAPTER II.
His stock, a few French phrases, got by heart,
With much to learn, but nothing to impart;
The youth obedient to his sire's commands,
Sets off a wanderer into foreign lands.
Cowper
.
It
was now nearly dark, and the crowd, having satisfied
its idle curiosity, began slowly to disperse. The Signor
Viti remained till the last, conceiving it to be his duty to be
on the alert, in such troubled times; but with all his bustling
activity, it escaped his vigilance and means of observation
to detect the circumstance that the stranger, who, while he
steered into the bay with so much confidence, had contrived
to bring up at a point where not a single gun from the
batteries
could be brought to bear on him; while his own shot,
had he been disposed to hostility, would have completely
raked the little haven. But Vito Viti, though so enthusiastic
an admirer of the art, was no gunner himself, and little
liked to dwell on the effect of shot, except as it applied to
others, and not at all to himself.
Of all the suspicious, apprehensive and curious, who had
been collected in and about the port, since it was known the
lugger intended to come into the bay, Ghita and 'Maso
alone remained on watch, after the vessel anchored. A loud
hail had been given by those entrusted with the execution
of the quarantine laws, the great physical bug-bear and
moral mystification of the Mediterranean; and the questions
put had been answered in a way to satisfy all scruples for
the moment. The From whence came ye? asked,
however
,
in an Italian idiom, had been answered by Inghilterra,
touching at Lisbon and Gibraltar, all regions beyond
distrust
,
as to the plague, and all happening, at that moment,
to give clean bills of health. But the name of the craft,
herself
,
had been given in a way to puzzle all the proficients in
Saxon English that Porto Ferrajo could produce. It had
been distinctly enough pronounced by some one on board,
and at the request of the quarantine department, had been
three times slowly repeated, very much after the following
form; viz.
Come chiamate il vostro bastimento?
The Wing-And-Wing.
Come?
The Wing-And-Wing.
A long pause, during which the officials put their heads
together, first to compare the sounds of each with those of
his companions' ears, and then to inquire of one who
professed
to understand English, but whose knowledge was such
as is generally met with in a linguist of a little-frequented
port, the meaning of the term.
Ving-y-ving! growled this functionary, not a little
puzzled, what ze devil sort of name is zat! Ask zem
again.
Come si chiama la vostra barca, Signori Inglesi?
repeated he who hailed.
Diable!
growled one back, in French, she is called
ze Wing-And-Wing, `Ala e Ala,' giving a very literal
translation of the name, in Italian.
Ala e ala!
repeated they of the quarantine, first
looking
at each other in surprise, and then laughing, though in
a perplexed and doubtful manner; Ving-y-Ving!
This passed just as the lugger anchored, and the crowd
had begun to disperse. It caused some merriment, and it
was soon spread in the little town that a craft had just
arrived from Inghilterra, whose name, in the dialect of that
island, was Ving-y-Ving; which meant
Ala e ala
, in
Italian; a cognomen that struck the listeners as sufficiently
absurd. In confirmation of the fact, however, the lugger
hoisted a small square flag, at the end of her main-yard, on
which were painted, or wrought, two large wings, as they
are sometimes delineated in heraldry, with the beak of a
galley between them; giving the whole conceit something
very like the appearance that the human imagination has
assigned to those heavenly beings, cherubs. This emblem
seemed to satisfy the minds of the observers, who were too
much accustomed to the images of art, not to obtain some
tolerably distinct notions, in the end, of what
Ala e ala
meant.
But 'Maso, as has been said, remained after the rest had
Vol. I  3
departed to their homes and their suppers, as did Ghita.
The pilot, for such was Tonti's usual appellation, in
consequence
of his familiarity with the coast, and his being
principally
employed to direct the navigation of the different
craft in which he served, kept his station on board a felucca
to which he belonged, watching the movements of the lugger,
while the girl had taken her stand on the quay, in a position
that better became her sex, since it removed her from
immediate
contact with the rough spirits of the port, while it
enabled
her to see what occurred about the Wing-And-Wing.
More than half an hour elapsed, however, before there were
any signs of an intention to land; but, by the time it was
dark, a boat was ready, and it was seen making its way to
the common stairs, where one or two of the regular officials
were ready to receive it.
It is unnecessary to dwell on the forms of the pratique
officers. These troublesome persons had their lanterns, and
were vigilant in examining papers, as is customary; but it
would seem, the mariner in the boat had everything
en
rgle
, for he was soon suffered to land. At this instant,
Ghita passed near the group, and took a close and keen
survey
of the stranger's form and face, her own person being
so enveloped in a mantle, as to render a recognition of it
difficult, if not impossible. The girl seemed satisfied with
this scrutiny, for she immediately disappeared. Not so with
'Maso, who by this time had hurried round from the felucca,
and was at the stairs in season to say a word to the stranger.
Signore, said the pilot, his Eccellenza, the podest,
has bidden me say to you, that he expects the honour of your
company, at his house, which stands so near us, hard by
here, in the principal street, as will make it only a pleasure
to go there; I know he would be disappointed, if he failed
of the happiness of seeing you.
His Eccellenza is a man not to be disappointed,
returned
the stranger, in very good Italian, and five minutes
shall prove to him how eager I am to salute him; then
turning to the crew of his boat, he ordered them to return on
board the lugger, and not to fail to look out for the signal by
which he might call them ashore.
'Maso, as he led the way to the dwelling of Vito Viti,
would fain ask a few questions, in the hope of appeasing
certain doubts that beset him.
Since when, Signor Capitano, he inquired, have you
English taken to sailing luggers? It is a novel rig for one
of your craft.
Corpo di Bacco! answered the other, laughing, friend
of mine, if you can tell the precise day when brandy and laces
were first smuggled from France into my country, I will
answer your question. I think you have never navigated
as far north as the Bay of Biscay and our English Channel,
or you would know that a Guernsey-man is better acquainted
with the rig of a lugger, than with that of a ship.
Guernsey is a country I never heard of, answered
'Maso, simply; is it like Hollandor more like Lisbon?
Very little of either. Guernsey is a country that was
once French, and where many of the people still speak the
French language, but of which the English have been
masters
this many an age. It is an island subject to King
George, but which is still half Gallic in names and usages.
This is the reason why we like the lugger better than the
cutter, which is a more English rig.
'Maso was silent, for, if true, the answer at once removed
many misgivings. He had seen so much about the strange
craft which struck him as French, that doubts of her
character
had obtruded; but, if her captain's account could only
be substantiated, there was an end of distrust. What could
be more natural than the circumstance that a vessel fitted
out in an island of French origin, should betray some of the
peculiarities of the people who built her?
The podest was at home, in expectation of this visit, and
'Maso was first admitted to a private conference, leaving the
stranger in an outer room. During this brief conference,
the pilot communicated all he had to say  both his
suspicions
and the seeming solution of the difficulties; and then
he took his leave, after receiving the boon of a paul. Vito
Viti now joined his guest, but it was so dark, lights not
having yet been introduced, that neither could distinguish
the other's countenance.
Signor Capitano, observed the magistrate, the
deputy-governor
is at his residence, on the hill, and he will expect
me to do him the favour to bring you thither, that he may
do you the honours of the port.
This was said so civilly, and was, in itself, both so
reasonable
and so much in conformity with usage, that the other
had not a word to say against it. Together, then, they left
the house, and proceeded towards the government-dwelling
a building which has since become celebrated as having
been the residence of a soldier who came so near subjugating
Europe. Vito Viti was a short, pursy man, and he took his
time to ascend the stairs-resembling street; but his
companion
stepped from terrace to terrace with an ease and
activity that, of themselves, would have declared him to be
young, had not this been made apparent by his general
bearing and his mien, as seen through the obscurity.
Andrea Barrofaldi, the vice-governatore, was a very
different
sort of person from his friend the podest. Although
little more acquainted with the world, by practice, the
vice-governatore
was deeply read in books; owing his situation,
in short, to the circumstance of his having written several
clever works, of no great reputation, certainly, for genius,
but which were useful in their way, and manifested
scholarship
.
It is very seldom that a man of mere letters is
qualified
for public life; and yet there is an affectation, in all
governments, most especially in those which care so little
for literature in general, as to render some professions of
respect for it necessary to their own characters, of protecting
it; and thus it is, that among ourselves, where the laws are so
indifferent to the
rights
and interests of men of this class as
to subject them to costs and penalties, in the prosecution of
their ordinary labours, that no other Christian nation dreams
of exacting, we hear high-sounding pretensions to this
species
of liberality, although the system of rewards and
punishments
[1]
[1]
So much is said in the journals of this country concerning the
patronage the public bestows on letters, a patronage which is very much
confined to buying such works as the reader wants, and not purchasing
those for which he feels no occasion, that it forcibly reminds one of the
story of the Creole woman, who was descanting on the subject of ruling
negroes, among some friends. If you will gouverne negres, she
said, you moost have systme. I have systme. Mon systme  moi,
is systme of reward and poonish
ment
. Then she turns to her
negroes
,
and addresses them, desiring her friends to note the effect.
Mes amis
, she begins, zo-morrow ze cane will be roipe, and you
moost moosh vork. You know me  you know mon systme  it is
systme of reward and poonishment. If you shall not vork, you
shall
be flog; zat is poonishment; mais if you shall
very
moosh
very
moosh vork; you shall
no
be flog  zat is ze reward!
that prevails, usually requires that its beneficiary
should first
rat
, in order to prove his adaptation to the duty.
Andrea Barrofaldi, however, had thrown no political
summerset
,
and had consequently been inducted into his present
office without even the sentimental profession of never having
asked for it. The situation had been given to him by the
Fossombrone of his day, without a word having been said
in the journals of Tuscany of his doubts about accepting it,
and everything passed, as things are apt to pass when there
are true simplicity and good faith at the bottom, without
pretension or comment. He had now been ten years in
office, and had got to be exceedingly expert in
discharging
all the ordinary functions of his post, which he
certainly
did with zeal and fidelity. Still, he did not desert
his beloved books, and, quite propos of the matter about to
come before him, the Signor Barrofaldi had just finished a
severe, profound, and extensive course of study in
geography
.
The stranger was left in the ante-chamber, while Vito
Viti entered an inner room, and had a short communication
with his friend, the vice-governatore. As soon as this was
ended, the former returned, and ushered his companion into
the presence of the substitute for a grand duke, if not for a
king. As this was the sailor's first appearance within the
influence of a light sufficiently strong to enable the podest
to examine his person, both he and Andrea Barrofaldi turned
their eyes on him with lively curiosity, the instant the rays
of a strong lamp enabled them to scrutinize his appearance.
Neither was disappointed, in one sense, at least; the
countenance
,
figure, and mien of the mariner much more than
equalling his expectations.
The stranger was a man of six-and-twenty, who stood five
feet ten in his stockings, and whose frame was the very
figure of activity, united to a muscle that gave very fair
indications of strength. He was attired in an undress naval
uniform, which he wore with a smart air, that one who
understood these matters, more by means of experience, and
3*
less by means of books, than Andrea Barrofaldi, would at
once have detected did not belong to the manly simplicity of
the English wardrobe. Nor were his features, in the
slightest
degree, those of one of the islanders, the outline being
beautifully classical, more especially about the mouth and
chin, while the cheeks were colourless, and the skin swarthy.
His eye, too, was black as jet, and his cheek was half covered
in whiskers of a hue dark as the raven's wing. His face,
as a whole, was singularly beautiful  for handsome is a
word not strong enough to express all the character that
was conveyed by a conformation that might be supposed to
have been copied from some antique medal, more especially
when illuminated by a smile that, at times, rendered the
whole countenance almost as bewitching as that of a lovely
woman. There was nothing effeminate in the
appearance
of the young stranger, notwithstanding; his manly,
though sweet voice, well-knit frame, and firm look,
affording
every pledge of resolution and spirit.
Both the vice-governatore and the podest were struck
with the unusual personal advantages and smart air of the
stranger, and each stood looking at him half-a-minute in
silence, after the usual salutations had passed, and before the
party was seated. Then, as the three took chairs, on a
motion from Signor Barrofaldi, the latter opened the
discourse
.
They tell me that we have the honour to receive into
our little haven a vessel of Inghilterra, Signor Capitano,
observed the vice-governatore, earnestly regarding the other
through his spectacles as he spoke, and that, too, in a
manner
not altogether free from distrust.
Signor Vice-governatore, such is the flag under which I
have the honour to serve; returned the mariner.
You are an Inglese, yourself, I trust, Signor Capitano
what name shall I enter in my book, here?
Jaques Smeet, answered the other, betraying what
might have proved two very fatal Shibboleths, in the ears
of those who were practised in the finesse of our very
unmusical
language, by attempting to say Jack Smith.
Jaques Smeet! repeated the vice-governatore  that
is, Giacomo, in our Italian
NonoSignore, hastily interrupted Captain Smeet,
not Jaqueomo, but Jaques  Giovanni, turned into Jaques
by the aid of a little salt water.
Ah!  I begin to understand you, Signore; you
English
have this usage in your language, though
you
have
softened the word a little, in mercy to our ears. But we
Italians are not afraid of such sounds; and I know the name.
`Giac Smeet'  Il Capitano Giac Smeet  I have long
suspected my English master of ignorance, for he was
merely one of our Leghorn pilots, who has sailed in a
bastimento
de guerra of your country  he called your
honourable
name `Smees,' Signore.
He was very wrong, Signor Vice-governatore,
answered
the other, clearing his throat by a slight effort; we
always call our family `Smeet.'
And the name of your lugger, Signor Capitano Smeet?
suspending his pen over the paper in expectation of the
answer.
Ze Ving-And-Ving; pronouncing the
w's
in a very
different way from what they had been sounded in
answering
the hails.
Ze Ving-y-Ving, repeated Signor Barrofaldi, writing
the name in a manner to show it was not the first time he
had heard it; ze Ving-y-Ving; that is a poetical
appellation
,
Signor Capitano; may I presume to ask what it
signifies
?
Ala e ala
, in your Italian,
Mister
Vice-governatore.
When a craft like mine has a sail spread on each side,
resembling
a bird, we say, in English, that she marches `
Ving-and-Ving
.'
Andrea Barrofaldi mused, in silence, near a minute.
During this interval, he was thinking of the improbability
of any but a bon fide Englishman's dreaming of giving a
vessel an appellation so thoroughly idiomatic, and was fast
mystifying himself, as so often happens by tyros in any
particular branch of knowledge, by his own critical acumen.
Then he half whispered a conjecture on the subject to Vito
Viti, influenced quite as much by a desire to show his
neighbour
his own readiness in such matters, as by any other
feeling. The podest was less struck by the distinction than
his superior; but, as became one of his limited means, he
did not venture an objection.
Signor Capitano, resumed Andrea Barrofaldi, since
when have you English adopted the rig of the lugger? It
is an unusual craft for so great a naval nation, they tell me.
Bah! I see how it is, Signor Vice-governatore  you
suspect me of being a Frenchman, or a Spaniard, or
something
else than I claim to be. On this head, however, you
may set your heart at rest, and put full faith in what I tell
you. My name is Capitaine Jaques Smeet; my vessel is
ze Ving-and-Ving; and my service that of the king of
England
.
Is your craft, then, a king's vessel; or does she sail
with the commission of a corsair?
Do I look like a corsair, Signor? demanded le
Capitaine
Smeet, with an offended air; I have reason to feel
myself injured by so unworthy an imputation!
Your pardon, Signor Capitano Smees  but our duty
is a very delicate one, on this unprotected island, in times as
troubled as these in which we live. It has been stated to
me, as coming from the most experienced pilot of our haven,
that your lugger has not altogether the appearance of a
vessel of the Inglese, while she has many that belong to the
corsairs of France; and a prudent caution imposes on me
the office of making certain of your nation. Once assured
of that, it will be the delight of the Elbans to prove how
much we honour and esteem our illustrious allies.
This is so reasonable, and so much according to what I
do myself, when I meet a stranger at sea, cried the captain,
stretching forth both arms in a frank and inviting manner,
that none but a knave would object to it. Pursue your
own course, Signor Vice-governatore, and satisfy all your
scruples, in your own manner. How shall this be done
will you go on board ze Ving-and-Ving, and look for
yourself
send this honourable magistrate, or shall I show you
my commission? Here is the last, altogether at your
service
,
and that of his Imperial Highness, the Grand Duke.
I flatter myself with having sufficient knowledge of
Inghilterra, Signor Capitano, though it be by means of books,
to discover an impostor, could I believe you capable of
appearing
in so unworthy a character; and that, too, in a
very brief conversation. We book-worms, added Andrea
Barrofaldi, with a glance of triumph at his neighbour, for he
now expected to give the podest an illustration of the
practical
benefits of general learning, a subject that had often
been discussed between them, we book-worms can manage
these trifles in our own way; and if you will consent to
enter into a short dialogue on the subject of England, her
habits, language and laws, this question will be speedily put
at rest.
You have me at command; and nothing would delight
me more than to chat for a few minutes about that little
island. It is not large, Signore, and is doubtless of little
worth; but, as my country, it is much in my eyes.
This is natural. And now, Signor Capitano, added
Andrea, glancing at the podest, to make sure that he was
listening, will you have the goodness to explain to me
what sort of a government this Inghilterra possesses
whether monarchy, aristocracy or democracy?
Peste!that is not so easily answered. There is a king,
and yet there are powerful lords; and a democracy, too, that
sometimes gives trouble enough. Your question might
puzzle a philosopher, Signor Vice-governatore.
This may be true enough, neighbour Vito Viti, for the
constitution of Inghilterra is an instrument of many strings!
Your answer convinces me you have thought on the subject
of your government, Capitano, and I honour a reflecting
man, in all situations in life. What is the religion of the
country?
Corpo di Bacco! that is harder to answer than all the
rest! We have as many religions, in England, as we have
people. It is true, the law says one thing, on this head, but
then the men, women and children say another. Nothing
has troubled me more than this same matter of religion.
Ah! you sailors do not disquiet your souls with such
thoughts, if the truth must be said. Well, we will be
indulgent
on this subjectthough, out of doubt, you and all your
people are Luterani?
Set us down as what you please, answered the captain,
with an ironical smile. Our fathers, at any rate, were
all good Catholics once. But seamanship and the altar are
the best of friends, living quite independent of each other.
That I will answer for. It is much the same here, caro
Vito Viti, though our mariners do burn so many lamps, and
offer up so many aves.
Your pardon, Signor Vice-governatore, interrupted the
Signor Smeet, with a little earnestness; this is the great
mistake of your seamen, in general. Did they pray less,
and look to their duties more, their voyages would be shorter,
and the profits more certain.
Scandalous! exclaimed the podest, in hotter zeal than
it was usual for him to betray
Nay, worthy Vito Viti, it is even so, interrupted the
deputy, with a wave of the hand, that was as authoritative as
the concession was liberal and indicative of a spirit
enlightened
by study; the fact must be conceded. There
is the fable of Hercules and the wagoner, to confirm it. Did
our men first strive, and then pray, more would be done,
than by first praying and then striving;  and now, Signor
Capitano, a word on your language, of which I have some
small knowledge, and which doubtless you speak like a
native.
Sairtain
lee
, answered the captain, with perfect
self-composure
,
changing the form of speech from the Italian to
the English with a readiness that proved how strong he felt
himself on this point; one cannot fail to speak ze tongue
of his own mozair.
This was said without any confusion of manner, and with
an accent that might very well mislead a foreigner, and it
sounded imposing to the vice-governatore, who felt a secret
consciousness that he could not have uttered such a sentence,
to save his own life, without venturing out of his depth:
therefore, he pursued the discourse in Italian.
Your language, Signore, observed Andrea Barrofaldi,
with warmth, is no doubt a very noble one, for the
language
in which Shakspeare and Milton wrote cannot be else;
but, you will permit me to say that it has a uniformity of
sound, with words of different letters, that I find as
unreasonable
as it is embarrassing, to a foreigner.
I have heard such complaints before, answered the
captain, not at all sorry to find the examination, which had
proved so awkward to himself, likely to be transferred to a
language about which he cared not at all, and have little
to say in its defence. But, as an example of what you
mean
Why, Signore, here are several words that I have
written
on this bit of paper, which sound nearly alike, though, as
you perceive, they are quite differently spelled. Bix, bax,
box, bux, and bocks, continued Andrea, endeavouring to
pronounce, big, bag, bug, bog, and box, all
of which, it seemed to him, had a very close family
resemblance
,
in sound, though certainly spelled with different
letters; these are words, Signore, that are enough to drive
a foreigner to abandon your tongue in despair.
Indeed they are; and I often told the person who taught
me the language
How; did you not learn your own tongue as we all get
our native forms of speech, by ear, when a child? demanded
the vice-governatore, his suspicions suddenly revived.
Without question, Signore, but I speak of books, and of
learning to read. When `big,' `bag,' `bug,' `bog,' and
`box,' reading from the paper, in a steady voice, and a
very tolerable pronunciation, first came before me, I felt
all the embarrassment of which you speak.
And did you only pronounce these words when first
taught to read them?
This question was an awkward one to answer; but Vito
Viti began to weary of a discourse in which he could take
no part, and, most opportunely, he interposed an objection
of his own.
Signor Barrofaldi, he said, stick to the lugger. All
our motives of suspicion came from Tommaso Tonti, and all
of his from the rig of Signor Smees' vessel. If the lugger
can be explained, what do we care about bixy, buxy, boxy!
The vice-governatore was not sorry to get creditably out
of the difficulties of the language, and, smiling on his friend,
he made a gentle bow of compliance. Then he reflected a
moment, in order to plan another mode of proceeding, and
pursued the inquiry.
My neighbour Vito Viti is right, he said, and we will
stick to the lugger. Tommaso Tonti is a mariner of
experience
,
and the oldest pilot of Elba. He tells us that the
lugger is a craft much in use among the French, and not at
all among the English, so far as he has ever witnessed.
In that Tommaso Tonti is no seaman. Many luggers are
to be found among the English; though more, certainly,
among the French. But I have already given the Signor
Viti to understand that there is such an island as Guernsey,
which was once French, but which is now English, and that
accounts for the appearances he has observed. We are
Guernsey-men  the lugger is from Guernsey  and, no
doubt, we have a Guernsey look. This is being half French,
I allow.
That alters the matter, altogether. Neighbour Viti,
this is all true about the island, and about its habits and its
origin; and if one could be as certain about the names,
why nothing more need be said. Are Giac Smees, and
Ving-y-Ving, Guernsey names?
They are not particularly so, returned the sailor, with
difficulty refraining from laughing in the vice-governatore's
face; Jaques Smeet' being so English, that we are the
largest family, perhaps, in all Inghilterra. Half the nobles
of the island are called Smeet', and not a few are named
Jaques. But little Guernsey was conquered; and our
ancestors
,
who performed that office, brought their names with
them, Signore. As for Ving-And-Ving, it is
capital
English.
I do not see, Vito, but this is reasonable. If the
capitano
,
now, only had his commission with him, you and I
might go to bed in peace, and sleep till morning.
Here, then, Signore, are your sleeping potions,
continued
the laughing sailor, drawing from his pocket several
papers. These are my orders from the admiral; and, as
they are not secret, you can cast your eyes over them.
This is my commission, Signor Vice-governatore  this is
the signature of the English minister of marine  and here
is my own, `Jaques Smeet', as you see, and here is the
order to me, as a lieutenant, to take command of the
Ving-And-Ving
.
All the orders and names were there, certainly, written in
a clear, fair hand, and in perfectly good English. The only
thing that one who understood the language perfectly would
have been apt to advert to, was the circumstance that the
words which the sailor pronounced Jaques Smeet', were
written, plainly enough, Jack Smith  an innovation on
the common practice, which, to own the truth, had proceeded
from his own obstinacy, and had been done in the very teeth
of the objections of the scribe who had forged the papers.
But Andrea was still too little of an English scholar to
understand
the blunder, and the Jack passed, with him, quite
as currently as would John, Edward, or any other
appellation. As to the Wing-And-Wing, all was right;
though, as the words were pointed out and pronounced by
both parties, one pertinaciously insisted on calling them
Ving-And-Ving, and the other, Ving-y-Ving. All this
evidence had a great tendency towards smoothing down
every difficulty, and 'Maso Tonti's objections were pretty
nearly forgotten by both the Italians, when the papers were
returned to, and pocketed again by, their proper owner.
It was an improbable thing that an enemy, or a corsair,
would venture into this haven of ours, Vito Viti, said the
vice-governatore, in a self-approving manner; for we have
a reputation for being vigilant, and for knowing our business,
as well as the authorities of Livorno, or Genova, or Napoli.
And that too, Signore, with nothing in the world to gain
but hard knocks and a prison, added the Captain Smeet',
with one of his most winning smiles  a smile that even
softened the heart of the podest, while it so far warmed that
of his superior, as to induce him to invite the stranger to
share his own frugal supper. The invitation was accepted
as frankly as it had been given, and, the table being ready
in an adjoining room, in a few minutes Il Capitano Smees
and Vito Viti were sharing the vice-governatore's evening
meal.
From this moment, if distrust existed any longer in the
breasts of the two functionaries of Porto Ferrajo, it was so
effectually smothered as to be known only to themselves.
The light fare of an Italian kitchen, and the light wines of
Tuscany, just served to strengthen the system, and enliven
the spirits; the conversation becoming general and lively,
as the business of the moment proceeded. At that day, tea
was known throughout southern Europe as an ingredient
only for the apothecary's keeping; nor was it often to be
found among his stores; and the
convives
used, as a
substitute
,
large draughts of the pleasant mountain liquors of the
adjacent main, which produced an excitement scarcely
greater, while it may be questioned if it did as much injury
Vol. I.  4
to the health. The stranger, however, both eat and drank
sparingly, for, while he affected to join cordially in the
discourse
and the business of
restoration
, he greatly desired to
be at liberty to pursue his own designs.
Andrea Barrofaldi did not let so excellent an opportunity
to show his acquirements to the podest go by neglected.
He talked much of England, its history, its religion,
government
,
laws, climate, and industry; making frequent appeals
to the Capitano Smees for the truth of his opinions. In
most cases the parties agreed surprisingly, for the stranger
started with a deliberate intention to assent to everything;
but even this compliant temper had its embarrassments, since
the vice-governatore so put his interrogatories as
occasionally
to give to acquiescence the appearance of dissent. The
other floundered through his difficulties tolerably well,
notwithstanding
;
and so successful was he, in particular, in
flattering
Andrea's self-love by expressions of astonishment
that a foreigner should understand his own country so well
better, indeed, in many respects, than he understood it
himself  and that he should be so familiar with its habits,
institutions and geography, that, by the time the flask was
emptied, the superior functionary whispered to his inferior,
that the stranger manifested so much information and good
sense, he should not be surprised if he turned out, in the
long run, to be some secret agent of the British government,
employed to make philosophical inquiries as to the trade and
navigation of Italy, with a view to improve the business
relations between the two countries.
You are an admirer of nobility, and a devotee of
aristocracy
,
added Andrea Barrofaldi, in pursuit of the subject
then in hand; if the truth were known, a scion of some
noble house, yourself, Signore?
I?  Peste!  I hate an aristocrat, Signor
Vice-governatore
,
as I do the devil!
This was said just after the freest draught the stranger
had taken, and with an unguarded warmth that he himself
immediately regretted.
This is extraordinary, in an Inglese! Ah  I see how
it is  you are in the
opposizione
, and find it necessary to
say this. It is most extraordinary, good Vito Viti, that these
Inglese are divided into two political
castes
, that contradict
each other in everything. If one maintains that an object
is white, the other side swears it is black; and so
vice vers
.
Both parties profess to love their country better than
anything
else; but the one that is out of power abuses even
power itself, until it falls into its own hands.
This is so much like Giorgio Grondi's course towards
me, Signore, that I could almost swear he was one of these
very opposizione! I never approve of a thing that he
does not condemn, or condemn, that he does not approve.
Do you confess this much, Signor Capitano?
Il vice-governatore knows us better than we know
ourselves
,
I fear. There is too much truth in his account of
our politics; but, Signori, rising from his chair, I now
crave your permission to look at your town, and to return
to my vessel. The darkness has come, and discipline must
be observed.
As Andrea Barrofaldi had pretty well exhausted his stores
of knowledge, no opposition was made; and, returning his
thanks, the stranger took his departure, leaving the two
functionaries to discuss his appearance and character over
the remainder of the flask.
CHAPTER III.
There's Jonathan, that lucky lad,
Who knows it from the root, sir;
He sucks in all that's to be had,
And always trades for boot, sir.
14,763
d verse of Yankee Doodle
.
Il Capitano Smeet
' was not sorry to get out of the
government-house  palazzo, as some of the simple people
of Elba called the unambitious dwelling. He had been well
badgered by the persevering erudition of the
vice-governatore
;
and, stored as he was with nautical anecdotes, and a
tolerable personal acquaintance with sundry sea-ports, for
any expected occasion of this sort, he had never anticipated
a conversation which would aspire as high as the institutions,
religion and laws of his adopted country. Had the worthy
Andrea heard the numberless maledictions, that the stranger
muttered between his teeth, as he left the house, it would
have shocked all his sensibilities, if it did not revive his
suspicions
.
It was now night; but a starry, calm, voluptuous evening,
such as are familiar to those who are acquainted with the
Mediterranean and its shores. There was scarcely a breath
of wind, though the cool air, that appeared to be a gentle
respiration of the sea, induced a few idlers still to linger on
the heights, where there was a considerable extent of land,
that might serve for a promenade. Along this walk the
mariner proceeded, undetermined, for the moment, what to
do next. He had scarcely got into the open space, however,
before a female, with her form closely enveloped in a mantle,
brushed near him, anxiously gazing into his face. Her
motions were too quick and sudden for him to obtain a look
in return; but, perceiving that she held her way along the
heights, beyond the spot most frequented by the idlers, he
followed until she stopped.
Ghita! said the young man, in a tone of delight, when
he had got near enough to the female to recognise a face
and form she no longer attempted to conceal; this is being
fortunate, indeed, and saves a vast deal of trouble. A
thousand
,
thousand thanks, dearest Ghita, for this one act of
kindness. I might have brought trouble on you, as well as
on myself, in striving to find your residence.
It is for that reason, Raoul, that I have ventured so
much more than is becoming in my sex, to meet you. A
thousand eyes, in this gossiping little town, are on your
lugger, at this moment, and be certain they will also be on
its captain, as soon as it is known he has landed. I fear
you do not know for what you and your people are
suspected
,
at this very instant!
For nothing discreditable, I hope, dear Ghita, if it be
only not to dishonour your friends!
Many think, and say, you are Frenchmen, and that the
English flag is only a disguise.
If that be all, we must bear the infamy, answered
Raoul Yvard, laughing. Why, this is just what we are,
to a man, a single American excepted; who is an excellent
fellow to make out British commissions, and help us to a
little English when harder pushed than common; and why
should we be offended, if the good inhabitants of Porto
Ferrajo
take us for what we are!
Not offended, Raoul, but endangered. If the
vice-governatore
gets this notion, he will order the batteries to fire
upon you, and will destroy you as an enemy.
Not he, Ghita. He is too fond of le Capitaine Smeet',
to do so cruel a thing; and then he must shift all his guns,
before they will hurt
le Feu-Follet
, where she lies. I never
leave my little Jack-o'Lantern
[2]
[2]
The English of
Feu-Follet
.
within reach of an enemy's
hand. Look here, Ghita; you can see her through this
opening in the houses  that dark spot on the bay, there
and you will perceive no gun from any battery in Porto
Ferrajo can as much as frighten, much less harm her.
I know her position, Raoul, and understood why you
anchored in that spot. I knew, or thought I knew you,
from the first moment you came in plain sight; and so long
as you remained outside, I was not sorry to look on so old
a friend  nay, I will go farther, and say I rejoiced, for it
seemed to me, you passed so near the island, just to let some,
whom you knew to be on it, understand you had not
forgotten
them; but when you came into the bay, I thought
you mad!
Mad I should have been, dearest Ghita, had I lived
longer without seeing you. What are these
misrables
of
Elbans, that I should fear them! They have no cruiser
only a few feluccas, all of which are not worth the trouble
of burning. Let them but point a finger at us, and we will
tow their Austrian polacre out into the bay, and burn her
before their eyes. Le Feu-Follet deserves her name; she
is here, there, and everywhere, before her enemies suspect
her.
But her enemies suspect her now, and you cannot be
too cautious. My heart was in my throat a dozen times,
while the batteries were firing at you, this evening.
And what harm did they?they cost the Grand Duke
two cartridges, and two shot, without even changing the
lugger's course! You have seen too much of these things,
Ghita, to be alarmed by smoke and noise.
4*
I have seen enough of these things, Raoul, to know
that a heavy shot, fired from these heights, would have
gone through your little Feu-Follet, and, coming out under
water, would have sunk you to the bottom of the
Mediterranean
.
We should have had our boats, then, answered Raoul
Yvard, with an indifference that was not affected, for
reckless
daring was his vice, rather than his virtue; besides,
a shot must first hit, before it can harm, as the fish must be
taken, before it can be cooked. But enough of this, Ghita;
I get quite enough of shot, and ships, and sinkings, in
everyday
life, and, now I have at last found this blessed moment,
we will not throw away the opportunity by talking of such
matters
Nay, Raoul, I can think of nothing else, and therefore
can talk of nothing else. Suppose the vice-governatore
should suddenly take it into his head to send a party of
soldiers
to le Feu-Follet, with orders to seize herwhat would
then be your situation?
Let him; and I would send a boat's crew to his palazzo,
here, the conversation was in French, which Ghita spoke
fluently, though with an Italian accent, and take him on
a cruise after the English, and his beloved Austrians!
Bah!  the idea will not cross his constitutional brain, and
there is little use in talking about it. In the morning, I will
send my prime minister, mon Barras, mon Carnot, mon
Cambacrs, mon Ithuel Bolt, to converse with him on
politics
and religion.
Religion, repeated Ghita, in a saddened tone; the
less you say on that holy subject, Raoul, the better I shall
like it, and the better it will be for yourself, in the end.
The state of your country makes your want of religion
matter of regret, rather than of accusation, but it is none the
less a dreadful evil.
Well, then, resumed the sailor, who felt he had touched
a dangerous ground, we will talk of other things. Even
supposing we are taken, what great evil have we to
apprehend
?
We are honest corsairs, duly commissioned, and
acting under the protection of the French Republic, one and
undivided, and can but be made prisoners of war. That is
a fortune which has once befallen me, and no greater
calamity
followed than my having to call myself le Capitaine
Smeet', and finding out the means of mystifying le
vice-governatori
.
Ghita laughed, in spite of the fears she entertained, for
it was one of the most powerful of the agencies the sailor
employed in making others converts to his opinions, to cause
them to sympathize with his light-hearted gaiety, whether
it suited their natural temperaments or not. She knew that
Raoul had already been a prisoner in England two years,
where, as he often said himself, he staid just long enough to
acquire a very respectable acquaintance with the language,
if not with the institutions, manners, and religion, when he
made his escape, aided by the American, called Ithuel Bolt,
an impressed seaman of our own Republic, who fully
entering
into all the plans imagined by his more enterprising
friend and fellow-sufferer, had cheerfully enlisted in the
execution of his future schemes of revenge. States, like
powerful individuals in private life, usually feel themselves
too strong to allow any considerations of the direct
consequences
of departures from the right to influence their policy,
and a nation is apt to fancy its power of such a character,
as to despise all worldly amends, while its moral
responsibility
is divided among too many to make it a matter of much
moral concernment to its particular citizens. Nevertheless,
the truth will show that none are so low, but they may
become
dangerous to the highest; and even powerful
communities
seldom fail to meet with their punishment for every
departure from justice. It would seem, indeed, that a
principle
pervades nature, which renders it impossible for man
to escape the consequences of his own evil deeds, even in
this life; as if God had decreed the universal predominance
of truth, and the never-failing downfall of falsehood, from
the beginning; the success of wrong being ever temporary,
while the triumph of the right is eternal. To apply these
consoling considerations to the matter more immediately
before us; the practice of impressment, in its day, raised a
feeling among the seamen of other nations, as well as, in
fact, among those of Great Britain herself, that probably has
had as much effect in destroying the prestige of her nautical
invincibility, supported, as was that prestige, by a vast
existing force, as any other one cause whatever. It was
necessary, to witness the feeling of hatred and resentment
that was raised by the practice of this despotic power, more
especially among those who felt that their foreign birth ought
at least to have assured them impunity from the abuse, in
order fully to appreciate what might so readily become its
consequences. Ithuel Bolt, the seaman just mentioned, was
a proof, in a small way, of the harm that even an
insignificant
individual can effect, when his mind is fully and wholly
bent on revenge. Ghita knew him well; and, although she
little liked either his character or his appearance, she had
often been obliged to smile at the narrative of the deceptions
he practised on the English, and of the thousand low
inventions
he had devised to do them injury. She was not slow,
now, to imagine that his agency had not been trifling in
carrying on the present fraud.
You do not openly call your lugger le Feu-Follet,
Raoul
;
she answered, after a minute's pause; that would
be a dangerous name to utter, even in Porto Ferrajo. It is
not a week since I heard a mariner dwelling on her
misdeeds
,
and the reasons that all good Italians have to detest
her. It is fortunate the man is away, or he could not fail
to know you.
Of that I am not so certain, Ghita. We alter our paint
often, and, at need, can alter our rig. You may be certain,
however, that we hide our Jack-o'Lantern, and sail under
another name. The lugger, now she is in the English
service
,
is called the Ving-And-Ving.
I heard the answer given to the hail from the shore, but
it sounded different from this.
Non  Ving-And-Ving. Ithuel answered for us, and
you may be sure he can speak his own tongue.
Ving-And-Ving
is the word, and he pronounces it as I do.
Ving-y-Ving! repeated Ghita, in her pretty Italian
tones, dropping naturally into the vice-governatore's fault of
pronunciation  it is an odd name, and I like it less than
Feu-Follet.
I wish, dearest Ghita, I could persuade you to like the
name of Yvard, rejoined the young man, in a
half-reproachful
,
half-tender manner, and I should care nothing for any
other. You accuse me of disrespect for priests; but no son
could ever kneel to a father for his blessing, half so readily,
or half so devoutly, as I could kneel with thee, before any
friar in Italy, to receive that nuptial benediction which I
have so often asked at your hand, but which you have so
constantly and so cruelly refused.
I am afraid the name would not then be Feu-Follet, but
Ghita-Folie, said the girl, laughing, though she felt a bitter
pang at the heart, that cost her an effort to control;  no
more of this now, Raoul; we may be observed, and watched;
it is necessary that we separate.
A hurried conversation, of more interest to the young
couple themselves, than it would prove to the reader, though
it might not have been wholly without the latter, but which
it would be premature to relate, now followed, when Ghita
left Raoul on the hill, insisting that she knew the town too
well to have any apprehensions about threading its narrow
and steep streets, at any hour, by herself. This much, in
sooth, must be said in favour of Andrea Barrofaldi's
administration
of justice; he had made it safe for the gentle, the
feeble and the poor, equally, to move about the island by
day or by night; it seldom happening that so great an enemy
to peace and tranquillity appeared among his simple
dependants
,
as was the fact at this precise moment.
In the mean time, there was not quite as much tranquillity
in Porto Ferrajo, as the profound silence which reigned in
the place might have induced a stranger to imagine.
Tommaso
Tonti was a man of influence, within his sphere, as
well as the vice-governatore; and having parted from Vito
Viti, as has been related, he sought the little
clientelle
of
padroni and piloti, who were in the habit of listening to his
opinions as if they were oracles. The usual place of resort
of this set, after dark, was a certain house kept by a widow
of the name of Benedetta Galopo, the uses of which were
plainly enough indicated by a small bush that hung dangling
from a short pole, fastened above the door. If Benedetta
knew anything of the proverb, that good wine needs no
bush, she had not sufficient faith in the contents of her own
casks, to trust their reputation; for this bush of hers was as
regularly renewed, as its withering leaves required. Indeed,
it was a common remark, among her customers, that her
bush was always as fresh as her face, and that the latter
was one of the most comely that was to be met with on the
island; a circumstance that aided much indifferent wine, in
finding a market. Benedetta bore a reasonably good name,
nevertheless, though it was oftener felt, perhaps, than said,
that she was a confirmed coquette. She tolerated 'Maso
principally on two accounts; because, if he were old and
unattractive in his own person, many of his followers were
among the smartest seamen of the port, and because he not
only drank his full proportion, but paid with punctuality.
These inducements rendered the pilot always a welcome
guest at La Santa Maria Degli Venti, as the house was called,
though it had no other sign than the often-renewed bush,
already mentioned.
At the very moment, then, when Raoul Yvard and Ghita
parted on the hill, 'Maso was seated in his usual place, at
the table in Benedetta's upper room, the windows of which
commanded as full a view of the lugger as the hour
permitted
;
that craft being anchored about a cable's length distant,
and, as a sailor might have expressed it, just abeam. On
this occasion he had selected the upper room, and but three
companions, because it was his wish that as few should
enter into his counsels, as at all comported with the love of
homage to his own experience. The party had been
assembled
a quarter of an hour, and there had been time to cause
the tide to ebb materially in the flask, which it may be well
to tell the reader at once, contained very little less than half
a gallon of liquor, such as it was.
I have told it all to the podest, said 'Maso, with an
important manner, as he put down his glass, after potation
the second, which quite equalled potation the first, in
quantity
;
yes, I have told it all to Vito Viti, and no doubt he
has told it to Il Signor Vice-governatore, who now knows as
much about the whole matter as either of us four. Cospetto!
to think such a thing dare happen in a haven like Porto
Ferrajo! Had it come to pass over on the other side of the
island, at Porto Longone, one wouldn't think so much of it,
for
they
are never much on the look-out; but, to take place
here, in the very capital of Elba, I should as soon have
expected it in Livorno!
But, 'Maso, put in Daniele Bruno, in the manner of one
who was a little sceptical, I have often seen the pavilion
of the Inglese, and this is as much like that which all their
frigates and corvettes wear, as one of our feluccas is like
another. The flag, at least, is right.
What signifies a flag, Daniele, when a French hand can
hoist an English ensign as easily as the king of Inghilterra,
himself? If that lugger was not built by the Francese, you
were not built by an Italian father and mother. But, I
should not think so much of the hull, for that may have been
captured, as the English take many of their enemies on the
high seas; but look at the rigging and sailsSanta Maria!
I could go to the shop of the very sail-maker, in Marseilles,
who made that foresail! His name is Pierre Benoit, and a
very good workman he is, as all will allow who have had
occasion to employ him.
This particularity greatly aided the argument; common
minds being seldom above yielding to the circumstances
which are so often made to corroborate imaginary facts.
Tommaso Tonti, though so near the truth as to his main point
the character of the visiterwas singularly out as to the
sail, notwithstanding; le Feu-Follet having been built,
equipped, and manned at Nantes, and Pierre Benoit never
having seen her or her foresail either; but, it mattered not,
in the way of discussion and assertion, one sail-maker being
as good as another, provided he was French.
And have you mentioned this to the podest?
inquired
Benedetta, who stood with the empty flask in her
hand, listening to the discourse; I should think that sail
would open his eyes.
I cannot say I have; but then I told him so many other
things, more to the point, that he cannot do less than believe
this, when he hears it. Signor Viti promised to meet me
here, after he has had a conversation with the
vice-governatore
;
and we may now expect him every minute.
Il Signor Podest will be welcome, said Benedetta,
wiping off a spare table, and bustling round the room to
make things look a little smarter than they ordinarily did;
he may frequent grander wine-houses than this, but he
will hardly find better liquor.
Poverina!Don't think that the podest comes here on
any such errand; he comes to meet
me;
answered 'Maso,
with an indulgent smile; he takes his wine too often on
the heights, to wish to come as low as this after a glass.
Friends of mine (
amigi mii
), there is wine up at that house,
that, when the oil is once out of the neck of the flask,
[3]
[3]
It is a practice of Tuscany, to put a few drops of oil in the neck
of each flask of the more delicate wines, to exclude the air.
goes
down a man's throat as smoothly as if it were all oil itself!
I could drink a flask of it without once stopping to take
breath. It is that liquor which makes the nobles so light
and airy.
I know the washy stuff, put in Benedetta, with more
warmth than she was used to betray to her customers;
well may you call it smooth, a good spring running near
each of the wine-presses that have made it. I have seen
some of it that even oil would not float on!
This assertion was a fair counterpoise to that of the sail,
being about as true. But Benedetta had too much
experience
in the inconstancy of men, not to be aware that if the
three or four customers who were present, should seriously
take up the notion that the island contained any better liquor
than that she habitually placed before them, her value might
be sensibly diminished, in their eyes. As became a
woman
who had to struggle singly with the world, too, her
native shrewdness taught her, that the best moment to refute
a calumny was to stop it as soon as it began to circulate,
and her answer was as warm in manner, as it was positive
in terms. This was an excellent opening for an animated
discussion, and one would have been very likely to occur,
had there not fortunately been steps heard without, that
induced 'Maso to expect the podest. Sure enough, the door
opened, and Vito Viti appeared, followed, to the astonishment
of all the guests, and to the absolute awe of Benedetta, by
the vice-governatore himself.
The solution of this unexpected visit is very easily given.
After the departure of the Capitano Smees, Vito Viti returned
to the subject of 'Maso's suspicions, and by suggesting
certain
little circumstances in the mariner's manner, that he had
noted during the interview, he so far succeeded in making
an impression on himself, that, in the end, his own distrust
revived, and with it that of the deputy-governor. Neither,
however, could be said to be more than uneasy, and the
podest happening to mention his appointment with the pilot,
Andrea determined to accompany him, in order to
reconnoitre
the strange craft in person. Both the functionaries
wore their cloaks, by no means an unusual thing in the cool
night air of the coast, even in midsummer, which served
them for all the disguise that circumstances required.
Il Signor Vice-governatore! almost gasped Benedetta,
dusting a chair, and then the table, and disposing of the
former near the latter by a sort of mechanical process, as if
only one errand could ever bring a guest within her doors;
your eccellenza is most welcome; and it is an honour I
could oftener ask. We are humble people, down here at the
water side, but I hope we are just as good Christians as if
we lived upon the hill.
Doubt it not, worthy Bettina
My name is Benedetta, at your eccellenza's command
Benedettina, if it please the vice-governatore; but not Bettina.
We think much of our names, down here at the water side,
eccellenza.
Let it be so, then, good Benedetta, and I make no doubt
you are excellent Christians.  A flask of your wine, if it
be convenient.
The woman dropped a curtsy that was full of gratitude;
and the glance of triumph that she cast at her other guests,
may be said to have terminated the discussion that was about
to commence, as the dignitaries appeared. It disposed of
the question of the wine at once, and for ever silenced
cavilling
.
If the vice-governatore could drink her liquor, what
mariner would henceforth dare calumniate it?
Eccellenza, with a thousand welcomes, Benedetta
continued
,
as she placed the flask on the table, after having
carefully removed the cotton and the oil with her own plump
hand; this being one of half-a-dozen flasks of really sound,
well-flavoured, Tuscan liquor, that she kept for especial
occasions; as she well might, the cost being only a paul, or
ten cents for near half a gallon; Eccellenza, a million
times welcome. This is an honour that don't befall the
Santa Maria Degli Venti more than once in a century; and
you, too, Signor Podest, once before, only, have you ever
had leisure to darken my poor door.
We bachelors  the podest, as well as the
vice-governor
,
belonged to the fraternitywe bachelors are afraid to
trust ourselves too often in the company of sprightly widows,
Vol. I  5
like yourself, whose beauty has rather improved than
lessened
,
by a few years.
This brought a coquettish answer, during which time
Andrea Barrofaldi, having first satisfied himself that the
wine might be swallowed with impunity, was occupied in
surveying the party of silent and humble mariners, who
were seated at the other table. His object was to ascertain
how far he might have committed himself, by appearing in
such a place, when his visit could not well be attributed to
more than one motive. 'Maso he knew, as the oldest pilot
of the place; and he had also some knowledge of Daniele
Bruno, but the three other seamen were strangers to him.
Inquire if we are among friends, here, and worthy
subjects
of the Grand Duke, all; observed Andrea to Vito
Viti, in a low voice.
Thou hearest, 'Maso, observed the podest; canst
thou answer for all of thy companions?
Every one of them, Signore; this is Daniele Bruno,
whose father was killed in a battle with the Algerines, and
whose mother was the daughter of a mariner, as well known
in Elba, as
Never mind the particulars, Tommaso Tonti, interrupted
the vice-governatore  it is sufficient that thou knowest
all thy companions to be honest men, and faithful servants
of the
sovrano
. You all know, most probably, the errand
which has brought the Signor Viti and myself to this house,
to-night?
The men looked at each other, as the ill-instructed are
apt to do, when it becomes necessary to answer a question
that concerns many; assisting the workings of their minds,
as it might be, with the aid of the senses; and then Daniele
Bruno took on himself the office of spokesman.
Signore, vostro eccellenza, we think we do, answered
the man. Our fellow, 'Maso here, has given us to
understand
that he suspects the Inglese that is anchored in the
bay, to be no Inglese at all, but either a pirate or a
Frenchman
.
The blessed Maria preserve us! but in these troubled
times it does not make much difference which.
I will not say as much as that, friend, for one would be
an outcast among all people, while the other would have the
rights which shield the servants of civilized nations;
returned
the scrupulous and just-minded functionary. The
time was when His Imperial Majesty, the emperor, and his
illustrious brother, our sovereign, the Grand Duke, did not
allow that the republican government of France was a
lawful
government; but the fortune of war removed his scruples,
and a treaty of peace has allowed the contrary. Since the
late alliance, it is our duty to consider all Frenchmen as
enemies, though it by no means follows that we are to
consider
them as pirates.
But their corsairs seize all our craft, Signore, and treat
their people as if they were no better than dogs: then, they
tell me that they are not Christiansno, not even
Luterani
,
or heretics!
That religion does not flourish among them, is true,
answered Andrea, who loved so well to discourse on such
subjects, that he would have stopped to reason on religion
or manners, with the beggar to whom he gave a pittance,
did he only meet with encouragement; but it is not as bad
in France, on this important head, as it has been; and we
may hope that there will be further improvement, in due
time.
But, Signor Vice-governatore, put in 'Maso, these
people have treated the holy father, and his states, in a way
that one would not treat an Infidel or a Turk!
Ay, that is it, Signori, observed Benedetta  a poor
woman cannot go to mass without having her mind disturbed
by the thoughts of the wrongs done the head of the church.
Had these things come from Luterani, it might have been
borne, but they say the Francese were once all good
Catholics
!
So were the Luterani, bella Benedetta, to their chief
schismatic and leader, the German monk himself.
This piece of information caused great surprise, even the
podest himself turning an inquiring glance at his superior,
as much as to acknowledge his own wonder that a
Protestant
should ever have been anything but a Protestant  or
rather, a Lutheran, anything but a Lutheran  the word
Protestant being too significant to be in favour among those
who deny there were any just grounds for a protest at all.
That Luther had ever been a Romanist, was perfectly
wonderful
,
even in the eyes of Vito Viti.
Signore, you would hardly mislead these honest people,
in a matter as grave as this! exclaimed the podest.
I do but tell you truth; and one of these days you shall
hear the whole story, neighbour Viti. 'Tis worth an hour
of leisure, to any man, and is very consoling and useful to
a Christian. But who have you below, Benedetta  I hear
steps on the stairs, and wish not to be seen.
The widow stepped promptly forward to meet her new
guests, and to show them into a commoner room, below
stairs, when her movement was anticipated by the door's
opening, and a man's standing on the threshold. It was now
too late to prevent the intrusion, and a little surprise at the
appearance of the new-comer, held all mute and observant
for a minute.
The person who had followed his ears, and thus reached
the sanctum sanctorum of Benedetta, was no other than
Ithuel Bolt, the American seaman, already named in the
earlier part of this chapter. He was backed by a Genoese,
who had come in the double capacity of interpreter and boon
companion. That the reader may the better understand the
character he has to deal with, however, it may be necessary
to digress, by giving a short account of the history,
appearance
and peculiarities of the former individual.
Ithuel Bolt was a native of what, in this great Union, is
called the granite state. Notwithstanding he was not
absolutely
made of the stone in question, there was an absence
of the ordinary symptoms of natural feeling about him, that
had induced many of his French acquaintances in particular
to affirm that there was a good deal more of marble in his
moral temperament, at least, than usually fell to the lot of
human beings. He had the outline of a good frame, but it
was miserably deficient in the filling up. The bone
predominated
;
the sinews came next in consideration; nor was
the man without a proper share of muscle; but this last was
so disposed of as to present nothing but angles, whichever
way he was viewed. Even his thumbs and fingers were
nearer square than round, and his very neck, which was
bare, though a black silk kerchief was tied loosely round the
throat, had a sort of pentagon look about it, that defied all
symmetry or grace. His stature was just six feet and an
inch, when he straightened himself; as he did from time to
time, seemingly with a desire to relieve a very inveterate
stoop in his shoulders; though it was an inch or two less in
the position he most affected. His hair was dark, and his
skin had got several coats of confirmed brown on it, by
exposure
,
though originally rather fair, while the features were
good, the forehead being broad and full, and the mouth
positively handsome. This singular countenance was
illuminated
by two keen, restless, whitish eyes, that resembled,
not spots on the sun, but rather suns on a spot.
Ithuel had gone through all the ordinary vicissitudes of
an American life, beneath those pursuits which are
commonly
thought to be confined to the class of gentlemen. He
had been farmer's boy, printer's devil, schoolmaster,
stage-driver
,
and tin-pedlar, before he ever saw the sea. In the
way of what he called chores, too, he had practised all
the known devices of rustic domestic economy; having
assisted even in the washing and house-cleaning, besides
having passed the evenings of an entire winter in making
brooms.
Ithuel had reached his thirtieth year before he dreamed
of going to sea. An accident, then, put preferment in this
form before his eyes, and he engaged as the mate of a small
coaster, on his very first voyage. Fortunately, the master
never found out his deficiencies, for Ithuel had a
self-possessed
,
confident way with him, that prevented discovery,
until they were outside of the port from which they sailed,
when the former was knocked overboard by the main boom,
and drowned. Most men, so circumstanced, would have
returned, but Bolt never laid his hand to the plough and
looked back. Besides, one course was quite as easy to him
as another. Whatever he undertook he usually completed,
in some fashion or other, though it were often much better
had it never been attempted. Fortunately it was summer,
the wind was fair, and the crew wanted little ordering; and
as it was quite a matter of course to steer in the right direction,
until the schooner was carried safely into her proper port,
she arrived safely; her people swearing that the new mate
was the easiest and
cleverest
officer they had ever sailed
with. And well they might, for Ithuel took care not to issue
an order, until he had heard it suggested in terms by one
of the hands, and then he never failed to repeat it, word for
5 *
word, as if it were a suggestion of his own. As for the
reputation of cleverest officer, which he so easily obtained,
it will be understood, of course, that the term was used in
the provincial signification that is so common in the part of
the world from which Ithuel came. He was clever in
this sense, precisely in proportion as he was ignorant. His
success, on this occasion, gained him friends, and he was
immediately sent out again as the regular master of the
craft, in which he had so unexpectedly received his
promotion
.
He now threw all the duty on the mate; but so ready
was he in acquiring, that, by the end of six months, he was
a much better sailor than most Europeans would have made
in three years. As the pitcher that goes too often to the
well is finally broken, so did Ithuel meet with shipwreck, at
last, in consequence of gross ignorance on the subject of
navigation. This induced him to try a long voyage, in a
more subordinate situation, until, in the course of time, he
was impressed by the commander of an English frigate, who
had lost so many of his men by the yellow fever, that he
seized upon all he could lay his hands on, to supply their
places, even Ithuel being acceptable in such a strait.
CHAPTER IV.
The ship is here put in,
A Veronese; Michael Cassio,
Lieutenant to the warlike Moor Othello,
Is come on shore:
Othello
.
The
glance which Ithuel cast around him was brief, but
comprehensive. He saw that two of the party in the room
were much superior to the other four, and that the last were
common Mediterranean mariners. The position which
Benedetta occupied in the household could not be mistaken,
for she proclaimed herself its mistress by her very air;
whether
it were in the upper or in the lower room.
Vino, said Ithuel, with a flourish of the hand, to help
along his Italian, this and one or two more being the only
words of the language he ventured to use directly, or
without
calling in the assistance of his interpreter; vino
vino, vino, Signora.
Si, si, si, Signore, answered Benedetta, laughing, and
this with her meaning eyes so keenly riveted on the person
of her new guest, as to make it very questionable whether
she were amused by anything but his appearance; your
eccellenza shall be served; but whether at a paul, or a
half-paul
the flask, depends on your own pleasure. We keep
wine at both prices, and, glancing towards the table of
Andrea Barrofaldi, usually serve the first to signori of
rank and distinction.
What does the woman say? growled Ithuel to his
interpreter, a Genoese, who from having served several
years in the British navy, spoke English with a very
tolerable
facility  you know what we want, and just tell her
to hand it over, and I will fork out her St. Paul, without
more words. What a desperate liking your folks have for
saints, Philip-o, for so Ithuel pronounced Filippo, the name
of his companion  what a desperate liking your folks
have for saints, Philip-o, that they must even call their
money after them.
It not so in America, Signor Bolto? asked the Genoese,
after he had explained his wishes to Benedetta, in Italian;
it no ze fashion in your country to honour ze saints?
Honour the saints! repeated Ithuel, looking curiously
around him, as he took a seat at a third table, shoving aside
the glasses at the same time, and otherwise disposing of
every thing within reach of his hand, so as to suit his own
notions of order, and then leaning back on his chair until
the two ends of the uprights dug into the plaster behind him,
while the legs on which the fabric was poised cracked with
his weight; honour the saints! we should be much more
like to dishonour them! What does any one want to honour
a saint for? A saint is but a human  a man like you and
me, after all the fuss you make about 'em.  Saints abound
in my country, if you 'd believe people's account of
themselves
.
Not quite so, Signor Bolto. You and me no great saint,
Italian honour saint because he holy and good.
By this time Ithuel had got his two feet on the round of
his seat, his knees spread so as to occupy as much space
as an unusual length of leg would permit, and his arms
extended on the tops of two chairs, one on each side of him,
in a way to resemble what is termed a spread eagle.
Andrea Barrofaldi regarded all this with wonder. It is
true, he expected to meet with no great refinement in a
wine-house like that of Benedetta's; but he was unaccustomed
to see such nonchalance of manner in a man of the stranger's
class; or, indeed, of any class; the Italian mariners present
occupying their chairs in simple and respectful attitudes, as
if each man had the wish to be as little obtrusive as possible.
Still he let no sign of his surprise escape him, noting all that
passed in a grave but attentive silence. Perhaps he saw
traces of national peculiarities, if not of national history, in
the circumstances.
Honour saint because he holy and good! said Ithuel,
with a very ill-concealed disdain  why, that is the very
reason why we
don't
honour 'em. When you honour a
holy man, mankind may consait you do it on that very
account, and so fall into the notion you worship him, which
would be idolatry, the awfullest of all sins, and the one to
which every ra'al Christian gives the widest bairth. I would
rayther worship this flask of wine, any day, than worship
the best saint on your parson's books.
As Filippo was no casuist, but merely a believer, and
Ithuel applied the end of the flask to his mouth, at that
moment
,
from an old habit of drinking out of jugs and bottles,
the Genoese made no answer; keeping his eyes on the
flask, which, by the length of time it remained at the other's
mouth, appeared to be in great danger of being exhausted;
a matter of some moment to one of his own relish for the
liquor.
Do you call
this
wine! exclaimed Ithuel, when he
stopped, literally to take breath; there isn't as much true
granite in a gallon on 't, as in a pint of our cider. I could
swallow a butt, and then walk a plank as narrow as your
religion, Philip-o!
This was said, nevertheless, with a look of happiness
which proved how much the inward man was consoled by
what it had received, and a richness of expression about the
handsome mouth, that denoted a sort of consciousness that
it had been the channel of a most agreeable communication
to the stomach. Sooth to say, Benedetta had brought up a
flask at a paul, or at about four cents a bottle; a flask of the
very quality which she had put before the vice-governatore;
and this was a liquor that flowed so smoothly over the
palate, and of a quality so really delicate, that Ithuel was by
no means aware of the potency of the guest which he had
admitted to his interior.
All this time the vice-governatore was making up his
mind concerning the nation and character of the stranger.
That he should mistake Bolt for an Englishman, was
natural
enough, and the fact had an influence in again unsettling
his opinion as to the real flag under which the lugger sailed.
Like most Italians of that day, he regarded all the families
of the northern hordes as a species of barbarians; an
opinion
that the air and deportment of Ithuel had no direct
agency in changing; for, while this singular being was not
brawlingly rude and vulgar, like the coarser set of his own
countrymen, with whom he had occasionally been brought
in contact, he was so manifestly uncivilized, in many
material
points, as to put his claim to gentility much beyond a
cavil, and that in a negative way.
You are a Genoese? said Andrea to Filippo, speaking
with the authority of one who had a right to question.
Signore, I am, at your eccellenza's orders, though in
foreign service at this present moment.
In what service, friend? I am in authority, here in
Elba, and ask no more than is my duty.
Eccellenza, I can well believe this, answered Filippo,
rising and making a respectful salutation; and one, too, that
was without any of the awkwardness of the same act in a
more northern man, as it is to be seen in your appearance.
I am now in the service of the king of England.
Filippo said this steadily, though his eyes dropped to the
floor, under the searching scrutiny they endured. The
answer of the vice-governatore was delivered coolly, though
it was much to the point.
You are happy, he said, in getting so honourable
masters; more especially as your own country has again
fallen into the hands of the French. Every Italian heart
must yearn for a government that has its existence and its
motives on this side of the Alps.
Signore, we are a republic to-day, and ever have been,
you know.
Ay  such as it is. But your companion speaks no
Italian  he is an Inglese?
No, Signorean Americano: a sort of an Inglese, and
yet no Inglese, after all. He loves England very little, if
I can judge by his discourse.
Un' Americano! repeated Andrea Barrofaldi;
Americano
!
exclaimed Vito Viti; Americano! said each of
the mariners in succession, all eyes turning with lively
curiosity towards the subject of the discourse, who bore it
all with appropriate steadiness and dignity. The reader is
not to be surprised that an American was then regarded
with curiosity, in a country like Italy; for, two years later,
when an American ship of war anchored suddenly before
the town of Constantinople, and announced her nation, the
authorities of the Sublime Porte were ignorant that such a
country existed. It is true, Leghorn was beginning to be
much frequented by American ships, in the year 1799; but
even with these evidences before their eyes, the people of
the very ports into which these traders entered, were
accustomed
to consider their crews a species of Englishmen, who
managed to sail the vessels for the negroes at home.
[4]
[4]
As recently as 1828, the author of this book was at Leghorn.
The Delaware, 80, had just left there; and speaking of her appearance
to a native of the place, who supposed the writer to be an Englishman,
the latter observed  Of course, her people were all blacks. I
thought so, too, signore, until I went on board the ship, was the
answer
;
but they are as white as you and I are.
In a
word, two centuries and a half of national existence, and
more than half a century of national independence, have not
yet sufficed to teach all the inhabitants of the old world, that
the great modern Republic is peopled by men of a European
origin, and possessing white skins. Even of those who are
aware of the fact, the larger proportion, perhaps, have
obtained
their information through works of a light character,
similar to this of our own, rather than by the more
legitimate
course of regular study, and a knowledge of history.
Si, repeated Ithuel, with emphasis, as soon as he heard
his nationality thus alluded to, and found all eyes on himself
Si, oon AmericanoI'm not ashamed of my country; and
if you're any way partic'lar in such matters, I come from
New Hampshireor, what we call the Granite State. Tell
'em this, Philip-o, and let me know their idees, in answer.
Filippo translated this speech, as well as he could, as he
did the reply; and it may as well be stated here, once for
all, that in the dialogue which succeeded, the instrumentality
of this interpreter was necessary that the parties might
understand each other. The reader will, therefore, give
Filippo credit for this arrangement, although we shall
furnish
the different speeches very much as if the parties fully
comprehended what was said.
Uno stato di granito!
repeated the vice-governatore,
looking at the podest with some doubt in the expression of
his countenance  it must be a painful existence which
these poor people endure, to toil for their food in such a
region. Ask him, good Filippo, if they have any wine in
his part of the world.
Wine! echoed Ithuel; tell the Signore that we
shouldn't call this stuff wine at all. Nothing goes down our
throats that doesn't rasp like a file, and burn like a chip out
of Vesuvius. I wish, now, we had a drink of New England
rum here, in order to show him the difference. I despise
the man who thinks all his own things the best, just because
they're his'n; but taste
is
taste, a'ter all, and there's no
denying it.
Perhaps the Signor Americano can give us an insight
into the religion of his country  or are the Americani
pagans
?
I do not remember, Vito, to have read anything of
the religion of that quarter of the world.
Religion, too!  well a question like this, now, would
make a stir among our folks in New Hampshire! Look
here, Signore; we don't call your ceremonies, and images,
and robes, and ringing of bells, and bowing and scraping, a
religion at all; any more than we should call this smooth
liquor, wine.
Ithuel was more under the influence of this smooth liquor
than he was aware of, or he would not have been so loud in
the expression of his dissent; as experience had taught him
the necessity of reserve on such subjects, in most Catholic
communities. But of all this the Signor Barrofaldi was
ignorant
,
and he made his answer with the severity of a good
Catholic, though it was with the temper of a gentleman.
What the Americano calls our ceremonies, and images,
and ringing of bells, are probably not understood by him,
he said; since a country as little civilized as his own,
cannot very well comprehend the mysteries of a profound
and ancient religion.
Civilized! I calculate that it would
stump
this part of
the world to produce such a civilization as our very
youngest
children are brought up on. But it's of no use
talking
,
and so we will
drink
.
Andrea perceiving, indeed, that there was not much use
in
talking
, more especially as Filippo had been a good deal
mystified by the word
stump
, was now disposed to
abandon
the idea of a dissertation on religion, manners and
laws, to come at once to the matter that brought him into
the present company.
This Americano is also a servant of the English king, it
would seem, he carelessly remarked: I remember to have
heard that there was a war between his country and that of
the Inglesi, in which the French assisted the Americani to
obtain a sort of a national independence. What that
independence
is, I do not know; but it is probable that the people
of the New World are still obliged to find mariners to serve
in the navy of their former masters.
Ithuel's muscles twitched, and an expression of intense
bitterness darkened his countenance. Then he smiled in a
sort of derision, and gave vent to his feelings in words.
Perhaps you're right, Signore; perhaps this is the ra'al
truth of the matter; for the British
do
take our people, just
the same as if they had the best right in the world to 'em.
A'ter all, we
may
be serving our masters; and all we say
and think at home, about independence, is just a flash in the
pan! Notwithstanding, some on us contrive, by hook or
by crook, to take our revenge, when occasion offers; and
if I don't sarve Master John Bull an ill turn, whenever luck
throws a chance in my way, may I never see a bit of the
old State again  granite or rotten wood.
This speech was not very closely translated, but enough
was said to awaken curiosity in the vice-governatore, who
thought it odd one who served among the English should
entertain such feelings towards them. As for Ithuel, himself,
he had not observed his usual caution; but, unknown to
himself
,
the oily wine had more granite in it than he imagined,
and then he seldom spoke of the abuse of impressment
without
losing more or less of his ordinary self-command.
Ask the Americano when he first entered into the service
of the king of Inghilterra, said Andrea, and why he stays
in it, if it is unpleasant to him, when so many opportunities
of quitting it offer?
I never entered, returned Ithuel, taking the word in its
technical meaning; they pressed me, as if I had been a
dog they wanted to turn a spit, and kept me seven long
years, fighting their accursed battles, and otherwise sarving
their eends. I was over here, last year, at the mouth of the
Nile, in that pretty bit of workand off Cape St. Vincent,
tooand in a dozen more of their battles, and sorely against
my will, on every account. This was hard to be borne, but
the hardest of it has not yet been said; nor do I know that
I shall tell on't at all.
Anything the Americano may think proper to relate,
will be listened to with pleasure.
Ithuel was a good deal undecided whether to go on, or
not; but taking a fresh pull at the flask, it warmed his
feelings
to the sticking point.
Why, it was adding insult to injury. It's bad enough
to injure a man, but when it comes to insulting him into the
bargain, there must be but little grit in his natur', if it don't
strike fire.
And yet few are wronged who are not calumniated,
observed the philosophical vice-governatore. This is only
too much the case with our Italy, worthy neighbour, Vito
Viti.
I calculate the English treat all mankind alike, whether
it's in Italy or Ameriky, for so Ithuel would pronounce
this word, notwithstanding he had now been cruising in and
near the Mediterranean several years; but what I found
hardest to be borne, was their running their rigs on me
about my language and ways, which they were all the time
laughing at as Yankee conversation and usages, while they
pretended that the body out of which all on it come, was an
Vol. I.  6
English body, and so they set it up to be shot at, by any of
their inimies that might happen to be jogging along our road.
Then, squire, it is generally consaited among us in Ameriky,
that we speak much the best English a-going; and sure am
I, that none on us call a `hog,' an `'og,' an `anchor,' a
`hanchor,' or a `horse,' an `'orse.' What is thought of
that matter in this part of the world, Signor Squire?
We are not critics in your language, but it is reasonable
to suppose that the English speak their own tongue better
than any other people. That much must be conceded to
them, at least, Signor Bolto.
I shall acknowledge no such advantage as belonging to
them. I have not been to school for nothing, not I. The
English call c-l-e-r-k, clark; and c-u-c-u-m-b-e-r,
cowcumber
;
an a-n-g-e-l, aingel; and no reasoning can convince
me that's right. I've got a string of words, of this sort,
that they pronounce out of all reason, that's as long as a
pair of leading-lines, or a ship's tiller-rope. You must
know, Signor Squire, I kept school, in the early part of my
life.
Non e possibile!
exclaimed the vice-governatore,
astonishment actually getting the better of his habitual good
breeding; you must mean, Signor Americano, that you
gave lessons in the art of rigging and sailing luggers.
You never was more mistaken, Signore. I taught, on
the general system, all sorts of things in the edication way;
and had one of my scholars made such a blunder as to say,
`clark,' or `aingel,' or `harth,' or `cowcumber,' he wouldn't
have heard the last of it, for that week, at least. But I
despise an Englishman, from the very bottom of my soul;
for heart isn't deep enough for my feelings.
Absurd as Ithuel's critical dissertations must appear to all
who have any familiarity with real English, they were not
greatly below many criticisms on the same subject that often
illustrate the ephemeral literature of the country; and, in his
last speech, he had made a provincial use of the word
despise
,
that is getting to be so common, as almost to
supplant
the true signification. By despising, Ithuel meant
that he hated; the passion, perhaps, of all others, the
most removed from the feeling described by the word he
had used, inasmuch as it is not easy to elevate those for
whom we have a contempt, to the level necessary to be
hated.
Notwithstanding, the Inglese are not a despicable
people, answered Andrea, who was obliged to take the
stranger literally, since he knew nothing of his provincial
use of terms; for a nation of the north, they have done
marvellous things, of late years, especially on the ocean.
This was more than Ithuel could bear. All his personal
wrongs, and sooth to say they had been of a most grievous
nature, arose before his mind, incited and inflamed by
national dislike; and he broke out in such an incoherent
tirade of abuse, as completely set all Filippo's knowledge
of English at fault, rendering a translation impossible. By
this time, Ithuel had swallowed so much of the wine, a liquor
which had far more body than he supposed, that he was ripe
for mischief, and it was only his extreme violence that
prevented
him from betraying more, than, just at the moment,
would have been prudent. The vice-governatore listened
with attention, in the hope of catching something useful; but
it all came to his ears a confused mass of incoherent
vituperation
,
from which he could extract nothing. The scene,
consequently, soon became unpleasant, and Andrea
Barrofaldi
took measures to put an end to it. Watching a
favourable
occasion to speak, he put in a word, as the excited
Bolt paused an instant, to take breath.
Signore, observed the vice-governatore, all this may
be very true; but as coming from one who serves the
Inglese
,
to one who is the servant of their ally, the Grand
Duke of Tuscany, it is quite as extraordinary as it is
uncalled
for; and we will talk of other things. This lugger,
on board which you sail, is out of all question English,
notwithstanding
what you tell us of the nation.
Ay,
she
is English, answered Ithuel, with a grim smile,
and a pretty boat she is. But then it is no fault of hers,
and what can't be cured must be endured. A Guernsey
craft, and a desperate goer, when she wakes up and puts on
her travelling boots.
These mariners have a language of their own,
remarked
Andrea to Vito Viti, smiling as in consideration of
Ithuel's nautical habits; to you and me, the idea of a
vessel's
using boots, neighbour, seems ridiculous; but the
seamen
,
in their imaginations, bestow all sorts of objects on
them. It is curious to hear them converse, good Vito; and
now I am dwelling here on our island, I have often thought
of collecting a number of their images, in order to aid in
illustrating the sort of literature that belongs to their calling.
This idea of a lugger's putting on her boots, is quite heroic!
Now Vito Viti, though an Italian with so musical a name,
was no poet, but a man so very literal, withal, as to render
him exceedingly matter of fact, in most of his notions.
Accordingly, he saw no particular beauty in the idea of a
vessel's wearing boots; and, though much accustomed to
defer to the vice-governatore's superior knowledge, and
more extensive reading, he had the courage, on this
occasion
,
to put in an objection to the probability of the
circumstance
mentioned.
Signor Vice-governatore, he replied, all is not gold
that glitters. Fine words sometimes cover poor thoughts,
and, I take it, this is an instance of what I mean. Long as
I have lived in Porto Ferrajo, and that is now quite fifty
years, seeing that I was born here, and have been off the
island but four times in my life  and long, therefore, as I
have lived here, I never saw a vessel in the harbour that
wore boots, or even shoes.
This is metaphorical, good Vito, and must be looked at
in a poetical point of view. Homer speaks of goddesses
holding shields before their favourite warriors; while Ariosto
makes rats and asses hold discourse together, as if they were
members of an academy. All this is merely the effect of
imagination, Signore; and he who has the most, is the aptest
at inventing circumstances, which, though not strictly true,
are vastly agreeable.
As for Homer and Ariosto, Signor Vice-governatore, I
doubt if either ever saw a vessel with a boot on, or if either
ever knew as much about craft, in general, as we who live
here in Porto Ferrajo. Harkee, friend Filippo, just ask
this Americano if, in his country, he ever saw vessels wear
boots. Put the question plainly, and without any of your
accursed poetry.
Filippo did as desired, leaving Ithuel to put his own
construction
on the object of the inquiry; all that had just
passed being sealed to him, in consequence of its having
been uttered in good Tuscan.
Boots! repeated the native of the granite State, looking
round him drolly; perhaps not exactly the foot-part, and
the soles, for they ought, in reason, to be under water; but
every vessel that isn't coppered shows her boot-
top
of
them
,
I'll swear I've seen ten thousand, more or less.
This answer mystified the vice-governatore, and
completely
puzzled Vito Viti. The grave mariners at the other
table, too, thought it odd, for in no other tongue is the
language
of the sea as poetical, or figurative, as in the English;
and the term of
boot-top
, as applied to a vessel, was Greek
to them, as well as to the other listeners. They conversed
among themselves on the subject, while their two superiors
were holding a secret conference on the other side of the
room, giving the American time to rally his recollection, and
remember the precise circumstances in which not only he
himself, but all his shipmates, were placed. No one could
be more wily and ingenious than this man, when on his
guard, though the inextinguishable hatred with which he
regarded England, and Englishmen, had come so near
causing him to betray a secret which it was extremely
important
,
at that moment, to conceal. At length a general
silence prevailed, the different groups of speakers ceasing to
converse, and all looking towards the vice-governatore, as
if in expectation that he was about to suggest something that
might give a turn to the discourse. Nor was this a mistake,
for, after inquiring of Benedetta if she had a private room,
he invited Ithuel and the interpreter to follow him into it,
leading the way, attended by the podest. As soon as these
four were thus separated from the others, the door was
closed, and the two Tuscans came at once to the point.
Signor Americano, commenced the vice-governatore,
between those who understand each other, there is little
need of many words. This is a language which is
comprehended
all over the world, and I put it before you in the
plainest manner, that we may have no mistake.
It is tolerable plain, sartain! exclaimed Ithueltwo
foursixeighttenall good-looking gold pieces, that, in
this part of the world you call
zecchini
or sequins, as we
name 'em, in English. What have I done, Signor Squire, or
6 *
what am I to do for these twenty dollars? Name your
tarms; this working in the dark is ag'in the grain of my
natur'.
You are to tell the
truth;
we suspect the lugger of being
French; and by putting the proof in our hands, you will
make us your friends, and serve yourself.
Andrea Barrofaldi knew little of America and Americans,
but he had imbibed the common European notion that money
was the great deity worshipped in this hemisphere, and that
all he had to do was to offer a bribe, in order to purchase a
man of Ithuel's deportment and appearance. In his own
island, ten sequins would buy almost any mariner of the
port, to do any act short of positive legal criminality; and
the idea that a barbarian of the west would refuse such a
sum, in preference to selling his shipmates, never crossed
his mind. Little, however, did the Italian understand the
American. A greater knave than Ithuel, in his own way,
it was not easy to find; but it shocked all his notions of
personal dignity, self-respect, and republican virtue, to be
thus unequivocally offered a bribe; and had the lugger not
been so awkwardly circumstanced, he would have been apt
to bring matters to a crisis, at once, by throwing the gold
into the vice-governatore's face; although, knowing where
it was to be found, he might have set about devising some
means of cheating the owner out of it, at the very next
instant
.
Boon or bribe, directly and unequivocally offered
in the shape of money, as coming from the superior to the
inferior, or from the corrupter to the corrupted, had he never
taken; and it would have appeared, in his eyes, a species
of degradation to receive the first, and of treason to his
nationality, to accept the last, though he would lie, invent,
manage and contrive, from morning till night, in order to
transfer even copper from the pocket of his neighbour to his
own, under the forms of opinion and usage. In a word,
Ithuel, as relates to such things, is what is commonly called
law-honest, with certain broad salvoes, in favour of
smuggling
of all sorts, in foreign countries (at home he never
dreamed of such a thing), custom-house oaths, and legal
trickery; and this is just the class of men apt to declaim the
loudest against the roguery of the rest of manking. Had
there been a law giving half to the informer, he might not
have hesitated to betray the lugger, and all she contained,
more especially in the way of regular business; but he had
long before determined that every Italian was a treacherous
rogue, and not at all to be trusted like an American rogue;
and then his indomitable dislike of England would have kept
him true in a case of much less complicated risk than this.
Commanding himself, however, and regarding the sequins
with natural longing, he answered with a simplicity of
manner
that both surprised and imposed on the vice-governatore.
NonoSignor Squire, he said; in the first place,
I've no secret to tell; and it would be a trickish thing to
touch your money, and not give you its worth in return;
and then the lugger is Guernsey built, and carries a good
King George's commission. In my part of the world, we
never take gold unless we sell something of equal valie.
Gifts and begging we look upon as mean and unbecoming,
and the next thing to going on to the town as a pauper;
though if I can sarve you lawfully, like, I'm just as willing
to work for
your
money, as for that of any other man's.
I've no preference for king's, in that partic'lar.
All this time Ithuel held out the sequins, with a show of
returning them, though in a very reluctant manner, leaving
Andrea, who comprehended his actions much better than
his words, to understand that he declined selling his secret.
You can keep the money, friend, observed the
vice-governatore
,
for when we give, in Italy, it is not our
practice to take the gift back again. In the morning,
perhaps
,
you will remember something that it may be useful
for me to know.
I've no occasion for gifts, nor is it exactly accordin' to
the granite rule to accept 'em, answered Ithuel, a little
sharply. Handsome conduct is handsome conduct; and
I call the fellow-creetur' that would oppress and overcome
another with a gift, little better than an English aristocrat.
Hand out the dollars in the way of trade, in as large
amounts as you will, and I'll find the man, and that, too, in
the lugger, who will see you out in't, to your heart's
content
.
Harkee, Philip-o; tell the gentleman, in an
under-tone
,
like, about the three kegs of tobacco we got out of
the Virginy ship, the day we made the north end of Corsica,
and perhaps that will satisfy him we are not his inimies.
There is no use in bawling it out, so that the woman can
hear what you say, or the men who are drinking in the
other room.
Signor Ithuello, answered the Genoese, in English, it
will no do to let these gentlemen know anything of them
kegsone being the deputy-governor and the other a
magistrate
.
The lugger will be seized for a smuggler, which
will be the next thing to being seized for an enemy.
Yet I've a longing for them 'ere sequins, to tell you the
truth, Philip-o! I see no other means of getting at 'em,
except it be through them three kegs of tobacco.
Why you don't take 'em, when the Signore put 'em
into your very hand? All you do is put him in your pocket,
and say, `Eccellenza, what you please to wish?'
That isn't granite, man, but more in the natur' of you
Italians. The most disgraceful thing on 'airth is a paupe
so Ithuel pronounced pauper  the next is a street
beggar
;
after him comes your chaps who take sixpences and
shillin's, in the way of small gifts; and last of all an
Englishman
.
All these I despise; but let this Signore say but
the word, in the way of trade, and he'll find me as ready
and expairt as he can wish. I'd defy the devil in a trade!
Filippo shook his head, positively declining to do so foolish
a thing as to mention a contraband article to those whose
duty it would be to punish a violation of the revenue laws.
In the meanwhile the sequins remained in the hands of
Andrea
Barrofaldi, who seemed greatly at a loss to understand
the character of the strange being whom chance had thus
thrown in his way. The money was returned to his purse,
but his distrust and doubts were by no means removed.
Answer me one thing, Signor Bolto, asked the
vice-governatore
,
after a minute of thought; if you hate the
English so much, why do you serve in their ships?  why
not quit them, on the first good occasion? The land is as
wide as the sea, and you must be often on it.
I calculate, Signor Squire, you don't often study charts,
or you wouldn't fall into such a consait. There's twice as
much water as solid ground, on this 'airth, to begin with; as
in reason there ought to be, seeing that an acre of good
productive land is worth five or six of oceans; and then you
have little knowledge of my character and prospects to ask
such a question. I sarve the king of England to make him
pay well for it. If you want to take an advantage of a
man, first get him in debt; then you can work your will on
him, in the most profitable and safe manner!
All this was unintelligible to the vice-governatore, who,
after a few more questions and answers, took a civil leave
of the strangers, intimating to Benedetta that they were not
to follow him back into the room he had just quitted.
As for Ithuel, the disappearance of the two gentlemen
gave him no concern; but as he felt that it might be unsafe
to drink any more wine, he threw down his reckoning, and
strolled into the street, followed by his companion. Within
an hour from that moment, the three kegs of tobacco were
in the possession of a shop-keeper of the place, that brief
interval sufficing to enable the man to make his bargain, and
to deliver the articles, which was his real object on shore.
This little smuggling transaction was carried on altogether
without the knowledge of Raoul Yvard, who was to all
intents and purposes the captain of his own lugger, and in
whose character there were many traits of chivalrous honour,
mixed up with habits and pursuits that would not seem to
promise qualities so elevated. But this want of a propensity
to turn a penny in his own way, was not the only
distinguishing
characteristic between the commander of the little
craft, and the being he occasionally used as a mask to his
true purposes.
CHAPTER V.
The great contention of the sea and skies
Parted our fellowship:  But, hark! a sail.
Cassio
.
Whatever
may have been the result of the
vice-governatore's
further inquiries and speculations, that night, they
were not known. After consuming an hour in the lower
part of the town, in and around the port, he and the podest
sought their homes and their pillows, leaving the lugger
riding quietly at her anchor, in the spot where she was last
presented to the reader's attention. If Raoul Yvard and
Ghita had another interview, too, it was so secretly managed
as to escape all observation, and can form no part of this
narrative.
A Mediterranean morning, at midsummer, is one of those
balmy and soothing periods of the day, that affect the mind
as well as the body. Everywhere we have the mellow and
advancing light that precedes the appearance of the sun
the shifting hues of the skythat pearly softness that seems
to have been invented to make us love the works of God's
hand, and the warm glow of the brilliant sun; but, it is not
everywhere that these fascinating changes occur, on a sea
whose blue vies with the darkest depths of the void of space,
beneath a climate that is as winning as the scenes it adorns,
and amid mountains whose faces reflect every varying shade
of light, with the truth and the poetry of nature. Such a
morning as this last, was that which succeeded the night
with which our tale opened, bringing with it the reviving
movements of the port and town. Italy, as a whole, is
remarkable for an appearance of quiet and repose, that are
little known in the more bustling scenes of the greedier
commerce of our own quarter of the world, or, indeed, in
those of most of the northern nations of Europe. There is
in her aspect, modes of living, and even in her habits of
business, an air of decayed gentility, that is wanting to the
ports, shops, and marts of the more vulgar parts of the world;
as if conscious of having been so long the focus of human
refinement, it was unbecoming, in these later days, to throw
aside all traces of her history and power. Man, and the
climate, too, seem in unison; one meeting the cares of life
with a
far niente
manner, that is singularly in accordance
with the dreamy and soothing atmosphere he respires.
Just as day dawned, the fall of a billet of wood, on the
deck of the Feu-Follet, gave the first intimation that any
one was stirring in or near the haven. If there had been a
watch on board that craft, throughout the nightand
doubtless
such had been the case  it had been kept in so quiet
and unobtrusive a manner, as to render it questionable to
the jealous eyes which had been riveted on her from the
shore, until long past midnight. Now, however, everything
was in motion, and in less than five minutes after that billet
of wood had fallen from the hands of the cook, as he was
about to light his galley-fire, the tops of the hats and caps of
some fifty or sixty sailors were seen moving to and fro, just
above the upper edge of the bulwarks. Three minutes later,
and two men appeared near the knight-heads, each with his
arms folded, looking at the vessel's hawse, and taking a
survey of the state of the harbour, and of objects on the
surrounding
shore.
The two individuals who were standing in the conspicuous
position named, were Raoul Yvard, himself, and Ithuel Bolt.
Their conversation was in French, the part borne by the
last being most execrably pronounced, and paying little or
no attention to grammar; but, it is necessary that we should
render what was said by both into the vernacular, with the
peculiarities that belonged to the men.
I see only the Austrian that is worth the trouble of a
movement, quietly observed Raoul, whose eye was
scanning
the inner harbour, his own vessel lying two hundred
yards without it, it will be rememberedand she is light,
and would scarce pay for sending her to Toulon. These
feluccas would embarrass us, without affording much reward,
and then their loss would ruin the poor devils of owners, and
bring misery into many a family.
Well, that's a new idee, for a privateer! said Ithuel
sneeringly; luck's luck, in these matters, and every man
must count on what war turns up. I wish you'd read the
history of
our
revolution, and then you'd ha' seen that
liberty and equality are not to be had without some ups and
downs in fortin's and chances.
The Austrian
might
do, added Raoul, who paid little
attention to his companion's remarks, if he were a streak
or two lower in the waterbut, after all, E-too-
ell
, for so
he pronounced the other's name  I do not like a capture
that is made without any
clat
, or spirit, in the attack and
defence.
Well,  this word Ithuel invariably pronounced,
wa-a-l  well, to my notion, the most profitable and
the most agreeable battles, are the shortest; and the
pleasantest
victories are them in which there's the most prize-money.
Howsever, as that brig is only an Austrian, I care little what
you may detairmine to do with her; was she English, I'd
head a boat myself, to go in and tow her out here, expressly
to have the satisfaction of burning her. English ships make
a cheerful fire!
And that would be a useless waste of property, and
perhaps
of blood, and would do no one any good, Etoo
ell
.
But it would do the accursed English
harm
, and that
counts for a something, in my reckoning. Nelson wasn't so
over-scrupulous, at the Nile, about burning your ships, Mr.
Rule
Tonnre!
why do you always bring in that
malheureux
Nile?Is it not enough that we were beatendisgraced
destroyedthat a friend must tell us of it so often?
You forget, Mr. Rule, that I was an
inimy, then;
returned
Ithuel, with a grin and a grim smile. If you'll
take the trouble to examine my back, you'll find on it the
marks of the lashes I got for just telling my captain that it
went ag'in the grain for me, a republican as I was by idee
and natur', to fight other republicans. He told me he would
first try the grain of my skin, and see how that would agree
with what he called my duty; and I must own, he got the
best on't; I fit like a tiger ag'in you, rather than be flogged
twice the same day. Flogging on a sore back is an awful
argument!
And now has come the hour of revenge,
pauvre Etooell;
this time you are on the right side, and may fight with heart
and mind those you so much hate.
A long and gloomy silence followed, during which Raoul
turned his face aft, and stood looking at the movements of
the men, as they washed the decks, while Ithuel seated
himself
on a knight-head, and, his chin resting on his hand, he
sat ruminating, in bitterness of spirit, like Milton's devil, in
some of his dire cogitations, on the atrocious wrong of
which he had really been the subject. Bodies of men are
proverbially heartless. They commit injustice without
reflection
,
and vindicate their abuses without remorse. And yet
it may be doubtful if either a nation, or an individual, ever
tolerated, or was an accessary in, a wrong, that the act
sooner or later did not recoil on the offending party, through
that mysterious principle of right, which is implanted in the
nature of things, bringing forth its own results as the seed
produces its grain, and the tree its fruits; a supervision of
holiness that it is usual to term (and rightly enough, when
we remember who created principles) the providence of God.
Let that people dread the future, who, in their collected
capacity, systematically encourage injustice of any sort;
since their own eventual demoralization will follow as a
necessary consequence, even though they escape punishment
in a more direct form.
We shall not stop to relate the moody musings of the
New-Hampshire man. Unnurtured, and, in many respects,
unprincipled as he was, he had his clear conceptions of the
injustice of which he had been one, among thousands of
other victims; and, at that moment, he would have held life
itself as a cheap sacrifice, could he have had his fill of
revenge
.
Time and again, while a captive on board the
English ship in which he had been immured for years, had
he meditated the desperate expedient of blowing up the
vessel
;
and had not the means been wanting, mercenary and
selfish as he ordinarily seemed, he was every way equal to
executing so dire a scheme, in order to put an end to the
lives of those who were the agents in wronging him, and his
own sufferings, together. The subject never recurred to his
mind, without momentarily changing the current of its
thoughts, and tinging all his feelings with an intensity of
bitterness that it was painful to bear. At length, sighing
heavily, he rose from the knight-head, and turned towards
the mouth of the bay, as if to conceal from Raoul the
expression
of his countenance. This act, however, was
scarcely done, ere he started, and an exclamation escaped
him, that induced his companion to turn quickly on his heel,
and face the sea. There, indeed, the growing light enabled
both to discover an object that could scarcely be other than
one of interest to men in their situation.
It has been said already, that the deep bay, on the side of
which stands the town of Porto Ferrajo, opens to the north,
looking in the direction of the headland of Piombino. On
the right of the bay, the land, high and broken, stretches
several miles ere it forms what is called the Canal, while on
the left, it terminates with the low bluff on which stands the
residence then occupied by Andrea Barrofaldi; and which
has since become so celebrated as the abode of one far
greater than the worthy vice-governatore. The haven lying
Vol. I  7
under these heights, on the left of the bay, and by the side
of the town, it followed, as a matter of course, that the
anchorage of the lugger was also in this quarter of the bay,
commanding a clear view to the north, in the direction of
the main land, as far as eye could reach. The width of the
Canal, or of the passage between Elba and the Point of
Piombino, may be some six or seven miles; and at the
distance
of less than one mile from the northern end of the
former, stands a small rocky islet, which has since become
known to the world as the spot on which Napoleon stationed
a corporal's guard, by way of taking possession, when he
found his whole empire dwindled to the sea-girt mountains
in its vicinity. With the existence and position of this
island, both Raoul and Ithuel were necessarily acquainted,
for they had seen it and noted its situation the previous
night, though it had escaped their notice that, from the place
where the Feu-Follet had brought up, it was not visible. In
their first look to seaward, that morning, which was ere the
light had grown sufficiently strong to render the houses on
the opposite side of the bay distinct, an object had been seen
in this quarter, which had then been mistaken for the rock;
but, by this time, the light was strong enough to show that
it was a very different thing. In a word, that which both
Raoul and Ithuel had fancied an islet, was neither more nor
less than a ship.
The stranger's head was to the northward, and his
motion
,
before a light southerly air, could not have exceeded a
knot an hour. He had no other canvass spread than his
three topsails and jib; though his courses were hanging in
the brails. His black hull was just beginning to show its
details; and along the line of light-yellow, that enlivened his
side, were visible the dark intervals of thirteen ports; a real
gun frowning in each. Although the hammocks were not
stowed, and the hammock-cloths had that empty and
undressed-look
which is so common to a man-of-war in the
night, it was apparent that the ship had an upper-deck, with
quarter-deck and forecastle batteries; or, in other words,
that she was a frigate. As she had opened the town of Porto
Ferrajo several minutes before she was herself seen from the
Feu-Follet, an ensign was hanging from the end of her gaff,
though there was not sufficient air to open its folds, in a way
to let the national character of the stranger be known.
Peste! exclaimed Raoul Yvard, as soon he had gazed
a minute at the stranger, in silence  a pretty
cul de sac
are we in, if that gentleman should happen to be an
Englishman
!
What say you, Etooell; can
you
make out
anything
of that ensignyour eyes are the best in the lugger?
It is too much for any sight to detairmine, at this
distance
,
and that before the sun is risen; but, by having a
glass ready, we shall soon know. Five minutes will bring
us the Great Luminary, as our minister used to call him.
Ithuel had descended from the bulwark, while speaking;
and he now went aft in quest of a glass, returning to his old
station, bringing two of the instruments; one of which he
handed to his commander, while he kept the other himself.
In another minute both had levelled their glasses at the
stranger, whom each surveyed attentively, for some time, in
profound silence.
Pardie!
exclaimed Raoul, that ensign is the
tricolor
,
or my eyes are untrue to my own country. Let me
see, Etooell, what ship of forty-two, or forty-four, has the
republic on this coast?
Not
that
, Monsieur Yvard, answered Ithuel, with a
manner so changed, and an emphasis so marked, as at once
to draw his companion's attention from the frigate to his own
countenance; not
that
, Monsieur Capitaing. It is not easy
for a bird to forget the cage in which he was shut up for
two years; if that is not the accursed Proserpine, I have
forgotten the cut of my own jib!
La Proserpine! repeated Raoul, who was familiar with
his shipmate's adventures, and did not require to be told his
meaning; if you are not mistaken, Etooell, le Feu-Follet
needs put her lantern under a shade. This is only a forty,
if I can count her ports.
I care nothing for ports, or guns; it is the Proserpine;
and the only harm I wish her is, that she were at the
bottom
of the ocean. The Proserpine, thirty-six, Captain Cuffe;
though Captain Flog would have been a better name for him.
Yes, the Proserpine, thirty-six, Captain Cuffe, Heaven bless
her!
Bah!  this vessel has forty-four gunsnow I can see
to count them; I make twenty-two of a side.
Ay, that's just her measure  a thirty-six on the list
and by rate, and forty-four by count; twenty-six long
eighteens below; twelve thirty-two's, carronades, on her
quarter-deck; and four more carronades, with two barkers,
for'ard. She'd just extinguish your Jack-o'Lantern,
Monsieur
Rule, at one broadside; for what are ten twelve-pound
carronades, and seventy men, to such a frigate?
I am not madman enough, Etooell, to dream of fighting
a frigate, or even a heavy sloop-of-war, with the force you
have just mentioned; but I have followed the sea too long to
be alarmed before I am certain of my danger. La
Railleuse
is just such a ship as that.
Hearken to reason, Monsieur Rule, answered Ithuel,
earnestly; La Railleuse, nor no other French frigate,
would show her colours to an enemy's port; for it would be
uselessly telling her errand. Now, an English ship might
show a French ensign, for
she
always has it in her power
to change it; and then
she
might be benefited by the cheat.
The Proserpine is French built, and has French legs, too,
boots or no boots  here Ithuel laughed a little,
involuntarily
,
but his face instantly became serious again  and
I have heard she was a sister vessel of the other. So much
for size and appearance; but every shroud, and port, and
sail, about yonder craft, is registered on my back in a way
that no sponge will ever wash out.
Sa-a-c-r-r-r-e, muttered Raoul between his teeth;
Etooell, if an Englishman, he may very well take it into
his head to come in here, and perhaps anchor within
half-a-cable's
length of us! What think you of that,
mon brave
Amricain?
That it may very well come to pass; though one hardly
sees, either, what is to bring a cruiser into such a place as
this. Every one hasn't the curiosity of a Jack-o'Lantern.
Mais que diable allait-il faire dans cette galre!
Bien;
we must take the weather as it comes; sometimes
a gale, and sometimes a calm. As he shows his own
ensign
so loyally, let us return the compliment, and show ours.
Hoist the ensign there, aft.
Which one, Monsieur? demanded an old demure
looking quarter-master, who was charged with that duty,
and who was never known to laugh; the captain will
remember we came into port under the
drapeau
of Monsieur
Jean Bull.
Bien
hoist the drapeau of Monsieur Jean Bull, again.
We must brazen it out, now we have put on the masque.
Monsieur Lieutenant, clap on the hawser, and run the
lugger
ahead, over her anchor, and see everything clear for
spreading our pocket-handkerchiefs. No one knows when
le Feu-Follet may have occasion to wipe her face.  Ah!
now, Etooell, we can make out his broadside fairly, he is
heading more to the westward.
The two seamen levelled their glasses, and renewed their
examinations. Ithuel had a peculiarity that not only
characterized
the man, but, which is so common among Americans
of his class, as, in a sense, to be national. On ordinary
occasions
he was talkative, and disposed to gossip; but, whenever
action and decision became necessary, he was thoughtful,
silent, and, though in a way of his own, even dignified. This
last fit was on him, and he waited for Raoul to lead the
conversation. The other, however, was disposed to be as
reserved as himself, for he quitted the knight-head, and took
refuge from the splashing of the water, used in washing the
decks, in his own cabin.
Two hours, though they brought the sun, with the activity
and hum of the morning, had made no great change in the
relative positions of things within and without the bay. The
people of le Feu-Follet had breakfasted, had got everything
on board their little craft in its proper place, and were moody,
observant and silent. One of the lessons that Ithuel had
succeeded in teaching his shipmates, was to impress on them
the necessity of commanding their voluble propensities, if
they would wish to pass for Englishmen. It is certain, more
words would have been uttered, in this little lugger, in one
hour, had her crew been indulged to the top of their bent,
than would have been uttered in an English first-rate, in
two; but the danger of using their own language, and the
English peculiarity of grumness, had been so thoroughly
taught them, that her people rather caricatured, than
otherwise
,
ce grand talent pour le silence
, that was thought to
distinguish their enemies. Ithuel, who had a waggery of his
7*
own, smiled as he saw the seamen folding their arms,
throwing
discontent and surliness into their countenances, and
pacing the deck singly, as if misanthropical and disdaining
to converse, whenever a boat came alongside from the shore.
Several of these visiters arrived, in the course of the two
hours mentioned; but the sentinel at the gangway, who had
his orders, repulsed every attempt to come on board,
pretending
not to understand French, when permission was
asked in that language.
Raoul had a boat's crew of four, all of whom had acquired
the English, like himself, in a prison-ship, and with these
men he now prepared to land; for, as yet, he had made
little progress in the business which brought him into his
present awkward predicament, and he was not a man to
abandon an object so dear to him, lightly. Finding himself
in a dilemma, he was resolved to make an effort to reap, if
possible, some advantage from his critical situation.
Accordingly
,
after he had taken his coffee, and given his orders,
the boat's crew was called, and he left the lugger's side.
All this was done tranquilly, as if the appearance of the
stranger in the offing gave no trouble to any in le
Feu-Follet
.
On this occasion, the boat pulled boldly into the little
harbour, its officer touching the shore at the common
landing
.
Nor were the men in any haste to return. They
lounged about the quay, in waiting for their captain,
cheapening
fruits, chatting with the women, in such Italian as they
could muster, and affecting to understand the French of the
old sea-dogs that drew near them, all of whom knew more or
less of that universal language, with difficulty. That they
were the objects of suspicion, their captain had sufficiently
warned them, and practice rendered them all good actors.
The time they remained in waiting for Raoul, was
consequently
spent in eluding attempts to induce them to betray
themselves, and in caricaturing Englishmen. Two of the
four folded their arms, endeavoured to look surly, and
paced the quay in silence, refusing even to unbend to the
blandishments of the gentler sex, three or four of whom
endeavoured to insinuate themselves into their confidence,
by offerings of fruit and flowers.
Amico, said Annunziate, one of the prettiest girls of
her class in Porto Ferrajo, and who had been expressly
employed by Vito Viti to perform this office, here are figs
from the main-land. Will you please to eat a few, that
when you go back to Inghilterra, you may tell your
countrymen
how we poor Elbans live?
Bad fig  sputtered Jacques, Raoul's cockswain, to
whom this offering was made, and speaking in broken
English
;
better at 'ome. Pick up better in ze street of
Portsmout'
!
But, Signore, you need not look as if they would hurt
you, or bite you; you can eat them, and, take my word for
it, you will find them as pleasant as the melons of Napoli.
No melon good, but English melon. English melon
plenty as pomme de terres  bah!
Yes, Signore, as the melons of Napoli, continued
Annunziate
,
who did not understand a syllable of the
ungracious
answers she received; Signor Vito Viti, our
podest
,
ordered me to offer these figs to the forestieri  the Inglesi,
who are in the bay
God-dam, returned Jacques, in a quick, sententious
manner, that was intended to get rid of the fair tormentor,
and which, temporarily, at least, was not without its effect.
But, leaving the boat's crew to be badgered in this
manner
,
until relief came, as will be hereafter related, we must
follow our hero in his way through the streets of the town.
Raoul, guided by an instinct, or having some special object
before his eyes, walked swiftly up the heights, ascending to
the promontory, so often mentioned. As he passed, every
eye was turned on him, for, by this time, the distrust in the
place was general; and the sudden appearance of a frigate,
wearing a French ensign, before the port, had given rise to
apprehensions of a much more serious nature than any which
could possibly attend the arrival of a craft as light as the
lugger, by herself. Vito Viti had long before gone up the
street, to see the vice-governatore; and eight or ten of the
principal men of the place had been summoned to a council,
including the two senior military dignitaries of the island.
The batteries, it was known, were manned; and, although
it would have puzzled the acutest mind of Elba to give a
reason why the French should risk so unprofitable an attack,
as one on their principal port, long ere Raoul was seen
among them, such a result was not only dreaded, but, in a
measure, anticipated with confidence. As a matter of course,
then, every eye followed his movements, as he went with
bounding steps up the narrow terraces of the steep street,
and the least of his actions was subjected to the narrowest
and most jealous scrutiny.
The heights were again thronged with spectators, of all
ages and classes, and of both sexes. The mantles and
flowing
dresses of females prevailed as usual; for whatever is
connected with curiosity, is certain to collect an undue
proportion
of a sex whose imaginations are so apt to get the
start of their judgments. On a terrace, in front of the palace,
as it was the custom to designate the dwelling of the
governor
,
was the group of magnates, all of them paying the
gravest attention to the smallest change in the direction of
the ship, which had now become an object of general
solicitude
and apprehension. So intent, indeed, were they in
gazing at this apprehended enemy, that Raoul stood in front
of Andrea Barrofaldi, cap in hand, and bowing his
salutation
,
before his approach was even anticipated. This sudden
and unannounced arrival created great surprise, and some
little confusion; one or two of the group turning away,
instinctively, as it might be, to conceal the flushes that
mounted to their cheeks, at being so unexpectedly confronted
by the very man, whom, the minute before, they had been
strongly denouncing.
Bon giorno
, Signor Vice-governatore, commenced
Raoul, in his gay, easy and courteous manner, and certainly
with an air that betrayed any feeling but those of
apprehension
and guilt; we have a fine morning, on the land, here;
and apparently a fine frigate, of the French republic, in the
offing, yonder.
We were conversing of that vessel, Signor Smees,
answered Andrea, as you approached. What, in your
judgment, can induce a Frenchman to appear before our
town, in so menacing a manner?
Cospetto!  you might as well ask me, Signore, what
induces these republicans to do a thousand other
out-of-the-way
things. What has made them behead Louis XVI.?
What has made them overrun half of your Italy; conquer
Egypt, and drive the Austrians back upon their Danube?
To say nothing of their letting Nelsoni destroy them at
Aboukir, added Vito Viti, with a grunt.
True, Signore, or let Nelson, my gallant countryman,
annihilate them near the mouth of the Nile. I did not
consider it proper to boast of English glory, though that
case, too, may very well be included. We have several
men, in ze Ving-And-Ving, who were in that glorious battle,
particularly our sailing-master, Etooell Bolt, who was on
board Nelson's own ship, having been accidentally sent on
service from the frigate to which he properly belonged, and
carried off expressly to share, as it might be, in the glory
of this famous battle.
I have seen the Signore, drily remarked Andrea
Barrofaldi
uno Americano?
An American! exclaimed Raoul, starting a little in
spite of his assumed indifference of manner; why, yes, I
believe Bolt
was
born in America  English America, you
know, Signori, and that is much the same thing as having
been born in England, herself. We look upon
ze Yanks
,
as but a part of our own people, and take them into our
service most cheerfully.
So the Signor Ituello has given us reason to believe;
he is seemingly a great lover of the English nation.
Raoul was uneasy, for he was entirely ignorant of all
that had passed in the wine-house, and he thought he
detected
irony in the manner of the vice-governatore.
Certainly, Signore, he answered, however, with
unmoved
steadiness; certainly, Signore, the Americani adore
Inghilterra; and well they may, considering all that great
nation has done for them. But, Signor Vice-governatore, I
have come to offer you the service of my lugger, should this
Frenchman really intend mischief. We are small, it is
true; and our guns are but light; nevertheless we may break
the frigate's cabin-windows, while you are doing him still
greater injury, from these heights. I trust you will assign
ze Ving-And-Ving some honourable station, should you
come to blows with the republicans.
And what particular service would it be most agreeable
to you to undertake, Signore, inquired the
vice-governatore
,
with considerate courtesy; we are no mariners, and
must leave the choice to yourself. The colonello, here,
expects some firing, and has his artillerists already at their
guns.
The preparation of Porto Ferrajo is celebrated among
the mariners of the Mediterranean, and, should the
Frenchman
venture within reach of your shot, I expect to see him
unrigged faster than if he were in a dock-yard. As for ze
leetl' Ving-And-Ving, in my opinion, while the frigate is
busy with these batteries, it might be well for us to steer
along the shore on the east side of the bay, until we can get
outside of her, when we shall have the beggars between two
fires. That was just what Nelson did at Aboukir, Signor
Podest, a battle you seem so much to admire.
That would be a manuvre worthy of a follower of
Nelsoni, Signore, observed the colonel, if the metal of
your guns were heavier. With short pieces of twelve,
however, you would hardly venture within reach of long
pieces of eighteen; although the first should be manned by
Inglese, and the last by Franese?
One never knows. At the Nile, one of our fifties laid
the Orient, a three-decker, athwart-hawse, and did her lots of
injury. The vaisseau, in fact, was blown up. Naval
combats
are decided on principles altogether different from
engagements
on the land, Signor Colonello.
It must be so, truly, answered the soldier; but what
means this movement? you, as a seaman, may be able to
tell us, Capitano.
This drew all eyes to the frigate again, where, indeed,
were movements that indicated some important changes.
As these movements have an intimate connexion with the
incidents of the tale, it will be necessary to relate them in a
manner to render them more intelligible to the reader.
The distance of the frigate from the town, might now have
been five English miles. Of current there was none; and
there being no tides in the Mediterranean, the ship would
have lain perfectly stationary all the morning, but for a very
light air from the southward. Before this air, however, she
had moved to the westward about a couple of miles, until
she had got the government-house nearly abeam. At the
same time, she had been obliquely drawing nearer, which
was the circumstance that produced the alarm. With the
sun had arisen the wind, and a few minutes before the
colonel
interrupted himself, in the manner related, the topsails
of the stranger had swelled, and he began to move through
the water at the rate of some four or five knots the hour.
The moment her people felt that they had complete
command
of their vessel, as if waiting only for that assurance,
they altered her course, and made sail. Putting her helm
a-starboard, the ship came close by the wind, with her head
looking directly in for the promontory, while her tacks were
hauled on board, and her light canvass aloft was loosened
and spread to the breeze. Almost at the same instant, for
everything seemed to be done at once, and as by instinct,
the French flag was lowered, another went up in its place,
and a gun was fired to leeward  a signal of amity. As
this second emblem of nationality blew out, and opened to
the breeze, the glasses showed the white field and St. George's
cross of the noble old ensign of England.
An exclamation of surprise and delight escaped the
spectators
on the promontory, as their doubts and apprehensions
were thus dramatically relieved. No one thought of Raoul
at that happy moment, though to him there was nothing of
new interest in the affair, with the exception of the apparent
intention of the stranger to enter the bay. As le Feu-Follet
lay in plain view from the offing, he had his doubts, indeed,
whether the warlike appearance of that craft was not the
true reason of this sudden change in the frigate's course.
Still, lying as he did, in a port hostile to France, there was
a probability that he might yet escape without a very
critical
or close examination.
Signor Smees, I felicitate you on this visit of a
countryman
,
cried Andrea Barrofaldi, a pacific man by nature, and
certainly no warrior, and who felt too happy at the prospects
of passing a quiet day, to feel distrust at such a moment;
I shall do you honour in my communications with
Florence
,
for the spirit and willingness which you have shown
in the wish to aid us, on this trying occasion.
Signor Vice-governatore, do not trouble yourself to
dwell on my poor services, answered Raoul, scarce caring
to conceal the smile that struggled about his handsome
mouth; think rather of those of these gallant signori, who
greatly regret that an opportunity for gaining distinction
has been lost. But here are signals that must be meant for
us  I hope my stupid fellows will be able to answer them,
in my absence.
It was fortunate for le Feu-Follet, perhaps, that her
commander
was not on board, when the stranger, the Proserpine,
the very ship that Ithuel so well knew, made her number.
The mystification that was to follow was in much better
hands, while conducted by the New-Hampshire man, than
it could possibly be in his own. Ithuel answered promptly,
though what, he did not know himself; but he took good care
that the flags he showed should become so entangled, as not
to be read by those in the frigate, while they had every
appearance of being hoisted fearlessly, and in good faith.
CHAPTER VI.
Are all prepared?
They are  nay more  embark'd; the latest boat
Waits but my chief
My sword and my capote.
The Corsair
.
What
success attended the artifice of Ithuel, it was
impossible
to tell, so far as the frigate was concerned; though
the appearance of mutual intelligence between the two
vessels
,
had a very favourable tendency towards removing
suspicion from the lugger, among those on shore. It seemed
so utterly improbable that a French corsair could answer
the signals of an English frigate, that even Vito Viti felt
compelled to acknowledge to the vice-governatore, in a
whisper, that, so far, the circumstance was much in favour
of the lugger's loyalty. Then the calm exterior of Raoul
counted for something, more especially as he remained,
apparently, an unconcerned observer of the rapid approach
of the ship.
We shall not have occasion to use your gallant offer,
Signor Smees, said Andrea, kindly, as he was about to
retire into the house, with one or two of his counsellors;
but we thank you none the less. It is a happiness to be
honoured with the visit of two cruisers of your great nation
on the same day, and I hope you will so far favour me as to
accompany your brother commander, when he shall do me
the honour to pay the customary visit, since it would seem
to be his serious intention to pay Porto Ferrajo the
compliment
of a call. Can you not guess at the name of the
frigate?
Now I see she is a countryman, I think I can, Signore,
answered Raoul, carelessly; I take her to be la
Proserpine
,
a French-built ship, a circumstance that first deceived
me as to her character.
And the noble cavaliere, her commanderyou doubtless
know his name and rank?
Oh! perfectly; he is the son of an old admiral, under
whom I was educated, though we happen ourselves never to
have met. Sir Brown is the name and title of the
gentleman
.
Ah! that is a truly English rank, and name, too, as
one might say. Often have I met that honourable
appellation
in Shakspeare, and other of your eminent authors.
Miltoni has a Sir Brown, if I am not mistaken, Signore?
Several of them, Signor Vice-governatore, answered
Raoul, without a moment's hesitation or the smallest
remorse
;
though he had no idea whatever who Milton was;
Milton, Shakspeare, Cicero, and all our great writers,
often mention Signori of this family.
Cicero! repeated Andrea, in astonishmenthe was
a Roman, and an ancient, Capitano, and died before
Inghilterra
was known to the civilized world.
Raoul perceived that he had reached too far, though he
was not in absolute danger of losing his balance. Smiling,
as in consideration of the other's provincial view of things,
he rejoined, with an
-plomb
that would have done credit to
a politician, in an explanatory and half-apologetic tone.
Quite true, Signor Vice-governatore, as respects him
you mention, he said; but not true as respects Sir Cicero,
my illustrious compatriot. Let me seeI do not think it is
yet a century since our Cicero died. He was born in
Devonshirethis was the county in which Raoul had been
Vol. I  8
imprisoned  and must have died in Dublin. Si  now I
remember, it
was
in Dublin that this virtuous and
distinguished
author yielded up his breath.
To all this Andrea had nothing to say, for, half a century
since, so great was the ignorance of civilized nations, as
related to such things, that one might have engrafted a
Homer on the literature of England, in particular, without
much risk of having the imposition detected. Signor
Barrofaldi
was not pleased to find that the barbarians were seizing
on the Italian names, it is true; but he was fain to set the
circumstance down to those very traces of barbarism, which
were the unavoidable fruits of their origin. As for supposing
it possible that one who spoke with the ease and innocence
of Raoul, was inventing as he went along, it was an idea
he was himself much too unpractised to entertain; and the
very first thing he did, on entering the palace, was to make
a memorandum which might lead him, at a leisure moment,
to inquire into the nature of the writings, and the general
merits of Sir Cicero, the illustrious namesake of him of
Rome. As soon as this little digression terminated, he
entered the palace, after again expressing the hope that
Sir Smees would not fail to accompany Sir Brown, in
the visit which the functionary fully expected to receive from
the latter, in the course of the next hour or two. The
company
now began to disperse, and Raoul was soon left to his
own meditations; which, just at that moment, were anything
but agreeable.
The town of Porto Ferrajo is so shut in from the sea by
the rock against which it is built, its fortifications, and the
construction of its own little port, as to render the approach
of a vessel invisible to its inhabitants, unless they choose to
ascend to the heights, and the narrow promenade already
mentioned. This circumstance had drawn a large crowd
upon the hill, again; among which Raoul Yvard now
threaded his way, wearing his sea cap, and his assumed
naval uniform, in a smart, affected manner, for he was fully
sensible of all the advantages he possessed on the score of
personal appearance. His unsettled eye, however, wandered
from one pretty face to another, in quest of Ghita, who alone
was the object of his search, and the true cause of the
awkward
predicament in which he had brought not only himself,
but le Feu-Follet. In this manner, now thinking of her he
sought, and then reverting to his situation in an enemy's
port, he walked along the whole line of the cliff, scarce
knowing whether to return, or to seek his boat, by doubling
on the town, when he heard his own name pronounced in
a sweet voice, which went directly to his heart. Turning
on his heel, Ghita was within a few feet of him.
Salute me distantly, and as a stranger, said the girl, in
almost breathless haste, and point to the different streets,
as if inquiring your way through the town. This is the
place where we met last evening; but, remember, it is no
longer dark.
As Raoul complied with her desire, any distant spectator
might well have fancied the meeting accidental, though he
poured forth a flood of expressions of love and admiration.
Enough, Raoul, said the girl blushing, and dropping
her eyes, though no displeasure was visible on her serene
and placid face, another time I might indulge you. How
much worse is your situation now, than it was last night!
Then you had only the port to fear; now you have both the
people of the port and this strange shipan Inglese, as they
tell me?
No doubtla Proserpine, Etooell says, and he knows;
you remember Etooell, dearest Ghita, the American who
was with me at the towerwell, he has served in this very
ship, and knows her to be la Proserpine, of forty-four.
Raoul paused a moment; then he added, laughing in a way
to surprise his companionOuila Proserpine, le
Capitaine
Sir Brown!
What you can find to amuse you in all this, Raoul, is
more than I can discover. Sir Brown, or sir any-body-else,
will send you again to those evil English prison-ships, of
which you have so often told me; and there is surely nothing
pleasant in
that
idea.
Bah! my sweet Ghita, Sir Brown, or Sir White, or Sir
Black, has not yet got me. I am not a child, to tumble
into the fire because the leading-strings are off; and le
Feu-Follet
shines, or goes out, exactly as it suits her purposes.
The frigate, ten to one, will just run close in, and take a
near look, and then square away and go to Livorno, where
there is much more to amuse her officers, than here, in Porto
Ferrajo. This Sir Brown has his Ghita, as well as Raoul
Yvard.
No, not a Ghita, I fear, Raoul, answered the girl
smiling, spite of herself, while her colour almost insensibly
deepend  Livorno has few ignorant country girls, like
me, who have been educated in a lone watch-tower on the
coast.
Ghita, answered Raoul, with feeling, that poor lone
watch-tower of thine, might well be envied by many a noble
dame at Roma and at Napoli; for it has left thee innocent
and pure  a gem that gay capitals seldom contain; or, if
found there, not in its native beauty, which they sully by
use.
What know'st thou, Raoul, of Roma and Napoli, and
of noble dames and rich gems? asked the girl, smiling,
the tenderness which had filled her heart at that moment
betraying itself in her eyes.
What do I know of such things, truly! why, I have
been at both places, and have seen what I describe. I went
to Roma on purpose to see the Holy Father, in order to
make certain whether our French opinions of his character
and infallibility were true, or not, before I set up in religion
for myself.
And thou
didst
find him holy and venerable, Raoul,
interposed the girl, with earnestness and energy, for this
was the great point of separation between them  I
know
thou found'st him thus, and worthy to be the head of an
ancient and true church. My eyes never beheld him; but
this do I
know
to be true.
Raoul was aware that the laxity of his religious opinions,
opinions that he may be said to have inherited from his
country, as it then existed morally, alone prevented Ghita
from casting aside all other ties, and following his fortunes,
in weal and in woe. Still he was too frank and generous
to deceive, while he had ever been too considerate to strive
to unsettle her confiding and consoling faith. Her infirmity
even, for so he deemed her notions to be, had a charm in
his eyes; few men, however loose or sceptical in their own
opinions on such matters, finding any pleasure in the
contemplation
of a female infidel; and he had never looked
more fondly into her anxious but lovely face, than he did at
this very instant, making his reply with a truth that bordered
on magnanimity.
Thou
art my religion, Ghita! he said; in thee I
worship purity, and holiness, and
Nay  nay, Raoul,
do
not  refrain  if thou really
lov'st me, utter not this frightful blasphemy; tell me, rather,
if thou didst not find the holy father, as I describe him?
I found him a peaceful, venerable, and, I firmly believe,
a
good
old man, Ghita; but
only
a man. No infallibility
could I see about him; but a set of roguish cardinals, and
other plotters of mischief, who were much better calculated
to set Christians by the ears, than to lead them to Heaven,
surrounded his chair.
Say no more, Raoul  I will listen to no more of this.
Thou knowest not these sainted men, and thy tongue is
thine own enemy, without  hark! what means that?
'T is a gun from the frigate, and must be looked to; say,
when and where do we meet again?
I know not, now. We have been too long, much too
long, together, as it is; and must separate. Trust to me to
provide the means of another meeting; at all events,
we
shall shortly be in our tower, again.
Ghita glided away as she ceased speaking, and soon
disappeared
in the town. As for Raoul, he was at a loss, for
a moment, whether to follow or not; then he hastened to
the terrace, in front of the government-house, again, in order
to ascertain the meaning of the gun. The report had drawn
others to the same place, and on reaching it, the young man
found himself in another crowd.
By this time the Proserpine, for Ithuel was right as to the
name of the stranger, had got within a league of the entrance
of the bay, and had gone about, stretching over to its eastern
shore, apparently with the intention to fetch fairly into it,
on the next tack. The smoke of her gun was sailing off to
leeward, in a little cloud, and signals were again flying at
her main-royal-mast-head. All this was very intelligible to
Raoul, it being evident, at a glance, that the frigate had
reached in nearer both to look at the warlike lugger that
she saw in the bay, and to communicate more clearly with
her by signals. Ithuel's expedient had not sufficed; the
vigilant Captain Cuffe, alias Sir Brown, who commanded
8 *
the Proserpine, not being a man likely to be mystified by so
stale a trick. Raoul scarcely breathed, as he watched the
lugger, in anticipation of her course.
Ithuel certainly seemed in no hurry to commit himself,
for the signal had now been flying on board the frigate
several minutes, and yet no symptoms of any preparation
for an answer could be discovered. At length the halyards
moved, and then three fair, handsome flags rose to the end
of le Feu-Follet's jigger-yard, a spar that was always kept
aloft, in moderate weather. What the signal meant Raoul
did not know, for though he was provided with signals by
means of which to communicate with the vessels of war of
his own nation, the Directory had not been able to supply
him with those necessary to communicate with the enemy.
Ithuel's ingenuity, however, had supplied the deficiency.
While serving on board the Proserpine, the very ship that
was now menacing the lugger, he had seen a meeting
between
her and a privateer English lugger, one of the two or
three of that rig which sailed out of England, and his
observant
eye had noted the flags she had shown on the occasion.
Now as privateersmen are not expected to be expert, or even
very accurate, in the use of signals, he had ventured to
show these very numbers, let it prove for better or worse.
Had he been on the quarter-deck of the frigate, he would have
ascertained through the benedictions bestowed by Captain
Cuffe, that his
ruse
had so far succeeded as to cause that
officer to attribute his unintelligible answer to ignorance,
rather than to design. Nevertheless, the frigate did not
seem disposed to alter her course; for, either influenced by
a desire to anchor, or by a determination to take a still
closer look at the lugger, she stood on, nearing the eastern
side of the bay, at the rate of some six miles to the hour.
Raoul Yvard now thought it time to look to the safety of
le Feu-Follet, in person. Previously to landing, he had
given instructions as to what was to be done, in the event
of the frigate's coming close in; but matters now seemed so
very serious, that he hurried down the hill, overtaking Vito
Viti, in his way, who was repairing to the harbour to give
instructions to certain boatmen concerning the manner in
which the quarantine laws were to be regarded, in an
intercourse
with a British frigate.
You ought to be infinitely happy, at the prospect of
meeting an honourable countryman, in this Sir Brown,
observed the short-winded podest, who usually put himself
out of breath, both in ascending and descending the steep
street, for he really seems determined to anchor in our
bay, Signor Smees.
To tell you the truth, Signor Podesta, I wish I was half
as well persuaded that it
is
Sir Brown, and la Proserpine,
as I was an hour ago. I see symptoms of its being a
republican
,
after all, and must have a care for ze
Ving-And-Ving
.
The devil carry away all republicans, is my humble
prayer, Signor Capitano; but I can hardly believe that so
graceful and gracious-looking a frigate can possibly belong
to such wretches.
Ah! Signore, if that were all, I fear we should have to
yield the palm to the French, answered Raoul, laughing;
for the best-looking craft in His Majesty's service are
republican prizes. Even should this frigate turn out to be
the Proserpine, herself, she can claim no better origin. But,
I think the vice-governatore has not done well in deserting
the batteries, since this stranger does not answer our signals
as she should. The last communication has proved quite
unintelligible to him.
Raoul was nearer to the truth than he imagined, perhaps,
for certainly Ithuel's numbers had made nonsense, according
to the signal-book of the Proserpine; but his confident
manner
had an effect on Vito Viti, who was duped by his
seeming
earnestness, as well as by a circumstance, which, rightly
considered, told as much against, as it did in favour of his
companion.
And what is to be done, Signore? demanded the
podest
,
stopping short in the street.
We must do as well as we can, under the circumstances.
My duty is to look out for ze Ving-And-Ving, and yours to
look out for the town. Should the stranger actually enter
the bay, and bring his broadside to bear on this steep hill,
there is not a chamber-window that will not open on the
muzzles of his guns. You will grant me permission to haul
into the inner harbour, where we shall be sheltered by the
buildings from his shot, and then, perhaps, it will be well
enough to send my people into the nearest battery. I look
for bloodshed and confusion, ere long.
All this was said with so much apparent sincerity, that it
added to the podest's mystification. Calling a neighbour
to him, he sent the latter up the hill, with a message to
Andrea Barrofaldi, and then he hurried down towards the
port, it being much easier for him, just at that moment, to
ascend, than to descend. Raoul kept at his side, and
together
they reached the water's edge.
The podest was greatly addicted to giving utterance to
any predominant opinion of the moment, being one of those
persons who
feel
quite as much as they
think
. On the
present occasion, he did not spare the frigate, for, having
caught at the bait that his companion had so artfully thrown
out to him, he was loud in the expression of his distrust.
All the signalling and showing of colours, he now believed
to be a republican trick; and precisely in proportion as he
became resentful of the supposed fraud of the ship, was he
disposed to confide blindly in the honesty of the lugger.
This was a change of sentiment in the magistrate; and, as
in the case of all sudden but late conversions, he was in a
humour to compensate for his tardiness, by the excess of his
zeal. In consequence of this disposition, the character and
loquacity of the man, all aided by a few timely suggestions
on the part of Raoul, in five minutes it came to be generally
understood that the frigate was greatly to be distrusted, while
the lugger was to rise in public favour exactly in the degree
in which the other fell. This interposition of Vito Viti's
was exceedingly  propos, so far as le Feu-Follet and her
people were concerned, inasmuch as the examination of,
and intercourse with, the boat's crew, had rather left the
impression of their want of nationality, in a legal sense, than
otherwise. In a word, had not the podest so loudly and
so actively proclaimed the contrary, Tommaso and his
fellows
were about to report their convictions that these men
were all bon fide wolves in sheep's clothingalias,
Frenchmen
.
No, noamici miei, said Vito Viti, bustling about on
the narrow little quay, all is not gold that glitters, of a
certainty; and this frigate is probably no ally, but an enemy.
A very different matter is it with ze Ving-y-Ving, and Il
Signor Smees  we may be said to know
him
have seen
his papers, and the vice-governatore and myself have
examined
him, as it might be, on the history and laws of his
island, for England is an island, neighbours, as well as Elba;
another reason for respect and amity  but we have gone
over much of the literature and history of Inghilterra
together
,
and find everything satisfactory and right; therefore
are we bound to show the lugger protection and love.
Most true, Signor Podest, answered Raoul, from his
boat; and such being the case, I hasten to haul my vessel
into the mouth of your basin, which I will defend against
boats, or any attempt of these rascally republicans to land.
Waving his hand, the young sailor pulled quickly out of
the crowded little port, followed by a hundred vivas. Raoul
now saw that his orders had not been neglected. A small
line had been run out from the lugger, and fastened to a
ring in the inner end of the eastern side of the narrow haven,
apparently with the intention of hauling the vessel into the
harbour itself. He also perceived that the light anchor, or
large kedge, by which le Feu-Follet rode, was under foot, as
seamen term it; or that the cable was nearly up and down.
With a wave of the hand he communicated a new order,
and then he saw that the men were raising the kedge from
the bottom. By the time his foot touched the deck, indeed,
the anchor was up and stowed, and nothing held the vessel
but the line that had been run to the quay. Fifty pairs of
hands were applied to this line, and the lugger advanced
rapidly towards her place of shelter. But an artifice was
practised to prevent her heading into the harbour's mouth,
the line having been brought inboard abaft her larboard
cat-head
,
a circumstance which necessarily gave her a sheer in
the contrary direction, or to the eastward of the entrance.
When the reader remembers that the scale on which the
port had been constructed was small, the entrance scarce
exceeding a hundred feet in width, he will better understand
the situation of things. Seemingly to aid the movement, too,
the jigger was set, and the wind being south, or directly aft,
the lugger's motion was soon light and rapid. As the vessel
drew nearer to the entrance, her people made a run with
the line, and gave her a movement of some three or four
knots to the hour, actually threatening to dash her bows
against the pier-head. But Raoul Yvard contemplated no
such blunder. At the proper moment, the line was cut, the
helm was put a-port, the lugger's head sheered to starboard,
and just as Vito Viti, who witnessed all without
comprehending
more than half that passed, was shouting his vivas,
and animating all near him with his cries, the lugger glided
past the end of the harbour, on its outside, however, instead
of entering it. So completely was every one taken by
surprise
,
by this evolution, that the first impression was of some
mistake, accident, or blunder of the helmsman, and cries of
regret followed, lest the frigate might have it in her power
to profit by the mishap. The flapping of canvass,
notwithstanding
,
showed that no time was lost, and presently le
Feu-Follet shot by an opening between the warehouses,
under all sail. At this critical instant, the frigate, which
saw what passed, but which had been deceived, like all the
rest, and supposed the lugger was hauling into the haven,
tacked and came round with her head to the westward.
But, intending to fetch well into the bay, she had stretched
so far over towards the eastern shore, as, by this time, to be
quite two miles distant; and as the lugger rounded the
promontory
close under its rocks, to avoid the shot of the
batteries
above, she left, in less than five minutes, her enemy
that space directly astern. Nor was this all. It would
have been dangerous to fire, as well as useless, on account
of the range, since the lugger lay nearly in a line between
her enemy's chase guns and the residence of the
vice-governatore
.
It only remained, therefore, for the frigate to
commence
what is proverbially a long chase, viz. a stern
chase.
All that has just been related may have occupied ten
minutes; but the news reached Andrea Barrofaldi, and his
counsellors, soon enough to allow them to appear on the
promontory in time to see the Ving-y-Ving pass close under
the cliffs beneath them, still keeping her English colours
flying. Raoul was visible, trumpet in hand; but as the wind
was light, his powerful voice sufficed to tell his story.
Signori, he shouted, I will lead the rascally
republican
away from your port, in chase;
that
will be the most
effectual mode of doing you a service.
These words were heard, and understood, and a murmur
of applause followed, from some, while others thought the
whole affair mysterious and questionable. There was no
time to interpose, by acts, had such a course been
contemplated
,
the lugger keeping too close in to be exposed to shot,
and there being, as yet, no new preparations in the batteries,
to meet an enemy. Then there were the doubts as to the
proper party to assail, and all passed too rapidly to admit
of consultation or preconcert. The movement of le
Feu-Follet
was so easy, as to partake of the character of instinct.
Her light sails were fully distended, though the breeze was
far from fresh; and, as she rose and fell on the long
ground-swells
,
her wedge-like bows caused the water to ripple before
them like a swift current meeting a sharp obstacle in the
stream. It was only as she sunk into the water, in
stemming
a swell, that anything like foam could be seen under
her fore-foot. A long line of swift-receding bubbles,
however
,
marked her track, and she no sooner came abreast of
any given group of spectators, than she was past it
resembling
the progress of a porpoise, as he sports along a
harbour
.
Ten minutes after passing the palace, or the pitch of the
promontory, the lugger opened another bay, one wider and
almost as deep as that on which Porto Ferrajo stands, and
here she took the breeze without the intervention of any
neighbouring rocks, and her speed was essentially increased.
Hitherto, her close proximity to the shore had partially
becalmed
her, though the air had drawn round the promontory,
making nearly a fair wind of it; but, now, the currents
came fully on her beam, and with much more power. She
hauled down her tacks, flattened in her sheets, luffed, and
was soon out of sight, breasting up to windward of a point
that formed the eastern extremity of the bay last mentioned.
All this time the Proserpine had not been idle. As soon
as she discovered that the lugger was endeavouring to
escape, her rigging was alive with men. Sail after sail was
set, one white cloud succeeding another, until she was a
sheet of canvass, from her trucks to her bulwarks. Her
lofty sails taking the breeze above the adjacent coast, her
progress was swift, for this particular frigate had the
reputation
of being one of the fastest vessels in the English
marine.
It was just twenty minutes, by Andrea Barrofaldi's watch,
after le Feu-Follet passed the spot where he stood, when the
Proserpine came abreast of it. Her greater draught of water
induced her to keep half a mile from the promontory, but
she was so near as to allow a very good opportunity to
examine
her general construction and appearance, as she went
by. The batteries were now manned, and a consultation
was held on the propriety of punishing a republican for
daring to come so near a Tuscan port. But there flew the
respected and dreaded English ensign; and it was still a
matter of doubt whether the stranger were friend or enemy.
Nothing about the ship showed apprehension, and yet she
was clearly chasing a craft which, coming from a Tuscan
harbour, an Englishman would be bound to consider entitled
to his protection, rather than to his hostility. In a word,
opinions were divided, and when that is the case, in matters
of this nature, decision is obviously difficult. Then, if a
Frenchman, she clearly attempted no injury to any on the
island; and those who possessed the power to commence a
fire were fully aware how much the town lay exposed, and
how little benefit might be expected from even a single
broadside. The consequence was, that the few who were
disposed to open on the frigate, like the two or three who
had felt the same disposition towards the lugger, were
restrained
in their wishes, not only by the voice of superior
authority, but by that of numbers.
In the meanwhile the Proserpine pressed on, and in ten
minutes more she was not only out of the range, but beyond
the reach of shot. As she opened the bay west of the town,
le Feu-Follet was seen from her decks, fully a league ahead,
close on a wind, the breeze hauling round the western end
of the island, glancing through the water at a rate that
rendered
pursuit more than doubtful. Still the ship persevered,
and in little more than an hour from the time she had
crowded sail, she was up with the western extremity of the
hills, though more than a mile to leeward. Here she met
the fair southern breeze, uninfluenced by the land, as it
came through the pass between Corsica and Elba, and got
a clear view of the work before her. The studding-sails
and royals had been taken in, twenty minutes earlier; the
bowlines were now all hauled, and the frigate was brought
close upon the wind. Still the chase was evidently
hopeless
,
the little Feu-Follet having everything as much to her
mind, as if she had ordered the weather expressly to show
her powers. With her sheets flattened in until her canvass
stood like boards, her head looked fully a point to windward
of that of the ship, and, what was of equal importance, she
even went to windward of the point she looked at, while the
Proserpine, if anything, fell off a little, though but a very
little, from her own course. Under all these differences,
the lugger went through the water six feet to the frigate's
five, beating her in speed almost as much as she did in her
weatherly qualities.
The vessel to windward was not the first lugger, by fifty,
that Captain Cuffe had assisted in chasing, and he knew the
hopelessness of following such a craft, under circumstances
so directly adapted to its qualities. Then he-was far from
certain that he was pursuing an enemy at all, whatever
distrust the signals may have excited, since she had clearly
come out of a friendly port. Bastia, too, lay within a few
hours' run, and there was the whole of the east coast of
Corsica, abounding with small bays and havens, in which a
vessel of that size might take refuge, if pressed. After
convincing
himself, therefore, by half-an-hour's further trial in
open sailing under the full force of the breeze, of the
fruitlessness
of his effort, that experienced officer ordered the
Proserpine's helm put up, the yards squared, and he stood
to the northward, apparently shaping his course for Leghorn,
or the Gulf of Genoa. When the frigate made this change
in her course, the lugger, which had tacked some time
previously
,
was just becoming shut in by the western end of
Elba, and she was soon lost to view entirely, with every
prospect of her weathering the island altogether, without
being obliged to go about again.
It was no more than natural that such a chase should
occasion some animation in a place as retired, and ordinarily
as dull, as Porto Ferrajo. Several of the young idlers of the
garrison obtained horses, and galloped up among the hills,
to watch the result; the mountains being pretty well
intersected
by bridle-paths, though totally without regular roads.
They who remained in the town, as a matter of course, were
not disposed to let so favourable a subject for discourse die
Vol. I.  9
away immediately, for want of a disposition to gossip on
it. Little else was talked of, that day, than the menaced
attack of the republican frigate, and the escape of the lugger.
Some, indeed, still doubted, for every question has its two
sides, and there was just enough of dissent to render the
discussions lively, and the arguments ingenious. Among
the disputants, Vito Viti acted a prominent part. Having
committed himself so openly by his vivas, and his public
remarks in the port, he felt it due to his own character to
justify all he had said, and Raoul Yvard could not have
desired a warmer advocate than he now had in the podest.
The worthy magistrate exaggerated the vice-governatore's
knowledge of English, by way of leaving no deficiency in
the necessary proofs of the lugger's national character. Nay,
he even went so far as to affirm that he had comprehended
a portion of the documents exhibited by the Signor Smees,
himself; and as to ze Ving-y-Ving, any one acquainted in
the least with the geography of the British Channel, would
understand that she was precisely the sort of craft that the
semi-Gallic inhabitants of Guernsey and Jersey would be apt
to send forth to cruise against the altogether Gallic
inhabitants
of the adjacent main.
During all these discussions, there was one heart in Porto
Ferrajo that was swelling with the conflicting emotions of
gratitude, disappointment, joy and fear, though the tongue
of its owner was silent. Of all of her sex in the place, Ghita
alone had nothing to conjecture, no speculation to advance,
no opinion to maintain, nor any wish to express. Still she
listened eagerly, and it was not the least of her causes of
satisfaction to find that her own hurried interviews with the
handsome privateersman, had apparently escaped
observation
.
At length her mind was fully lightened of its
apprehensions
,
leaving nothing but tender regrets, by the return
of the horsemen from the mountains. These persons
reported
that the upper sails of the frigate were just visible in
the northern board, so far as they could judge even more
distant than the island of Capraya, while the lugger had
beaten up almost as far to windward as Pianosa, and then
seemed disposed to stand over towards the coast of Corsica;
doubtless with an intention to molest the commerce of that
hostile island.
CHAPTER VII.
Ant.
And, indeed, sir, there are cozeners abroad; therefore it
behoves men to be wary.
Clo.
Fear not thou, man, thou shalt lose nothing here.
Ant.
I hope so, sir; for I have about me many parcels of
change.
Winter's Tale
.
Such
was the state of things at Porto Ferrajo, at noon,
or about the hour when its inhabitants bethought them of
their mid-day meal. With most, the siesta followed, though
the sea air, with its invigorating coolness, rendered that
indulgence less necessary to these islanders, than to most
of their neighbours on the main. Then succeeded the
reviving
animation of the afternoon, and the return of the
zephyr, or the western breeze. So regular, indeed, are
these changes in the currents of the air, during the summer
months, that the mariner can rely, with safety, on meeting
a light breeze from the southward, throughout the morning,
a calm at noonthe siesta of the Mediterranean  and
the delightfully cool wind from the west, after three or
four o'clock; this last is again succeeded, at night, by a
breeze directly from the land. Weeks at a time have we
known this order of things to be uninterrupted; and when
the changes did occasionally occur, it was only in the slight
episodes of showers and thunder-storms, of which, however,
Italy has far fewer than our own coast.
Such, then, was the state of Porto Ferrajo, towards the
evening that succeeded this day of bustle and excitement.
The zephyr again prevailed, the idle once more issued
forth for their sun-set walk, and the gossips were collecting
to renew their conjectures, and to start some new point in
their already exhausted discussions, when a rumour spread
through the place, like fire communicated to a train, that
ze Ving-y-Ving was once more coming down on the
weather side of the island, precisely as she had approached
on the previous evening; with the confidence of a friend
and the celerity of a bird. Years had passed since such a
tumult was awakened in the capital of Elba. Men, women
and children, poured from the houses, and were seen
climbing
the streets, all hastening to the promenade, as if to satisfy
themselves, with their own eyes, of the existence of some
miracle. In vain did the infirm and aged call on the
vigorous
and more youthful, for the customary assistance; they
were avoided like the cases of plague, and were left to hobble
up the terraced street as best they might. Even mothers,
after dragging them at their own sides till fearful of being
too late, abandoned their young in the highway, certain of
finding them rolled to the foot of the declivity, should they
fail of scrambling to its summit. In short, it was a scene
of confusion in which there was much to laugh at,
something
to awaken wonder, and not a little that was natural.
Ten minutes had not certainly elapsed, after the rumour
reached the lower part of the town, ere two thousand persons
were on the hill, including nearly all the principal
personages
of the place, 'Maso Tonti, Ghita, and the different
characters known to the reader. So nearly did the scene
of this evening resemble that of the past, the numbers of the
throng on the hill and the greater interest excepted, that one
who had been present at the former, might readily have
fancied the latter merely its continuation. There, indeed,
was the lugger, under her foresail and mainsail, with the
jigger brailed, coming down wing-and-wing, and glancing
along the glittering sea like the duck sailing towards her
nest. This time, however, the English ensign was flying
at the end of the jigger-yard, as if in triumph, and the little
craft held her way nearer to the rocks, like one acquainted
with the coast, and fearing no danger. There was a manner
of established confidence in the way in which she trusted
herself under the muzzles of guns that might have destroyed
her in a very few minutes, and no one who saw her approach
could very well believe that she was anything but a known,
as well as a confirmed friend.
Would any of the republican rascals, think you, Signor
Andrea, asked Vito Viti, in triumph, dare to come into
Porto Ferrajo, in this style; knowing, too, as does this `Sir
Smees,' the sort of people he will have to deal with!
Remember
,
Vice-governatore, that the man has actually been
ashore among us, and would not be likely to run his head
into the lion's mouth.
Thou hast changed thine opinion greatly, neighbour
Vito, answered the vice-governatore, somewhat drily, for
he was far from being satisfied on the subject of Sir Cicero,
and on those of certain other circumstances in English
history
and politics; it better becomes magistrates to be
cautious and wary.
Well, if there be a more cautious and circumspect man
in Elba than the poor podest of Porto Ferrajo, let him stand
forth, o' God's name, and prove his deeds! I do not esteem
myself, Signor Vice-governatore, as the idlest, or as the
most ignorant man in the Grand Duke's territories. There
may be wiser, among whom I place your eccellenza; but
there is not a more loyal subject, or a more zealous friend
of truth.
I believe it, good Vito, returned Andrea, smiling kindly
on his old associate, and have ever so considered thy
advice
and services. Still, I wish I knew something of this
Sir Cicero; for, to be frank with thee, I have even foregone
my siesta, in searching the books in quest of such a man.
And do they not confirm every syllable the Signor
Smees has said?
So far from it, that I do not even find the name. It is
true, several distinguished orators of that nation are styled
English
Ciceroes; but then all people do this, by way of
commendation.
I do not know that, Signore  I do not know that  it
may happen in our Italy; but would it come to pass, think
you, among remote and so lately barbarous nations as
England
,
Germany and France?
Thou forgettest, friend Viti, returned the
vice-governatore
,
smiling now, in pity of his companion's ignorance and
prejudices, as just before he had smiled in kindness, that
we Italians took the pains to civilize these people a
thousand
years ago, and that they have not gone backward all
this time. But there can be no doubt that `ze Ving-y-Ving'
means to enter our bay again, and there stands the `Signor
Smees' examining us with a glass, as if he, too,
contemplated
another interview.
It strikes me, Vice-governatore, that it would be a sin
9 *
next to heresy to doubt the character of those who so loyally
put their trust in us. No republican would dare to anchor
in the bay of Porto Ferrajo a second time.
Once
, it might
possibly be done; but
twice?
no, never, never.
I do not know but you are right, Vito, and I am sure I
hope so. Will you descend to the port, and see that the
forms are complied with? Then glean such useful
circumstances
as you can.
The crowd was now in motion towards the lower part of
the town, to meet the lugger; and at this suggestion the
podest hurried down, in the throng, to be in readiness to
receive the Signor Smees, as soon as he should land. It
was thought more dignified and proper for the
vice-governatore
to remain, and await to hear the report of the supposed
English officer, where he was. Ghita was one of the few,
also, who remained on the heights, her heart now beating
with renewed apprehensions of the dangers that her lover
had again braved on her account, and now nearly
overflowing
with tenderness, as she admitted the agreeable conviction,
that, had she not been in Porto Ferrajo, Raoul Yvard would
never have incurred such risks.
Ghita delle Torri, or Ghita of the Towers, as the girl was
ordinarily termed by those who knew her, from a
circumstance
in her situation that will appear as we advance in the
tale, or Ghita Caraccioli, as was her real name, had been
an orphan from infancy. She had imbibed a strength of
character and a self-reliance, from her condition, that might
otherwise have been wanting, in one so young, and of a
native disposition so truly gentle. An aunt had impressed
on her mind the lessons of female decorum; and her uncle,
who had abandoned the world on account of a strong
religious
sentiment, had aided in making her deeply devout, and
keenly conscientious. The truth of her character rendered
her indisposed to the deception which Raoul was practising,
while feminine weakness inclined her to forgive the offence,
in the motive. She had shuddered again and again, as she
remembered how deeply the young sailor was becoming
involved in frauds,and frauds, too, that might so easily
terminate in violence and bloodshed; and then she had
trembled under the influence of a gentler emotion, as she
remembered that all these risks were run for her. Her
reason had long since admonished her that Raoul Yvard
and Ghita Caraccioli ought to be strangers to each other;
but her heart told a different story. the present was an
occasion suited to keeping these conflicting feelings keenly
alive, and, as has been said, when most of the others
hastened down towards the port to be present when the
Wing-And-Wing came in, she remained on the hill,
brooding
over her own thoughts, much of the time bathed in tears.
But Raoul had no intention of trusting his Jack-o'-Lantern
where it might so readily be extinguished by the hand of
man. Instead of taking shelter against any new roving
republican who might come along, behind the buildings of
the port, as had been expected, he shot past the end of the
quay, and anchored within a few fathoms of the very spot
he had quitted that morning, merely dropping his kedge
under foot, as before. Then he stepped confidently into his
boat, and pulled for the landing.
Eh, Signor Capitano, cried Vito Viti, as he met his
new protg with an air of cordiality, as soon as the foot of
the latter touched the shore, we looked for the pleasure
of receiving you into our bosom, as it were, here in the haven.
How ingeniously you led off that
sans culotte
, this morning!
Ah, the Inglese are the great nation of the ocean, Colombo
notwithstanding! The vice-governatore told me all about
your illustrious female admiral, Elisabetta, and the Spanish
armada; and there was Nelsoni; and now we have Smees!
Raoul accepted these compliments, both national and
personal
,
in a very gracious manner, squeezing the hand of the
podest with suitable cordiality and condescension, acting
the great man as if accustomed to this sort of incense from
infancy. As became his public situation, as well as his
character, he proposed paying his duty immediately to the
superior authorities of the island.
King George, my master, continued Raoul, as he and
Vito Viti walked from the quay towards the residence of
Andrea Barrofaldi, is particularly pointed on this subject,
with us all, in his personal orders. `Never enter a port of
one of my allies, Smeet,' he said, the very last time I took
leave of him, `without immediately hastening with your
duty to the commandant of the place. You never lose
anything
by being liberal of politeness; and England is too
polished a country to be outdone in these things, by even the
Italians, the parents of modern civilization.'
You are happy in having such a sovrano, and still more
so in being allowed to approach his sacred person.
Oh! as to the last, the navy is his pet; he considers us
captains, in particular, as his children. `Never enter
London
,
my dear Smeet,' he said to me, `without coming to the
palace, where you will always find a father'you know he
has one son among us who was lately a captain, as well as
myself.
San Stefano! and he the child of a great king! I did
not know that, I confess, Signore.
Why, it is a law, in England, that the king shall give
at least one son to the marine. `Yes,' said his Majesty,
`always be prompt in calling on the superior authorities,
and remember me benevolently and affectionately to them,
one and all, even down to the subordinate magistrates, who
live in their intimacy.
Raoul delighted in playing the part he was now
performing
,
but he was a little addicted to over-acting it. Like all
exceedingly bold and decided geniuses, he was constantly
striding across that step which separates the sublime from
the ridiculous, and consequently ran no small hazard in the
way of discovery. But with Vito Viti he incurred little
risk on this score, provincial credulity and a love of the
marvellous coming in aid of his general ignorance, to render
him a safe depository of anything of this sort that the other
might choose to advance. Vito Viti felt it to be an honour to
converse with a man who, in his turn, had conversed with a
king; and as he puffed his way up the steep ascent again,
he did not fail to express some of the feelings which were
glowing in his breast.
Is it not a happiness to serve such a prince? he
exclaimed
nay,
to die for him!
The latter is a service I have not yet performed,
answered
Raoul, innocently, but which may one day well
happen. Do you not think, podest, that he who lays down
his life for his prince merits canonization?
That would fill the calendar too soon, in these wars,
Signor Smees; but I will concede you the generals and
admirals
,
and other great personages. Si  a general or an
admiral who dies for his sovereign, does deserve to be made
a saint  this would leave these miserable French
republicans
,
Signore, without hope or honour!
They are
canaille
, from the highest to the lowest, and
can reasonably expect nothing better. If they wish to be
canonized, let them restore the Bourbons, and put themselves
lawfully in the way of such a blessing. The chase of this
morning, Signor Vito Viti, must, at least, have amused the
town?
The podest wanted but this opening to pour out a history
of his own emotions, sensations and raptures. He expatiated
in glowing terms on the service the lugger had rendered the
place by leading off the rascally republicans, showing that he
considered the manuvre of passing the port, instead of
entering it, as one of the most remarkable of which he had
ever heard, or even read.
I defied the vice-governatore to produce an example of
a finer professional inspiration in the whole range of history,
beginning with his Tacitus, and ending with your new
English
work on Roma. I doubt if the Elder Pliny, or Mark
Antony, or even Csar, ever did a finer thing, Signore; and
I am not a man addicted to extravagance, in compliments.
Had it been a fleet of vessels of three decks, instead of a
little lugger, Christendom would have rung with the glory
of the achievement!
Had it been but a frigate, my excellent friend, the
manuvre
would have been unnecessary. Peste! it is not a
single republican ship that can make a stout English frigate
skulk along the rocks, and fly like a thief at night.
Ah, there is the vice-governatore walking on his terrace,
Sir Smees, and dying with impatience to greet you. We
will drop the subject, for another occasion, and a bottle of
good Florence liquor.
The reception which Andrea Barrofaldi gave Raoul, was
far less warm than that he received from the podest, though
it was polite, and without any visible signs of distrust.
I have come, Signor Vice-governatore, said the
privateersman
,
in compliance with positive orders from my
master, to pay my respects to you again, and to report my
arrival once more, in your bay, though the cruise made
since my last departure has not been so long as an East
India voyage.
Short as it has been, we should have reason to regret
your absence, Signore, were it not for the admirable proofs
it has afforded us of your resources and seamanship,
returned
Andrea with due complaisance. To own the truth,
when I saw you depart, it was with the apprehension that we
should never enjoy this satisfaction again. But, like your
English Sir Cicero, the second coming may prove even more
agreeable than the first.
Raoul laughed, and he even had the grace to blush a
little; after which he appeared to reflect intensely on some
matter of moment. Smiles struggled round his handsome
mouth, and then he suddenly assumed an air of sailor-like
frankness, and disclosed his passing sensations in words.
Signor Vice-governatore, I ask the favour of one
moment's
private conference; Signor Vito Viti, give us leave
a single moment, if you please. I perceive, Signore,
continued
Raoul, as he and Andrea walked a little aside, that
you have not easily forgotten my little fanfaronade about
our English Cicero. But what will you have?we sailors
are sent to sea children, and we know little of books. My
excellent father, Milord Smeet, had me put in a frigate when
I was only twelve, an age at which one knows very little
of Ciceros, or Dantes, or Corneilles, even, as you will
confess. Thus, when I found myself in the presence of a
gentleman whose reputation for learning has reached far
beyond the island he so admirably governs, a silly ambition
has led me into a folly that he finds it hard to forgive. If I
have talked of names of which I know nothing, it may be a
weakness, such as young men will fall into; but surely it is
no heinous crime.
You allow, Signore, that there has been no English Sir
Cicero?
The truth compels me to say, I know nothing about it.
But it is hard for a very young man, and one, too, that feels
his deficiencies of education, to admit all this to a
philosopher
,
on a first acquaintance. It becomes a different thing,
when natural modesty is encouraged by a familiar goodness
of heart; and a day's acquaintance with the Signor
Barrofaldi
,
is as much as a year with an ordinary man.
If this be the case, Sir Smees, I can readily understand,
and as willingly overlook what has passed, returned the
vice-governatore, with a self-complacency that in nothing
fell short of that which Vito Viti had so recently exhibited.
It must be painful, to a sensitive mind, to feel the
deficiencies
which unavoidably accompany the want of
opportunities
for study; and I, at least, can now say how delightful
it is to witness the ingenuousness which admits it. Then,
if England has never possessed a Cicero, in name, doubtless
she has had many in qualifications, after allowing for the
halo which time ever throws around a reputation. Should
your duty often call you this way, Signore, during this
summer, it will add to the pleasure I experience in enjoying
the advantage of your acquaintance, to be permitted, in some
slight degree, to direct your reading to such works, as, with
a mind like yours, will be certain to lead to profit and
pleasure
.
Raoul made a suitable acknowledgment for this offer, and
from that moment the best understanding existed between
the parties. The privateersman, who had received a much
better education than he pretended to, and who was a
consummate
actor, as well as, on certain occasions, a practised
flatterer, determined to be more cautious in future, sparing
his literary conjectures, whatever liberties he might take
with other subjects. And yet this reckless and daring
mariner
never flattered nor deceived Ghita in anything! With
her he had been all sincerity, the influence he had obtained
over the feelings of that pure-minded girl, being as much the
result of the nature and real feeling he had manifested, as of
his manly appearance and general powers of pleasing. It
would have been, indeed, matter of interesting observation,
for one curious in the study of human nature, to note how
completely the girl's innocence and simplicity of character
had extended itself over every act of the young man, that
was any way connected with her, preventing his even
feigning
that religion which he certainly did not feel, and the
want of which was the sole obstacle to the union he had
now solicited for near a twelvemonth, and which, of all others,
was the object by far the closest to his heart. With Andrea
Barrofaldi, and Vito Viti, and most especially with the hated
English, it was a very different thing, however; and seldom
was Raoul happier, than when he was employed in precisely
such a scene of mystification as that in which he was at
that moment engaged.
The vice-governatore having established relations so
completely
amicable with the `Signor Smees,' could do no less
than invite his guest to enter the palazzo, along with
himself
and the podest. As it was yet too light for the sailor
to seek an interview with Ghita, he cheerfully accepted the
offer; making a careful examination of the whole of the
northern margin of the sea, from his elevated position,
however
,
before he crossed the threshold. This little delay, on
Raoul's part, enabled the podest to have a passing word
with his friend unobserved.
You have found `Sir Smees,' said Vito Viti, with
earnestness, all that your wisdom and prudence could
desire, I trust? For my part, I consider him a most
interesting
youth; one destined, at some future time, to lead fleets,
and dispose of the fortunes of nations.
He is more amiable, and even better informed, than I
had thought, neighbour Vito Viti. He gives up his Sir
Cicero with a grace that causes one regret it was necessary;
and, like yourself, I make no doubt of his becoming an
illustrious
admiral, in time. It is true, his father, `Milordo
Smees,' has not done justice to his education; but it is not
too late, yet, to repair that evil. Go, desire him to enter;
for I am impatient to draw his attention to certain works
that may be useful to one in his line of life.
At this suggestion the podest returned to the door, in
order to usher the imaginary Guernsey-man into the
residence
.
He found Raoul still standing on the entrance,
examining the sea. There were two or three coasters,
feluccas, as usual, stealing along the coast, in the Italian
fashion, equally afraid of the barbarians of the south shore,
and of the French of the north. All these would have been
good prizes; but, to do the privateersman justice, he was
little in the habit of molesting mariners of so low a class.
There was one felucca, however, that was just rounding the
promontory, coming in from the north; and with the people
of this craft he determined to have some communication as
soon as he returned to the port, with a view to ascertain if
she had fallen in with the frigate. Just as he had come to
this resolution, the podest joined him, and he was ushered
into the house.
It is unnecessary to give the discourse which succeeded.
It related more to literature and matters in general, than to
anything connected with our tale, the worthy
vice-governatore
being disposed to reward the ingenuousness of the young
sailor, by furnishing him as much instruction as the time
and circumstances would allow. Raoul bore this very well,
waiting patiently for the light to disappear, when he felt a
perfect confidence of again meeting Ghita on the promenade.
As he had discovered how much more safety there was in
diffidence than in pretension, he found his task of deception
comparatively easy; and by letting the vice-governatore
have his own way, he not only succeeded in gaining that
functionary over to a full belief in his assumed nationality,
but in persuading him to believe the `Signor Smees' a young
man of even more erudition than he had at first supposed.
By means as simple and natural as these, Raoul made more
progress in the good graces of Andrea Barrofaldi, in the
next two hours, than he could have done in a year, by
setting up his own knowledge and reading as authority.
There is little doubt that the vice-governatore found this
interview agreeable, from the time he was disposed to waste
on it; and, it is certain, Raoul thought it some of the hardest
duty in which he had ever been engaged. As for Vito Viti,
he was edified, and he did not care to conceal it, giving
frequent
manifestations of his satisfaction, by expressions of
delight; occasionally venturing a remark, as if expressly to
betray his own ignorance.
I have often known you great, vice-governatore, he
cried, when Andrea had closed a dissertation on the earlier
history of all the northern nations, which lasted fully
half-an-hour
,
but never so great as you are to-night! Signore,
you have been most illustrious, this evening! Is it not so,
Signor Smees? Could any professor of Pisa, or even of
Padua, do more justice to a subject, than we have seen done
to this to which we have been listening?
Signor Podest, added Raoul, but one feeling has
prevailed, in my mind, while attending to what has been
said; and that has been deep regret that my profession has
cut me off from all these rich stores of profound thought.
Vol. I  10
But it is permitted us to admire that even which we cannot
imitate.
Quite true, Signori, answered Andrea, with gentle
benevolence, but with dispositions like yours, Sir Smees,
it is not so very difficult to imitate what we admire. I will
write out a list of works, which I would recommend to your
perusal; and, by touching at Livorno, or Napoli, you will
obtain all the books at reasonable prices. You may expect
to see the list on your breakfast-table to-morrow morning,
as I shall not sleep until it is completed.
Raoul gladly seized upon this promise as a hint to depart,
and he took his leave with suitable acknowledgments of
gratitude and delight. When he got out of the palazzo,
however, he gave a long, low whistle, like a man who felt
he had escaped from a scene in which persecution had been
a little lightened by the ridiculous, and uttered a few curses
on the nations of the north, for being so inconsiderate as to
have histories so much longer and more elaborate than he
conceived to be at all necessary. All this passed as he
hastened along the promenade, which he found deserted,
every human being having apparently left it. At length he
thought he perceived a female form some distance ahead of
him, and in a part of the walk that was never much
frequented
.
Hastening towards it, his quick eye discerned the
person of her he sought, evidently waiting for his approach.
Raoul, exclaimed Ghita, reproachfully, in what will
these often-repeated risks finally end? When so fairly and
cleverly out of the harbour of Porto Ferrajo, why did you
not possess the prudence to remain there?
Thou know'st the reason, Ghita, and why ask this
question? San Nettuno! was it not handsomely done; and
is not this brave vice-governatore rarely mystified!I
sometimes
think, Ghita, I have mistaken my vocation, which
should have been that of a diplomate.
And why a diplomate, in particular, Raoul  thou art
too honest to deceive long, whatever thou may'st do on an
occasion like this, and in a pressing emergency.
Why?  but, no matter. This Andrea Barrofaldi, and
this Vito Viti, will one day know why. And now to our
business, Ghita, since le Feu-Follet cannot always decorate
the bay of Porto Ferrajo.
True, interrupted the girl, and I have come for no
other purpose than to say as much myself. My dear uncle
has arrived, and he intends to sail for the Torri with the first
felucca.
There!  this has done more to make me believe in a
Providence, than all the preaching of all the padri of Italy!
Here is the lugger to take the place of the felucca, and we
can sail this very night. My cabin shall be yours entirely;
and with your uncle for a protector, no one can raise an
evil tongue against the step.
Ghita, to own the truth, expected this very offer, which,
agreeable as it was, her sense of propriety would certainly
have prevented her from accepting, but for one
consideration
:
it might be made the means of getting Raoul out of
an enemy's port; and, in so much, out of harm's way. This,
with one of her affectionate heart, was an object to which
she would have sacrificed appearances of even a graver
character. We do not wish the reader, however, to get a
false impression of this girl's habits and education. Although
the latter, in many particulars, was superior to that received
by most young women of her class in life, the former were
simple, and suited to her station, as well as to the usages of
her country. She had not been brought up with that severe
restraint which regulates the deportment of the young Italian
females of condition, perhaps, in a degree just as much too
severely, as it leaves the young American too little
restrained
;
but she had been taught all that decorum and
delicacy required, either for the beautiful or the safe; and
her notions inculcated the inexpediency, if not the
impropriety
,
of one in her situation taking a passage in a privateer
at all, and particularly so in one commanded by an avowed
lover. But, on the other hand, the distance between Porto
Ferrajo and the Towers, was only about fifty miles, and a
few hours would suffice to place her in safety beneath her
own roof; and, what was of more importance, in her view,
just then, Raoul in safety along with her. On all this had
she pondered, and she was consequently prepared with an
answer to the proposal that had just been made.
If my uncle and myself could accept this generous offer,
when would it be convenient for you to sail, Raoul? the
girl demanded; we have now been absent longer than we
intended, and longer than we ought.
Within an hour, if there were any wind. But you see
how it is, Ghitathe zephyr has done blowing, and it now
seems as if every fan of Italy had gone to sleep. You can
depend on our sailing the instant it shall be in our power.
At need, we will use the sweeps.
I will, then, see my uncle, and mention to him that there
is a vessel about to sail, in which we had better embark.
Is it not odd, Raoul, that he is profoundly ignorant of your
being in the bay? He gets more and more lost to things
around him every day, and I do believe he does not recollect
that you command an enemy's vessel half the time.
Let him trust to me; he shall never have occasion to
know it, Ghita.
We are assured of that, Raoul. The generous manner
in which you interposed to save us from the corsair of the
Algerines, which began our acquaintance, and for which we
shall always have occasion to bless you, has made peace
between you and
us
, for ever. But for your timely succour,
last summer, my uncle and myself would now have been
slaves with barbarians!
That is another thing that inclines me to believe in a
Providence, Ghita! Little did I know, when rescuing you
and your good kinsman from the boat of the Algerine, who I
was saving. And yet, you see how all has come to pass, and
that in serving you I have merely been serving myself.
Would that thou could'st learn to serve that God, who
disposes of us all at his holy pleasure! murmured Ghita,
tears forcing themselves to her eyes, and a convulsive effort
alone suppressing the deep emotion with which she uttered
the words; but we thank thee again and again, Raoul, as
the instrument of his mercy, in the affair of the Algerine,
and are willing to trust to thee now, and always. It will be
easy to induce my uncle to embark; but, as he knows thy
real character, when he chooses to recollect it, I hardly
think it will do to say with
whom
. We must arrange an
hour, and a place to meet, when I will see to his being there,
and in readiness.
Raoul and Ghita next discussed the little details; a place
of rendezvous without the town, a short distance below the
wine-house of Benedetta, being selected, in preference to
choosing one that would necessarily subject them to
observation
.
This portion of the arrangements was soon settled,
and then Ghita thought it prudent to separate. In this
proposal
her companion acquiesced with a better grace than he
might have done, had he not the girl's assurance of meeting
him within an hour, in order that everything might be ready
for a start, with the first appearance of wind.
When left alone, Raoul bethought him that Ithuel and
Filippo were on shore, as usual; the New-Hampshire man
consenting to serve only on condition of being allowed to
land; a privilege he always abused by driving a contraband
trade, on occasions like the present. So great was the
fellow's
dexterity in such matters, that Raoul, who disdained
smuggling, while he thought himself compelled to wink at it
in others, had less apprehensions of his committing the lugger,
than he might have felt in the case of one less cunning.
But it was now necessary to get these two men off, or
abandon
them; and fortunately remembering the name of the
wine-house where they had taken their potations the previous
night, he repaired to it without delay, luckily finding Ithuel
and his interpreter deep in the discussion of another flask of
the favourite Tuscan beverage. 'Maso and his usual
companions
were present also, and there being nothing unusual
in the commander of an English ship of war's liking good
liquor, Raoul, to prevent suspicion, drew a chair, and asked
for his glass. By the conversation that followed, the young
privateersman felt satisfied that, though he might have
succeeded
in throwing dust into the eyes of the
vice-governatore
and the podest, these experienced old seamen still
distrusted his character. It was so unusual a thing for a
French frigate, while it was so usual for an English frigate,
to be standing along the coast, near in, that these mariners,
who were familiar with all such matters, had joined this
circumstance to the suspicious signs about the lugger, and
were strongly disposed to believe the truth concerning both
vessels. To all this, however, Raoul was more indifferent
than he might have been, but for the arrangement to sail so
soon. He took his wine, therefore, with apparent
indifference
,
and, in proper season, withdrew, carrying with him
Ithuel and the Genoese.
10 *
CHAPTER VIII.
Within our bay, one stormy night,
The isle's men saw boats make for shore,
With here and there a dancing light
That flash'd on man and oar.
When hailed, the rowing stopp'd, and all was dark.
Ha! lantern work!  We 'll home! They 're playing shark!
Dana
.
It
was dark when Raoul quitted the government-house,
leaving Andrea Barrofaldi and Vito Viti, in the library of
the former. No sooner was the young seaman's back
turned, than the vice-governatore, who was in a humour to
display his acquirements, resumed a discussion that he had
found so agreeable to his self-esteem.
It is easy to see, good Vito Viti, that this young Inglese
is a gentleman of noble birth, though not of a liberal
education
,
he said; doubtless, his father, Milordo Smees, has
a large family, and the usages of England are different from
those of Italy, in respect to birth-right. There, the eldest
son, alone, inherits the honours of the family, while the
cadets are put into the army and navy, to earn new
distinctions
.
Nelsoni is the son of a priest, I hear
Cospetto! of a padre! Signor Vice-governatore,
interrupted
the podestit is most indecent to
own
it. A priest
must be possessed of the devil, himself, to
own
his issue;
though issue he may certainly have.
There, again, good Vito, it is different with the Luterani
and us Catholics. The priests of England, you will please
to remember, marry, while ours do not.
I should not like to be shrived by such a padre!  The
man would be certain to tell his wife all I confessed; and
the saints could only say what would be the end on 't.
Porto Ferrajo would soon be too hot to hold an honest man
ay, or even an honest woman, in the bargain.
But the Luterani do not confess, and are never shrived
at all, you will remember.
San Stefano!  How do they expect, then, ever to get
to heaven?
I will not answer that they do, friend Vitoand we are
certain, that if they
have
such expectations, they must be
most treacherous to them. But, talking of this Sir Smees,
you perceive in his air and manner, the finesse of the
Anglo-Saxon
race; which is a people altogether distinct from the
ancient Gauls, both in history and characters. Pietro
Giannone, in his
Storia Civile del Regno di Napoli
, speaks
of the Normans, who were a branch of these adventurers,
with great interest and particularity; and I think I can trace,
in this youth, some of the very peculiarities that are so
admirably
delineated in his well-told, but too free, writings.
Well, Pietro; I was not speaking of thee, but of a namesake
of thine, of the family of Giannona, an historian of Naples,
of note and meritwhat is thy will?
This question was put to a servant, who entered at that
moment, holding in his hand a piece of paper, which he
desired to lay before his master.
A cavaliere is without, Signor Andrea, who asks the
honour of an audience, and who sends in his name, as your
eccellenza will find it on this paper.
The vice-governatore took the slip of paper, and read
aloud; Edward Griffin, tenente della marina Inglesa.
Ah! here is an officer sent from `ze Ving-y-Ving', with
some communication, friend Vito; it is fortunate you are
still here, to hear what he has to say. Show the lieutenant
in, Pietro.
One who understood Englishmen better than Andrea
Barrofaldi, would have been satisfied, at a glance, that he
who now entered was really a native of that country. He
was a young man of some two or three and twenty, of a
ruddy, round, good-natured face, wearing an undress coat
of the service to which he professed to belong, and whose
whole air and manner betrayed his profession, quite as much
as his country. The salutations he uttered were in very
respectable Italian, familiarity with the language being the
precise reason why he had been selected for the errand on
which he had come. After these salutations, he put a piece
of parchment into Andrea's hand, remarking
If you read English, Signore, you will perceive by that
commission I am the person I represent myself to be.
Doubtless, Signor Tenente, you belong to ze
Ving-y-Ving
,
and are a subordinate of Sir Smees?
The young man looked surprised, and, at the same time,
half disposed to laugh; though a sense of decorum suppressed
the latter inclination.
I belong to His Britannic Majesty's ship Proserpine,
Signore, he drily answered, and know not what you
mean by the Ving-y-Ving. Captain Cuffe, of that ship,
the frigate you saw off your harbour this morning, has sent
me down in the felucca that got in this evening, to
communicate
intelligence concerning the lugger, which we chased to
the southward about nine o'clock, but which, I see, is again
snug at her anchor in this bay. Our ship was lying behind
Capraya, when I left her, but will be here to take me off,
and to hear the news, before daylight, should the wind ever
blow again.
Andrea Barrofaldi and Vito Viti stared, and that, too, as
if a messenger had come from the lower regions to summon
them away for their misdeeds. Lieutenant Griffin spoke
unusually good Italian, for a foreigner; and his manner of
proceeding was so straight-forward and direct, as to carry
with it every appearance of truth.
You do not know what I mean by ze Ving-y-Ving?
demanded the vice-governatore, with emphasis.
To be frank with you, I do not, Signore. Ving-y-Ving
is not English; nor do I know that it is Italian.
Mr. Griffin lost a good deal of ground by this assertion,
which implied a doubt of Andrea's knowledge of foreign
tongues.
You say, Signor Tenente, if I comprehend your
meaning
,
that Ving-y-Ving is not English?
Indeed I do, sir; at least, no English that I have ever
heard spoken, at sea or ashore; and we seamen have a
language
of our own.
Will you, then, permit me to ask you what is the
translation
of
ala e ala;
word for word.
The lieutenant paused a moment, and pondered. Then he
laughed involuntarily, checking himself almost immediately,
with an air of respect and gravity.
I believe I now understand you, Signor
Vice-governatore
,
he said; we have a sea-phrase something like this,
to describe a fore-and-aft vessel with her sails swinging off
on both sides; but
we
call it wing-and-wing.
Si, Signore  ving-y-ving. Such is the name of the
lugger of your king, that now lies in our bay.
Ah! we thought as much, Signori; the scoundrel has
deceived you, as he has done a hundred before you, and
will do to a hundred, again, unless we catch him to-night.
The lugger is a celebrated French privateer, that we have
six cruisers in chase of at this moment, our own ship
included
.
She is called le Feu-Follet, which is not
Wing-And-Wing
,
but Will-o'-the-Wisp, or Jack-o'-Lantern, in English;
and which you, in Italian, would call
il Fuoco Fatuo
. Her
commander is Raoul Yvard, than whom, there is not a
greater desperado sailing out of France; though it is
admitted
that the fellow has some good  nay, some
noble
qualities.
At every word uttered by the lieutenant, a page of history
was blotted out from the memory of his listener. The
vice-governatore
had heard the name of Raoul Yvard, and even
that of le Feu-Follet, which the malignancy of a bitter war
had blackened nearly to the hues of piracy. The thought
that he had been the dupe of this corsair  nay, that he had
actually been entertaining him with honours and hospitality,
within an hour, was nearly too much for his philosophy.
Men do not often submit to such humiliating sensations with
out a struggle; and before he would, or could, accord full
credence to what was now told him, it was natural to oppose
the objections that first offered.
All this
must
be a mistake, observed the
vice-governatore
;
there are English, as well as French luggers; and
this is one of the former. Her commander is a noble
English gentleman, a son of Milordo Smees; and though
his education has been, in a trifling degree, neglected, he
shows his origin and national character in all he says and
does. Ze Ving-y-Ving is commanded by Sir Smees, a young
officer of merit, as you must have seen, yourself, Signore, by
his evolutions this very morning. Surely, you have heard
of Il Capitano Sir Smees, the son of Milordo Smees!
We do not deny that his escape, this morning, was a
clever thing, vice-governatore, for the fellow is a seaman,
every inch of him; and he is as brave as a lion; but, then,
he is as impudent as a beggar's dog. There is no Sir Smees,
nor any Sir Any-Body else, in command of any of our
luggers
,
anywhere. In the Mediterranean, we have no cruiser
of this rig at all; and the two or three we have elsewhere,
are commanded by old sea-dogs, who have been brought up
in that sort of craft. As for Sirs, they are scarce out here,
though the battle of the Nile has made a few of them, for
the navy. Then you 'll not often meet with a nobleman's
son in a clipper like this, for that sort of gentry generally go
from a frigate's quarter-deck into a good sloop, as
commander
,
and after a twelvemonth's work, or so, in the small
one, into a fast frigate again, as a post-captain.
Much of this was gibberish to Andrea Barrofaldi, but
Griffin being exclusively naval, he fancied every one ought
to take the same interest as he did himself, in all these
matters
.
But, while the vice-governatore did not understand
more than half of the other's meaning, that half sufficed to
render him exceedingly uneasy. The natural manner of
the lieutenant, too, carried conviction with it, while all the
original impressions against the lugger were revived by his
statements.
What say you, Signor Vito Viti? demanded Andrea;
you have been present at the interviews with Sir Smees.
That we have been deceived by one of the most
oily-tongued
rogues that ever took in honest men, if we have
been deceived at all, vice-governatore. Last evening, I would
have believed this; but since the escape and return of the
lugger, I could have sworn that we had an excellent friend
and ally in our bay.
You had your signals, Signor Tenente; and that is proof
of amity and understanding.
We made our number, when we saw the lugger with
an English ensign set, for we did not suppose a Frenchman
would be quietly lying in a Tuscan port; but the answer we
got was nonsense; and then we remembered to have heard
that this Raoul Yvard was in the habit of playing such
tricks, all along the Italian coast. Once on the scent, we
were not the men to be easily thrown off it. You saw the
chase, and know the result.
There must be some error in all this! Would it not be
well, Signore, to see the commander of the lugger  or to go
on board of her, and satisfy yourself, with your own eyes,
of the truth or falsehood of your surmises? Ten minutes
might clear up everything.
Your pardon, Signor Vice-governatore; were I to trust
myself on board le Feu-Follet, I might remain a prisoner
until a peace was made; and I have yet two steps to gain,
before I can afford that risk. Then, as to letting Yvard
know of my presence here, it would just give him the alarm,
and cause us to lose the bird, before we can spring the net.
My orders are positive, not to let any one but the authorities
of the island, know of my visit, or its object. All we ask
of you is to detain the lugger until morning; then
we
will
see to it, that she will never trouble the Italian coast again.
Nay, Signore, we have guns of our own, and could
easily dispose of so small a vessel, once assured of her being
an enemy, returned the vice-governatore, with a little pride
and loftiness of manner; convince us of that fact, and
we 'll sink the lugger at her anchors.
That is just what we do not wish you to do, Signore,
answered the lieutenant, with interest. From what passed
this morning, Captain Cuffe has thought it probable that
Monsieur Yvard, for some reason best known to himself,
would come back here, as soon as he was rid of us; or that,
finding himself on the south side of the island, he might put
into Porto Longone; and, had I not met him here, I was to
get a horse, and ride across to the latter place, and make
my arrangements there. We wish, by all means, to get
possession of the lugger, which, in smooth water, is the
fastest craft in the Mediterranean, and would be of infinite
service to us. We think the Proserpine would prove too
much for her, blowing fresh; but, in moderate weather, she
will go six feet to our five. Now, if you open on her, she
will either escape or be sunk; for Raoul Yvard is not a man
to strike to a town. All I ask is to be permitted to make
night-signals, for which I am prepared, as soon as the frigate
approaches, and that you will throw all the delays, by means
of forms and permits, in the way of the Frenchman's sailing,
until to-morrow morning. We will answer for the rest.
I should think there would be but little danger of the
lugger's departing in the night, Signor Tenente, her
commander
rather expressing an intention of passing several
days with us; and it is this ease and confidence of his,
which causes me to think he cannot be the person you take
him for. Why should Raoul Yvard and le Feu-Follet come
into Porto Ferrajo at all?
No one knows: it is the man's habit; and doubtless he
has reasons for it. 'T is said, he has even been in at
Gibraltar; and it is certain, he has cut several valuable
store-ships out of our convoys. There is an Austrian
loading
with iron, I perceive, in the harbour; probably he is
waiting for her to fill up, and finds it easier to watch her at
an anchor, than by lying outside.
You naval gentlemen have ways known only to
yourselves
;
and all this may be so; but it seems an enigma to
me. Have you any other proofs of your own character,
Signor Tenente, than the commission you have shown me?
for Sir Smees, as I have been taught to call the commander
of the lugger, has one too, that has an air of as much
authenticity
as this you have shown; and he wears quite as
English-looking a uniform: how am I to judge between
you?
That difficulty has been foreseen, Signor
Vice-governatore
,
and I come well provided with the necessary proofs. I
handed you my commission, as that is a document, which,
if wanting, might throw a distrust on all other proofs. But,
here is a communication from your superior, at Florence,
recommending us to the kindness of the authorities of all the
Tuscan ports; which you will readily understand. Captain
Cuffe has furnished me with other proofs; which you can
look over at your leisure.
Andrea Barrofaldi now set about a cautious and
deliberate
examination of all the papers shown him. They proved
to be of a nature to remove every doubt; and it was not
possible to distrust the party that presented them. This
was a great deal towards convicting the Signor Smees of
imposition, though both the vice-governatore and the podest
were of opinion that Captain Cuffe might yet be mistaken,
as to the identity of the lugger.
It is impossible, Signori, answered the lieutenant;
We know every English cruiser in these seas, by name
and description, at least, and most of them by sight. This
is none; and everything about her, particularly her sailing,
betrays her real name. We hear there is a man in her who
once belonged to our own ship, a certain Ithuel Bolt
Cospetto! exclaimed the podestaThen we must set
down this Sir Smees, after all, for an arrant rogue; for this
is the very man we met at Benedetta's, the past night. An
Americano, Signor Tenente, is he not?
Why, the fellow
pretends
to be some such thing,
answered the young man, colouring, for he was loth to
confess
the wrong that had been done the deserter; but half
the British seamen one falls in with, now-a-days, call
themselves
Americans, in order to escape serving His Majesty.
I rather think this rascal is a Cornish, or a Devonshire-man;
he has the twang and the nasal sing-song of that part of the
island. If an American, however, we have a better right to
him than the French; speaking our language, and being
descended from a common ancestry, and having a common
character, it is quite unnatural for an American to serve any
but the English.
I did not know that, Vice-governatore!  I thought the
Americani a very inferior sort of people to us Europeans,
generally; and that they could scarcely claim to be our
equals, in any sense.
You are quite right, Signor Podest, said the lieutenant,
briskly; they are all you think them; and any one can
see that at a glance. Degenerate Englishmen, we call them,
in the service.
And yet you take them, occasionally, Signor Tenente;
and, as I understand from this Ithuello, frequently contrary
to their wishes, and by force, drily observed Andrea
Barrofaldi
.
How can we help it, Signore; the king has a right to;
and he has need of the services of all his own seamen; and,
in the hurry of impressing, we sometimes make a mistake.
Then, these Yankees are so like our own people, that I would
defy the devil himself to tell them apart.
The Vice-governatore thought there was something
contradictory
in all this; and he subsequently said as much to
his friend, the podest; but the matter went no farther, at
the moment, most probably because he ascertained that the
Vol. I.  11
young lieutenant was only using what might be termed a
national argument; the English government constantly
protesting
that it was impossible to distinguish one people from
the other,
quoad
this particular practice; while nothing was
more offensive, to their eyes, in the abstract, than to maintain
any affinity in appearance or characteristics.
The result of the discussion, notwithstanding, was to make
the two Italians reluctant converts to the opinion of the
Englishman
,
that the lugger was the dreaded and obnoxious
Feu-Follet. Once convinced, however, shame, revenge and
mortification, united with duty to quicken their exertions,
and to render them willing assistants in executing the schemes
of Captain Cuffe. It was, perhaps, fortunate for Raoul and
his associates, that the English officers had so strong a desire,
as Griffin expressed it, to take the lugger alive; else
might she have been destroyed where she lay, by removing
a gun or two from its proper embrasure, and planting them
behind some natural ramparts among the rocks. The night
was dark, it is true, but not so much so as to render a vessel
sufficiently distinct, at the short distance at which le
Feu-Follet
lay; and a cannonade would have been abundantly
certain.
When all parties were of a mind, as to the true character
of the little craft in the bay, a consultation was had on the
details of the course proper to be pursued. A window of
the government-house, that looked towards the direction of
Capraya, or that in which the Proserpine was expected to
arrive, was assigned to Griffin. The young man took his
station at it about midnight, in readiness to burn the
blue-lights
with which he was provided, the instant he should
discern the signals of his ship. The position of this window
was well adapted to the desired object, inasmuch as the
lights could not be seen from the town, while they were
plainly open to the sea. The same was essentially true as
to the signals of the frigate, the heights interposing between
her and the houses; and there being a still greater physical
impossibility that anything lying in the bay, should discover
an object at sea, on the northern side of the promontory.
In this manner, then, did hour after hour pass away, a
light land-breeze blowing, but coming so directly into the
bay, as to induce Raoul not to lift his kedge. Ghita, and
her uncle, Carlo Giuntotardi, had come off about ten; but
there were still no signs of movement on board the lugger.
To own the truth, Raoul was in no hurry to sail, for the
longer his departure was protracted, the longer would he
have the happiness of retaining the lovely girl on board; and
the zephyr of the succeeding day would be almost certain to
carry le Feu-Follet up to the island-like promontory of Monte
Argentaro, the point where stood the watch-towers of which
Carlo was the keeper, and in one of which he resided.
Under the circumstances, therefore, it is not surprising that
the rising of the land-breeze was overlooked, or at least
disregarded; and that Raoul sat conversing with Ghita on
deck, until long past midnight, ere he allowed her to seek
her little cabin, where everything had been properly arranged
for her reception. To own the truth, Raoul was so
confident
of having completely mystified all on shore, that he
felt no apprehensions from that quarter; and, desirous of
prolonging his present happiness as much as possible, he had
very coolly determined not to sail until the southerly air of
the morning should come; which, as usual, would just suffice
to carry him well into the canal, when the zephyr would do
the rest. Little did this hardy adventurer suspect what had
occurred on shore, since he quitted it; nor was he at all
aware that Tommaso Tonti was at watch in the harbour,
ready to report the slightest indication, on the part of the
lugger, of a wish to quit the bay.
But, while Raoul was so indifferent to the danger he ran,
the feeling was quite the reverse with Ithuel Bolt. The
Proserpine was the bane of this man's life; and he not only
hated every stick, and every timber in her, but every officer
and man who was attached to herthe king, whose colours
she wore, and the nation whose interests she served. An
active hatred is the most restless of all passions; and this
feeling rendered Ithuel keenly alive to every chance which
might still render the frigate dangerous to the lugger. He
thought it probable the former would return in quest of her
enemy; and, expressly with a view to this object, when he
turned in, at nine, he left orders to be called at two, that he
might be on the alert in season.
Ithuel was no sooner awoke, than he called two trusty
men, whom he had prepared for the purpose, entered a light
boat that was lying in readiness, on the offside of the lugger,
and pulled with muffled oars towards the eastern part of the
bay. When sufficiently distant from the town to escape
observation, he changed his course, and proceeded directly
out to sea. Half an hour sufficed to carry the boat as far
as Ithuel deemed necessary, leaving him about a mile from
the promontory, and so far to the westward, as to give him
a fair view of the window at which Griffin had taken post.
The first occurrence out of the ordinary course of things,
that struck the American, was the strong light of a lamp
shining through an upper window of the government-house
not that at which the lieutenant was posted, but one above
itand which had been placed there expressly as an
indication
to the frigate, that Griffin had arrived, and was actively
on duty. It was now two o'clock, or an hour or two
before the appearance of light, and the breeze off the
adjoining
continent was sufficiently strong to force a good sailing
vessel, whose canvass had been thickened by the damps of
night, some four knots through the water; and as Capraya
was less than thirty miles from Porto Ferrajo, abundant
time had been given to the Proserpine to gain her offing;
that ship having come from behind her cover, as soon as the
sun had set, and the haze of evening settled upon the sea.
Ithuel, usually so loquacious and gossiping, in his moments
of leisure, was silent and observant when he had anything
serious on hand. His eye was still on the window in which
the lamp was visible, the pure olive oil that was burning in
it throwing out a clear, strong flame; when suddenly a blue
light flashed beneath the place; and he got a momentary
glimpse of the body of the man who held it, as he leaned
forward from another window. The motion which now
turned his head sea-ward, was instinctive; it was just in
time to let him detect a light descending apparently into the
water, like a falling star; but which, in fact, was merely a
signal lantern of the Proserpine, coming rapidly down from
the end of her gaff.
Ah! dn you, said Ithuel, grating his teeth, and
shaking his fist in the direction of the spot where this
transient
gleam of brightness had disappeared  I know you,
and your old tricks, with your lanterns and night-signals.
Here goes the answer.
As he said this, he touched a rocket, of which he had
several in the boat, with the lighted end of the segar he had
been smoking, and it went hissing up into the air; ascending
so high as to be plainly visible from the deck of le Feu-Follet,
before it exploded. Griffin saw this signal with wonder;
the frigate noted it with embarrassment; for it was far to
seaward of the lamp; and even 'Maso conceived it necessary
to quit his station, in order to report the circumstance to the
colonel, whom he was to call, in the event of any unusual
occurrence. The common impression, however, among all
these parties was, that a second cruiser had come through
the canal, from the southward, in the course of the night,
and that she wished to notify the Proserpine of her position,
probably expecting to meet that ship off the island.
On board le Feu-Follet the effect was different. The
land-breeze
of Italy is a side-wind to vessels quitting the bay of
Porto-Ferrajo; and two minutes after the rocket exploded,
the lugger was gliding almost imperceptibly, and yet at the
rate of a knot or two, under her jigger and jib, towards the
outer side of the port, or along the very buildings past which
she had brushed the previous day. This movement was
made at the critical instant when 'Maso was off his watch;
and the ordinary sentinels of the works had other duties to
attend to. So light was this little vessel, that a breath of
air set her in motion, and nothing was easier than to get three
or four knots out of her in smooth water, especially when
she opened the comparatively vast folds of her two principal
luggs. This she did, when close under the citadel, or out
of sight of the town, the sentinels above hearing the flaps of
her canvass, without exactly understanding whence they
came. At this instant Ithuel let off a second rocket, and
the lugger showed a light on her starboard bow, so concealed,
however, on all sides but one, as to be visible only in the
direction of the boat. As this was done, she put her helm
hard down, and hauled her fore-sheet over flat to windward.
Five minutes later, Ithuel had reached her deck; and the
boat was hauled in as if it had been inflated silk. Deceived
by the second rocket, the Proserpine now made her number
with regular signal lanterns, with the intention of obtaining
that of the stranger; trusting that the promontory would
conceal it from the vessels in the bay. This told Raoul the
11 *
precise position of his enemy; and he was not sorry to see
that he was already to the westward of her; a fact that
permitted him to slip round the island again, so near in as
to be completely concealed by the back-ground of cliffs.
By the aid of an excellent night-glass, too, he was enabled
to see the frigate, distant about a league, under everything
that would draw, from her royals down, standing towards
the mouth of the bay on the larboard tack; having made her
calculations so accurately as to drop into windward of her
port, with the customary breeze off the land. At this sight
Raoul laughed, and ordered the mainsail taken in.
Half-an-hour
later, he directed the foresail to be brailed; brought his
jigger-sheet in flat; put his helm hard down; and hauled the
jib-sheet to windward.
As this last order was executed, day was just breaking
over the mountains of Radicofani and Aquapendente. By
this time le Feu-Follet lay about a league to the westward
of the promontory, and abreast of the deep bay that has
been already mentioned as being in that direction from the
town. Of course she was far beyond the danger of missiles
from the land. The night wind, however, had now failed,
and there was every appearance that the morning would be
calm. In this there was nothing extraordinary, at that
season; the winds which prevailed from the south being
usually short and light, unless accompanied by a gust. Just
as the sun appeared, the south air came, it is true, but so
lightly, as to render it barely possible to keep the little
lugger in command, by heaving-to with her head to the
south-west.
The Proserpine stood in until the day had advanced far
enough to enable her look-outs to detect le Feu-Follet braving
her, as it might be, in the western board, at the distance of
about a league and a half, under her jib and jigger, as
described
.
This sight produced a great commotion in the ship,
even the watch below tumbling up, to get another sight
of a craft so renowned for evading the pursuit of all the
English cruisers of those seas. A few minutes later, Griffin
came off, chopfallen and disappointed. His first glance at
the countenance of his superior, announced a coming
storm; for the commander of a vessel of war is no more apt
to be reasonable, under disappointment, than any other
potentate
.
Captain Cuffe had not seen fit to wait for his
subordinate
on deck; but as soon as it was ascertained that he was
coming off in a shore-boat, he retired to his cabin, leaving
orders with the first lieutenant, whose name was Winchester,
to send Mr. Griffin below, as soon as he had reported
himself
.
Well, sir, commenced Cuffe, as soon as his lieutenan
came into the after-cabin, without offering him a seat
here
we
are; and out yonder, two or three leagues at sea
is the dd Few-Folly! for so most of the seamen of the
English service pronounced Feu-Follet.
I beg your pardon, Captain Cuffe, answered Griffin,
who found himself compelled to appear a delinquent,
whatever
might be the injustice of the situation; it could not be
helped. We got in, in proper time; and I went to work with
the deputy-governor, and an old chap of a magistrate who
was with him, as soon as I could get up to the house of the
first. Yvard had been beforehand with me; and I had to
under-run about a hundred of his lying yarns, before I could
even enter the end of an idea of my own
You speak Italian, sir, like a Neapolitan born; and I
depended on your doing everything as it should have been.
Not so much like a Neapolitan, I hope, Captain Cuffe,
as like a Tuscan, or a Roman, returned Griffin, biting his
lip. After an hour of pretty hard, and lawyer-like work,
and overhauling all the documents, I did succeed in
convincing
the two Elban gentry of my own character, and of
that of the lugger!
And while you were playing advocate, Master Raoul
Yvard coolly lifted his anchor, and walked out of the bay,
as if he were just stepping into his garden, to pick a
nosegay
for his sweetheart?
No, sir, nothing of the sort happened. As soon as I
had satisfied the Signor Barrofaldi, the vice-governatore
Veechy-govern-the-tory.  Dn all veechys, and
dn all the governatorys, too; do speak English, Griffin,
on board an English ship, if you please, even should your
Italian happen to be Tuscan. Call the fellow vice-governor,
at once, if that be his rank.
Well, sir, as soon as I had satisfied the vice-governor
that the lugger was an enemy, and that we were friends,
everything went smoothly enough. He wanted to sink the
lugger, as she lay at her anchor.
And why the devil didn't he do it? Two or three heavy
shot would have given her a stronger dose than she could
bear.
You know, Captain Cuffe, it has all along been your
wish to take her alive. I thought it would tell so well for
the ship, to have it to say she had
caught
le Feu-Follet, that
I opposed the project. I know Mr. Winchester hopes to get
her, as a reward for carrying her, himself.
Ay, and that would make you first. Well, sir, even if
you didn't sink her, it was no reason for letting her escape.
We could not prevent it, Captain Cuffe. I had a
look-out
set upon herone of the very best men in Porto Ferrajo,
as everybody will tell you, sir; and I made the signals of
the lamp and the blue-lights, as agreed upon; and, the ship
answering, I naturally thought all was as it should be,
until
And who burnt the rockets, off here, where we are at
this moment? They deceived me, for I took them to be
signals of their presence, from the Weasel or the Sparrow.
When I saw those rockets, Griffin, I was just as certain of
the Few-Folly, as I am now of having my own ship!
Yes, sir, those rockets did all the mischief; for, I have
since learned, that, as soon as the first one was thrown,
Master Yvard tripped his kedge, and went out of the bay as
quietly as one goes out of a dining-room, when he don't
wish to disturb the company.
Ay, he took
French
leave, the
by sans culotte
,
returned the captain, putting himself in a better humour
with his own pun. But did you
see
nothing of all this?
The first I knew of the matter, sir, was seeing the
lugger
gliding along under the rocks, so close in, that you
might have jumped aboard her; and it was too late to stop
her. Before those lazy
far nientes
could have pricked and
primed, he was out of gun-shot.
Lazy what? demanded the captain.
Far nientes
, sir; which is a nickname we give these
siesta-gentry, you know, Captain Cuffe.
I know nothing about it, sir; and I'll thank you always
to speak to me in English, Mr. Griffin. That is a language
which, I flatter myself, I understand; and it's quite good
enough for all my wants.
Yes, sir, and for any man's wants. I'm sure, I am
sorry I can speak Italian, since it has led to this mistake.
PohpohGriffin, you mustn't lay everything to heart,
that comes wrong end foremost. Dine with me to-day, and
we'll talk the matter over at leisure.
CHAPTER IX.
Now in the fervid noon the smooth bright sea
Heaves slowly, for the wandering winds are dead
That stirr'd it into foam. The lonely ship
Rolls wearily, and idly flap the sails
Against the creaking masts. The lightest sound
Is lost not on the ear, and things minute
Attract the observant eye.
Richardson
.
Thus
terminated the setting-down, like many others that
Captain Cuffe had resolved to give, but which usually ended
in a return to good-nature and reason. The steward was
told to set a plate for Mr. Griffin, among the other guests,
and then the commander of the frigate followed the
lieutenant
on deck. Here he found every officer in the ship, all
looking at le Feu-Follet with longing eyes, and most of them
admiring her appearance, as she lay on the mirror-like
Mediterranean, with the two light sails mentioned, just
holding
her stationary.
A regular-built snake-in-the-grass! growled the
boatswain
,
Mr. Strand, who was taking a look at the lugger over
the hammock-cloths of the waist, as he stood on the heel of
a spare top-mast to do so; I never put eyes on a scamp
that had a more dn-my-eyes look!
This was said in a sort of soliloquy, for Strand was not
exactly privileged to address a quarter-deck officer on such
an occasion, though several stood within hearing, and was
far too great a man to enlighten his subordinates with his
cogitations. It was overheard by Cuffe, however, who just
at that instant stepped into the gangway to make an
examination
for himself.
It is a snake-
out
-of-the-grass, rather, Strand, observed
the captain, for
he
could speak to whom he pleased, without
presumption or degradation. Had she stayed in port, now,
she would have been
in
the grass, and we might have
scotched her.
Well, your honour, we can
English
her, as it is; and
that'll be quite as nat'ral, and quite as much to the purpose,
as
Scotching
her, any day, answered Strand, who, being
a native of London, had a magnificent sort of feeling towards
all the dependencies of the empire, and to whom the word
scotch, in that sense, was Greek, though he well understood
what it meant, to clap a Scotchman on a rope; we are
likely to have a flat calm all the morning, and our boats are
in capital order; and, then, nothing will be more agreeable
to our gentlemen, than a row.
Strand was a grey-headed seaman, and he had served
with Captain Cuffe when the latter was a midshipman, and
had even commanded the top, of which the present boatswain
had been the captain. He knew the cut of the captain's
jib better than any other man in the Proserpine, and often
succeeded with his suggestions, when Winchester and the
other lieutenants failed. His superior now turned round,
and looked him intently in the face, as if struck with the
notion the other thus indirectly laid before him. This
movement
was noted; and, at a sign secretly given by Winchester,
the whole crew gave three hearty cheers; Strand leading off,
as soon as he caught the idea. This was the only manner
in which the crew of a man-of-war can express their
wishes to their commander; it being always tolerated, in
a-navy
,
to hurrah, by way of showing the courage of a ship's
company. Cuffe walked aft, in a thoughtful manner, and
descended to his cabin again; but a servant soon came up, to
say that the captain desired to see the first lieutenant.
I do not half like this boat-service, in open day-light,
Winchester, observed the senior, beckoning to the other to
take a chair. The least bungling may spoil it all; and
then it's ten to one but your ship goes half-manned for a
twelvemonth, until you are driven to pressing from colliers
and neutrals.
But, we hope, sir, there'll be no bungling in anything
that the Proserpine undertakes. Nine times in ten, an
English
man-of-war succeeds, when she makes a bold dash in
boats, against one of these picaroons. This lugger is so
low in the water, too, that it will be like stepping from one
cutter into another to get upon her decks; and then, sir,
suppose, you don't doubt what Englishmen will do?
Ay, Winchester, once on her deck, I make no doubt
you'd carry her; but it may not be so easy as you imagine,
to get on her deck. Of all duty to a captain, this of
sending
off boats is the most unpleasant. He cannot go himself,
and if anything unfortunate turns up, he never forgives
himself
.
Now, it's a very different thing with a fight in which
all share alike; and the good or evil comes equally on all
hands.
Quite true, Captain Cuffe; and yet this is the only
chance that the lieutenants have for getting ahead a little,
out of the regular course. I have heard, sir, that you were
made commander, for cutting out some coasters, in the
beginning of the war.
You have not been misinformed; and a devil of a risk
we all ran. Luck saved usand that was all. One more
fire from a cursed carronade, would have given a Flemish
account of the whole party; for, once get a little under, and
you suffer like game in a
batteau
. Captain Cuffe wished
to say
battue
; but despising foreign languages, he generally
made sad work with them, whenever he did condescend to
resort to their terms, however familiar. This Raoul
Yvard is a devil incarnate, himself, at this boarding work;
and is said to have taken off the head of a master's mate, of
the Theseus, with one clip of his sword, when he retook that
ship's prize, in the affair of last winterthat which happened
off Alicant!
I'll warrant you, sir, the master's mate was some
slender-necked
chap, that might better have been at home,
craning at the girls, as they come out of a church-door. I
should like to see Raoul Yvard, or any Frenchman who
was ever born, take off
my
head at a single clip!
Well, Winchester, to be frank with you, I should
not
.
You are a good first; and that is an office in which a man
usually wants all the head he has; and I'm not at all certain
you have any to spare. I wonder if one could not hire a
felucca, or something larger than a boat, in this place, by
means of which we could play a trick upon this fellow, and
effect our purpose quite as well as by going up to him in our
open boats, bull-dog fashion?
No question of it at all, sir; Griffin says there are a
dozen feluccas in port here, all afraid to budge an inch, in
consequence of this chap's being in the offing. Now one of
these trying to slip along shore might just serve as a bait for
him, and then he would be famously hooked.
I think I have it, Winchester. You understand; we
have not yet been seen to communicate with the town; and
luckily, our French colours have been flying all the morning.
Our head, too, is in-shore; and we shall drift so far to the
eastward, in a few minutes, as will shut in our hull, if not
our upper sails, from the lugger, where she now lies. As
soon as this is done, you shall be off, with forty picked men,
for the shore. Engage a felucca, and come out, stealing
along the rocks, as close as you can, as if distrusting
us
.
In due time, we will chase you, in the boats; and then you
must make for the lugger for protection, as fast as you can,
when, betwixt the two, I'll answer for it, you get this Master
Yvard, by fair means or foul.
Winchester was delighted with the scheme; and in less
than five minutes, orders were issued for the men to be
detailed and armed. Then a conference was held, as to all
the minor arrangements; when, the ship having become shut
in from the lugger by the promontory, as expected, the boats
departed. Half-an-hour later, or just as the Proserpine, after
waring, had got near the point where the lugger would be
again open, the boats returned, and were run up. Presently
the two vessels were again in sight of each other, everything,
on board of each, remaining, apparently,
in statu quo
.
Thus far, certainly, the stratagem had been adroitly
managed
.
To add to it, the batteries now fired ten or twelve
guns at the frigate, taking very good care not to hit her;
which the Proserpine returned, under the French ensign,
having used the still greater precaution of drawing the shot.
All this was done by an arrangement between Winchester
and Andrea Barrofaldi, and with the sole view to induce
Raoul Yvard to fancy that he was still believed to be an
Englishman, by the worthy vice-governatore, while the ship
in the offing was taken for an enemy. A light air from
the southward, which lasted from eight to nine o'clock,
allowed the frigate to get somewhat more of an offing, the
while, placing her seemingly beyond the reach of danger.
During the prevalence of the light air mentioned, Raoul
Yvard did not see fit to stir tack or sheet, as it is termed,
among seamen. Le Feu-Follet remained so stationary,
that, had she been set by compass, from any station on the
shore, her direction would not have varied a degree the
whole time. But this hour of comparative breeze sufficed to
enable Winchester to get out of the harbour with la Divina
Providenza, the felucca he had hired, and to round the
promontory
,
under the seeming protection of the guns by which
it was crowned; coming in view of the lugger precisely as
the latter relieved her man at the helm for ten o'clock.
There were eight or nine men visible on the felucca's deck,
all dressed in the guise of Italians, with caps and striped
shirts of cotton. Thirty-five men were concealed in the
hold.
Thus far everything was favourable to the wishes of
Captain
Cuffe and his followers. The frigate was about a league
from the lugger, and half that distance from la Divina
Providenza
;
the latter had got fairly to sea, and was slowly
coming to a situation from which it might seem reasonable,
and a matter of course, for the Proserpine to send boats in
chase; while the manner in which she gradually drew
nearer to the lugger, was not such as to excite distrust, or
to appear, in the least, designed. The wind, too, had got to
be so light, as to favour the whole scheme.
It is not to be supposed that Raoul Yvard and his
followers
were unobservant of what was passing. It is true, that
the latter wilfully protracted his departure, under the
pretence
that it was safer to have his enemy in sight, during
the day, knowing how easy it would be to elude him, in the
dark; but, in reality, that he might prolong the pleasure of
having Ghita on board; and it is also true, that he had
passed a delightful hour, that morning, in the cabin; but,
then, his understanding eye noted the minutest fact that
Vol. I.  12
occurred; and his orders were always ready to meet any
emergency that might arise. Very different was the case
with Ithuel. The Proserpine was his bane; and, even while
eating his breakfast, which he took on the heel of the
bowsprit
,
expressly with that intent, his eye was seldom a minute
off the frigate, unless it was for the short period she was shut
in by the land. It was impossible for any one in the lugger
to say, whether her character was, or was not known in
Porto Ferrajo; but the circumstance of the blue-lights burnt
in the government-house, itself, and witnessed by Ithuel,
rendered
the latter, to say the least, probable, and induced more
caution than might otherwise have been shown. Still, there
was no reason to suspect the character of the felucca; and
the confident manner in which she came down towards the
lugger, though considerably in-shore of her, gave reason to
believe that
she
, at least, was ignorant that le Feu-Follet
was an enemy.
That felucca is the craft which lay near the landing,
quietly observed Raoul, who had now come on the forecastle
with a view to converse with Ithuel; her name is la
Divina
Providenza; she is given to smuggling between
Leghorn
and Corsica, and is probably bound to the latter, at
this moment. It is a bold step, too, to stand directly for
her port, under such circumstances!
Leghorn is a free port, returned Ithuel; and
smuggling
is not needed.
Ay, free as to friends, but not free to come and go,
between enemies. No port is free, in that sense; it being
treason for a craft to communicate with the foe, unless she
happen to be le Feu-Follet, observed Raoul, laughing;
we
are
privileged,
mon brave!
Corsica or Capraya, she'll reach neither, to-day, unless
she find more wind. I do not understand why the man
has sailed, with no more air than will serve to blow out a
pocket-handkerchief.
These little feluccas, like our little lugger, slip along
even when there seems to be no wind at all. Then, he may
be bound to Bastia; in which case he is wise in getting an
offing before the zephyr sets in for the afternoon. Let him
get a league or two out here, more to the northwest, and he
can make a straight wake to Bastia, after his siesta is over.
Ay, there go them greedy Englishmen a'rter him!
said Ithuel; it's as I expected; let 'em see the chance of
making a guinea, and they'll strive for it, though it be ag'in
law, or ag'in natur'. Now, what have they to do with a
Neapolitan felucca; England being a sworn friend of
Naples?
Raoul made no reply to this, but stood watching the
movement in silence. The reader will readily enough
understand that Ithuel's remark was elicited by the
appearance
of the boats, which, five in number, at that instant
pulled off from the frigate's side, and proceeded steadily
towards the felucca.
It may be necessary now to mention the relative positions
of the parties, the hour, and the precise state of the weather,
with a view to give the reader clear ideas of the events that
succeeded. Le Feu-Follet had not materially changed her
place, since her jib-sheet was first hauled over. She still
lay about a league, a little north-of-west, from the residence
of Andrea Barrofaldi, and in plain view of it; a deep bay
being south of her, and abeam. No alterations had been
made in her canvass, or her helm; most of the first being
still in the brails, and the latter down. As the head of the
frigate had been kept to the westward, for the last hour, she
had forged some distance in that direction, and was now
quite as near the lugger as was the promontory, though
near two miles off the land. Her courses were hauled up, on
account of the lightness of the air; but all her upper-sails
stood, and were carefully watched and trimmed, in order to
make the most of the cats'-paws, or rather, of the breathings
of the atmosphere, which occasionally caused the royals to
swell outward. On the whole, she might be drawing nearer
to the lugger, at the rate of about a knot in an hour. La
Divina Providenza was just out of gun-shot from the frigate,
and about a mile from the lugger, when the boats shoved off
from the former, though quite near the land, just opening
the bay so often named. The boats, of course, were pulling
in a straight line from the vessel they had just left, towards
that of which they were in pursuit.
As to the time, the day had advanced as far as eleven,
which is a portion of the twenty-four hours when the
Mediterranean
,
in the summer months, is apt to be as smooth as
a mirror, and as calm as if it never knew a tempest.
Throughout the morning, there had been some irregularity
in the currents of air; the southerly breeze, generally light,
and frequently fickle, having been even more light and
baffling than common. Still, as has been seen, there was
sufficient air to force a vessel through the water; and, had
Raoul been as diligent as the people of the two other crafts,
he might, at that moment, have been off the western end of
the island, and far out of harm's way. As it was, he had
continued watching the result, but permitting all the other
parties gradually to approach him.
It must be allowed, that the ruse of the felucca was well
planned; and it now seemed about to be admirably executed.
Had it not been for Ithuel's very positive knowledge of the
shiphis entire certainty of her being his old prison, as he
bitterly called her, it is not improbable that the lugger's crew
might have been the dupe of so much well-acted ingenuity;
and, as it was, opinions were greatly divided, Raoul,
himself
,
being more than half disposed to fancy that his
American
ally, for once, was wrong, and that the ship in sight
was actually what she professed to be  a cruiser of the
republic.
Both Winchester, who was in la Divina Providenza, and
Griffin, who commanded the boats, played their parts in
perfection. They understood too well the character of the
wily and practised foe with whom they had to deal, to
neglect
the smallest of the details of their well-concerted plan.
Instead of heading towards the lugger, as soon as the chase
commenced, the felucca appeared disposed to enter the bay,
and to find an anchorage under the protection of a small
battery that had been planted, for this express purpose, near
its head. But the distance was so great, as obviously to
render such an experiment bootless; and, after looking in
that direction a few minutes, the head of la Divina
Providenza
was laid off shore, and she made every possible effort
to put herself under the cover of the lugger. All this was
done in plain view of Raoul, whose glass was constantly at
his eye, and who studied the smallest movement with jealous
distrust. Winchester, fortunately for his purpose, was a
dark-complexioned man, of moderate stature, and with bushy
whiskers, such as a man-of-war's-man is apt to cultivate, on
a long cruise; and, in his red Phrygian cap, striped shirt,
and white cotton trowsers, he looked the Italian as well as
could have been desired. The men in sight, too, had been
selected for their appearance, several of them being actually
foreigners, born on the shores of the Mediterranean; it being
seldom, indeed, that the crew of an English, or an American
vessel of war, does not afford a representation of half the
maritime nations of the earth. These men exhibited a proper
degree of confusion and alarm, too; running to and fro, as
soon as the chase became lively; exerting themselves, but
doing it without order and concert. At length, the wind
failing almost entirely, they got out two sweeps, and began
to pull lustily; the real, as well as the apparent desire being
to get as near as possible to the lugger.
Peste!
exclaimed Raoul; all this seems right
what if the frigate should be French, after all. These men
in the boats look like my brave compatriotes!
They are regular John Bulls, answered Ithuel,
positively
,
and the ship is the spiteful Proserp
y
ne, for so
the New-Hampshire-man always called his old prison. As
for them French hats, and the way they have of rowing,
they act it all for a take-in. Just let a six-pound shot in
among 'em, and see how they'll throw off their French airs,
and take to their English schooling.
I'll not do that; for we might injure a friend. What
are those fellows in the felucca about, now?
Why, they've got a small gun  yes, it's a
twelve-pound
carronade, under the tarpaulin, for'rard of their
foremast
,
and they're clearin' it away for sarvice. We shall
have something doin' 'fore the end of the week!
Bienit is as you sayand, voil, they train the piece
on the boats!
As this was said, the felucca was half concealed in smoke.
Then came the discharge of the gun. The shot was seen
skipping along the water, at a safe distance from the leading
boat, certainly, and yet sufficiently near to make it pass for
indifferent gunnery. This leading boat was the Proserpine's
launch, which carried a similar carronade on its grating,
forward, and not half-a-minute was suffered to pass, before
the fire was returned. So steady were the men, and so
nicely were all the parts of this plot calculated, that the shot
12 *
came whistling through the air, in a direct line for the
felucca, striking its mainyard about half-way between the
mast and the peak of the sail, letting the former down by the
run.
Human natur'! ejaculated Ithuel  this is acting up
to the contract, dollars and cents! Captain Rule, they
shoot better in sport, than when they're in downright
airnest
.
This looks like real work, answered Raoul. A man
does not often shoot away the mainyard of his friend, on
purpose.
As soon as the crews of the boats saw the end of the yard
come down, they ceased rowing, and gave three hearty
cheers, taking the signal from Griffin, who stood erect in
the stern of the launch, to give it.
Bah!cried Raoulthese are English John Bulls,
without a shadow of doubt. Who ever knew the men of
the republic shout like so many Italian fantoccini, pulled by
wires. Ah! Messieurs les Anglais, you have betrayed your
secret by your infernal throats; now look to hear us tell
the remainder of the story.
Ithuel rubbed his hands with delight, perfectly satisfied
that Raoul could no longer be deceived, though the fire
between the felucca and the launch was kept up with spirit,
the shooting being such as might have done credit to a
bon
fide
conflict. All this time the sweeps of the felucca were
plied, the boats advancing at least two feet to the chase's
one. La Divina Providenza might now have been three
hundred yards from the lugger; and the launch, the nearest
of the pursuers, about the same distance astern of the felucca.
Ten minutes more would certainly bring the seeming
combatants
alongside of each other.
Raoul ordered the sweeps of le Feu-Follet to be run out,
and manned. At the same time, her guns, twelve-pound
carronades, were cast loose, and primed. Of these she had
four of a side, while the two sixes on her forecastle were
prepared for similar service. When everything was ready,
the twelve sweeps dropped into the water, as by a common
instinct, and a powerful effort started the lugger ahead.
Her jib and jigger were both brailed at that instant. A
single minute sufficed to teach Winchester how hopeless
pursuit would be in the felucca, if not in the boats
themselves
,
should the lugger endeavour to escape in this manner;
it being quite practicable for her strong crew to force her
through the water, by means of her sweeps alone, from
three to three and a half knots in the hour. But flight did
not appear to be her object; for her head was laid towards
la Divina Providenza, as if, deceived by the artifice of the
English, she intended to prevent the capture of the felucca,
and to cover a friend.
Raoul, however, understood himself far better than this
supposition would give reason to suppose. He swept the
lugger up in a line with la Divina Providenza and the boats,
in the first place, as the position in which she would be the
least likely to suffer from the fire of the latter; well knowing
that whatever shot were thrown, were purposely sent so high
as to do no mischief; and, in the second place, that he
might bring his enemies in a single range from his own guns.
In the meanwhile, the felucca and the boats not only
continued
to use their carronades, but they commenced on both
sides a brisk fire of musketry; the former being now distant
only a hundred yards from le Feu-Follet, exceedingly hard
pressed by her adversaries, so far as appearances were
concerned
.
There being no wind at all, at this juncture, the
little there had been having been entirely killed by the
concussions
of the guns, the sea was getting to be fast covered
with smoke; the felucca, in particular, showing more than
common of the wreathy canopy, over her decks, and about
her spars; for, in truth, powder was burnt in considerable
quantities, in different parts of the vessel, with this express
object. Ithuel observed, too, that in the midst of this
confusion
and cloud, the crew of la Divina Providenza was
increasing
in numbers, instead of diminishing by the combat,
four sweeps next being out, each manned by three men,
while near twenty more were shortly visible, running to and
fro, and shouting to each other in a language that was
intended
to be Italian, but which sounded much more, in his
practised ears, like bastard English. The felucca was not
fifty yards distant, when this clamour became the loudest;
and the crisis was near. The cheers of the boats on the
other side of her, proclaimed the quick approach of Griffin
and his party; the bows of la Divina Providenza having
been laid, in a species of blind haste, directly in a line which
would carry her athwart-hawse of le Feu-Follet.
Mes enfans
,shouted Raoul
soyez calmes
Fire!
The whole of the five guns, loaded heavily with canister,
were discharged into the smoke of la Divina Providenza.
The shrieks that succeeded, sufficiently proclaimed with
what effect. A pause of solemn, wondering silence followed,
on the part of the English; and then arose a manly shout,
as if, prepared for every contingency, they were resolved to
brave the worst. The boats were next seen coming round
the bows and stern of the felucca, dashing earnestly at their
real enemy, while their two carronades returned the fire,
this time loaded and aimed with deadly intent. But it was
too late for success. As Griffin, in the launch, came out of
la Divina Providenza's smoke, he saw the lugger's sails all
opened, and filled with a dying effort of the southerly air.
So light, however, was le Feu-Follet, that a duck could
hardly have sailed away more readily from the fowler, than
this little craft shot ahead, clearing the smoke, and leaving
her pursuers an additional hundred yards behind her. As
the air seemed likely to stand long enough to place his party
in extreme jeopardy, under the fire of the French,
Winchester
promptly ordered the boats to relinquish the pursuit, and
to rally around the felucca. This command was reluctantly
obeyed, when a moment was given to both sides for
deliberation
.
Le Feu-Follet had sustained no injury worth mentioning;
but the English had not less than a dozen men slain or hurt.
Among the latter was Winchester, himself; and as he saw
that any success which followed would fall principally to the
share of his subordinate, his wound greatly indisposed him
to pursue any further a struggle that was nearly hopeless,
as it was. Not so with Raoul Yvard, however.
Perceiving
that the frigate had taken the breeze, as well as
himself
,
and that she was stealing along in the direction of the
combatants, he determined to take an ample revenge for the
audacity of the attempt, and then proceed on his voyage.
The lugger accordingly tacked, and passed to windward
of the felucca, delivering a close and brisk fire as she
approached
.
At first this fire was returned, but the opposition
soon ceased; and when le Feu-Follet ranged up past her
adversary, a few yards to windward, it was seen that the
English had deserted her to a man, carrying off their
wounded. The boats were pulling through the smoke,
towards the bay, taking a direction opposite to that in which
the lugger's head was laid. It would have been easy for
the French to ware, and probably to have overtaken the
fugitives, sinking or capturing them to a man; but there was
a touch of high chivalry in the character of Raoul Yvard,
and he declared, that as the artifice had been ingeniously
planned, and daringly attempted, he would follow up his
success no farther. Perhaps the appearance of Ghita on
deck, imploring him to be merciful, had its influence; it is
certain that not another shot did he allow to be fired at the
enemy. Instead of pursuing her advantage, in this manner,
the lugger took in her after-sails, wore short round on her
heel, came to the wind to-leeward of the felucca, shivered all
forward, set her jigger again, and luffed up so near what
may be called the prize, that the two vessels came together
so gently as not to break an egg, as it is termed. A single
rope secured the felucca to the lugger, and Raoul, Ithuel,
and a few more, stepped on board the former.
The decks of la Divina Providenza were reeking with
blood; and grape and canister were sticking in handsful, in
different parts of the vessel. Three dead bodies were found
in her hold, but nothing having life was met with on board.
There was a tar-bucket filled at hand, and this was placed
beneath the hatch, covered with all the combustible materials
that could be laid hold of, and set on fire. So active were
the flames, at that dry season, that Raoul regretted he had
not taken the precaution to awaken them after he had
removed
his own vessel; but the southerly air continuing, he
was enabled to get to a safe distance before they actually
ascended the felucca's rigging, and seized upn her sails.
Ten minutes were thus lost, and they had sufficed to carry
the boats out of gun-shot, in-shore, and to bring the frigate
very nearly down within gun-shot from the south-east. But,
hauling aft all his sheets, Raoul soon took the lugger clear
of her flaming prize; and then she stood towards the west
end of Elba, going, as usual, in so light an air, three feet to
the frigate's two. The hour, however, was not favourable
to the continuance of the breeze, and in ten more minutes it
would have puzzled the keenest senses to have detected the
slightest current of air over the surface of the sea. Such
flickerings of the lamp, before it burnt entirely out, were
common, and Raoul felt certain that there would be no more
wind that day, until they got the zephyr. Accordingly, he
directed all the sails to be hauled up, an awning to be spread
over the quarter-deck, and permission was given to the
people to attend to their own affairs. The frigate, too,
seemed to be aware that it was the moment for the siesta of
vessels, as well as of men; for she clewed up her royals and
top-gallant-sails, brailed her jib and spanker, hauled up her
courses, and lay on the water as motionless as if sticking on
a shoal. The two vessels were barely long-gun shot apart,
and, under ordinary circumstances, the larger might have
seen fit to attack the smaller in boats; but the lesson just
given was a sufficient pledge to the French, against the
renewal
of any such attempt, and they scarcely paid their
neighbour's prowess the compliment to watch him.
Half-an-hour
later, when Winchester got back to the ship,
limping
with a hurt in his leg, and with his people exhausted and
mortified, it was found that the undertaking had cost the
lives of seven good men, besides the temporary suspension
of the services of fifteen more.
Captain Cuffe was aware that his enterprise had failed, as
soon as he perceived the lugger under her canvass, playing
around the felucca and the boats, held in perfect command.
But, when he discovered the latter pulling for the shore, he
was certain that they must have suffered, and he was
prepared
to learn a serious loss, though not one that bore so
large a proportion to the whole numbers of the party sent
on the expedition. Winchester he considerately declined
questioning, while his wound was being dressed; but Griffin
was summoned to his cabin, as soon as the boats were
hoisted in and stowed.
Well, Mr. Griffin, a dd pretty scrape is this, into
which you have led me, among you, with your wish to go
boating about after luggers, and Raoul Yvards! What will
the admiral say, when he comes to hear of twenty-two men's
being laid on the shelf, and a felucca to be paid for, as a
morning's amusement?
Really, Captain Cuffe, we did our best; but a man might
as well have attempted to put out Vesuvius with snow-balls,
as to stand the canister of that infernal lugger! I don't think
there was a square yard in the felucca that was not peppered.
The men never behaved better; and down to the moment
when we last cheered, I was as sure of le Feu-Follet, as I
ever was of my own promotion.
Ay, they needn't call her le Few-Folly any longer, the
Great-Folly being a better name. What the devil did you
cheer for at all, sir? did you ever know a Frenchman cheer,
in your life? That very cheering was the cause of your
being found out, before you had time to close. You should
have shouted
vive la rpublique
, as all their craft do, when
we engage them. A regular English hurrah would split a
Frenchman's throat.
I believe we did make a mistake there, sir; but I never
was in an action in which we did not cheer; and when it
got to be warmor to
seem
warmI forgot myself, a little.
But, we should have had her, sir, for all that, had it not been
for one thing.
And what is that, pray? You know, Griffin, I must
have something plausible to tell the admiral; it will never do
to have it published in the gazette that we were thrashed by
our own hallooing.
I was about to say, Captain Cuffe, that had not the
lugger fired her first broadside just as she did, and had she
given us time to get out of the range of her shot, we
should have come in upon her before she could have loaded
again, and carried her, in spite of the breeze that so much
favoured her. Our having three men hurt in the launch,
made some difference, too, and set as many oars catching
crabs, at a most critical instant. Everything depends on
chance, in these matters, you know, sir, and that was our
bad luck.
Umph!It will never do to tell Nelson that.`
Everything
was going well, my lord, until three of the launch's
people went to work catching crabs with their oars, which
threw the boat a-stern.'No, no,
that
will never do for a
gazette. Let me see, Griffin; after all, the lugger made off
from youyou would have had her, had she not made sail,
and stood to the southward and westward on a bowline?
Yes, sir, she certainly did
that
. Had she not made sail,
as you say, nothing could have prevented our getting
alongside
.
Well, then, she ran. Wind sprung up, enemy made
sailevery attempt to get alongside unsuccessful.Brave
fellows, cheering and doing their utmost.Not so bad an
account, after allbut, how about that dd felucca?
You see, she is burned to the water's edge, and will go down
in a few minutes.
Very true, Captain Cuffe, but not a Frenchman entered
her, while we were there
Yes, I now see how it wasthrew all hands into the
boats, in chase, the felucca being too unwieldy, and every
effort to get alongside unsuccessful. He's a devil of a
fellow
,
that Nelson & Bronte; and I had rather hear the
thunder
of ten thousand tempests, than get one of his tempestuous
letters. Well, I think I understand the affair, now, and
shall speak of you all as you deserve. 'T was a gallant
thing, though it failed. You deserved success, whatever
may have caused you to lose it.
In this Captain Cuffe was nearer right than in anything
else he uttered on the occasion.
CHAPTER X.
O! 'tis a thought sublime, that man can force
A path upon the waste, can find a way
Where all is trackless, and compel the winds,
Those freest agents of Almighty power,
To lend their untamed wings, and bear him on
To distant climos.
Ware
.
The
situation of Ghita Caraccioli, on board the lugger,
was of the most unpleasant nature, during the fierce struggle
we have related. Fortunately, for her, this struggle was
very short, Raoul having kept her in profound ignorance of
the approach of any danger, until the instant le Feu-Follet
commenced her fire. It is true, she had heard the guns
between the felucca and the boats, but this she had been told
was an affair in which the privateer had no participation;
and the reports sounding distant, to one in the cabin, she
had been easily deceived. While the actual conflict was
going on, she was on her knees, at the side of her uncle;
and the moment it ceased, she appeared on deck, and
interposed
to save the fugitives, in the manner related.
Now, however, the scene was entirely changed. The
lugger had escaped all damage, worthy of notice; her decks
had not been stained with blood; and her success had been
as complete as could be desired. In addition to these
advantages
,
the result removed all apprehension from the only
source of danger that Raoul thought could exist, as between
his own vessel and the frigate; or a boat-attack in a calm;
for men who had just been so roughly handled in an
enterprise
so well concealed, would not be likely to renew the
attempt while they still smarted under the influence of the
late repulse. Affairs of this sort exact all the discipline and
resolution that a well-regulated service can afford; and are
not to be thought of under the temporary demoralization of
defeat. All in the lugger, therefore, considered this collision
with the Proserpine at an end, for the moment at least.
Ghita had dined, for the day had now turned some time,
and the girl had come on deck to escape the confinement of
a very small cabin, leaving her uncle to enjoy his customary
siesta
. She was seated under the awning of the
quarter-deck
,
using her needle, as was her wont, at that hour, on
the heights of Argentaro. Raoul had placed himself on a
gun-slide, near her, and Ithuel was busy within a few feet
of them, dissecting a spy-glass, with a view to clean its
lenses.
I suppose, the most excellent Andrea Barrofaldi will
sing a Te Deum for his escape from our fangs, suddenly
exclaimed Raoul, laughing.
Pardie!
he is a great
historian
,
and every way fit to write an account of this great
victory, which Monsieur l'Anglais, l bas, is about to send
to his government!
And you, Raoul, have you no occasion for a Te Deum,
after your escape? demanded Ghita, gently, and yet with
emphasis. Is there no God for you to thank, as well as
for the vice-governatore?
Vol. I  13
Peste!
our French deity is little thought of, just now,
Ghita. Republics, as you know, have no great faith in
religionis it not so, mon brave Amrican? Tell us,
Etooell
;
have you any religion in America?
As Ithuel had often heard Raoul's opinions on this subject,
and knew the prevailing state of France, in this particular,
he neither felt nor expressed any surprise at the question.
Still, the idea ran counter to all his own notions and
prejudices
,
he having been early taught to respect religion, even
when he was most serving the devil. In a word, Ithuel
was one of those descendants of Puritanism, who,
Godward
,
as it is termed, was quite unexceptionable, so far
as his theory extended; but who, manward was, as the
Scribes and Pharisees. Nevertheless, as he expressed it
himself, he always stood up for religion; a fact that his
English companions had commented on in jokes; maintaining
that he even stood up when the rest of the ship's
company
were on their knees.
I'm a little afraid, Monsieur Rule, he answered, that
in France you have entered the rope of republicanism at the
wrong eend. In Ameriky, we even put religion before
dollars
;
and if that isn't convincing, I'll give it up. Now, I
do wish you could see a Sunday once in the Granite State,
Signorina Ghita, that you might get some notion what our
western religion ra'ally is.
All real religionall real devotion to God, is, or ought
to be, the same, Signor Ithuello, whether in the east or in
the west. A Christian, is a Christian; let him live and die
where he may.
That's not exactly platform, I fancy. Why, Lord bless
ye, young lady
your
religion, now, is no more like
mine
,
than my religion is like that of the Archbishop of
Canter-bury's
,
or Monsieur Rule's, here!
La mienne! exclaimed Raoul  I pretend to none,
mon brave; there can be no likeness to nothing.
Ghita's glance was kind, rather than reproachful; but it
was profoundly sorrowful.
In what can our religion differ, she asked, if we are
both Christians? Americans, or Italians, it is all the same.
That comes of knowing nothing about Ameriky, said
Ithuel, filled with the conceit of his own opinion of himself,
and of the part of the world from which he came. In the
first place, you have a Pope, and cardinals, and bishops, and
all such things, in your religion; while we have none.
Certainly, there is the Holy Father, and there are
cardinals
;
but they are not my religion, answered Ghita,
looking
surprised. Bishops, it is true, are appointed of God,
and form part of his church; and the bishop of Rome is the
head of the church on earthbut nothing more.
Nothing more!Don't you worship images, and take off
and put on garments at your prayers, and kneel down in a
make-believe, profane way; and don't you turn everything
into vain ceremonies?
Had Ithuel been engaged, body and soul, in maintaining
one of the propositions of the Oxford Tracts' controversy, he
could not have uttered these words with greater zeal, or with
a more self-righteous emotion. His mind was stored with
the most vulgar accusations of an exceedingly vulgar set of
sectarian distinctions; and he fancied it a high proof of
Protestant perfection, to hold all the discarded usages in
abhorrence. On the other hand, Ghita listened with
surprise
;
for, to her, the estimation in which the rites of the
Romish church were held by the great bulk of Protestants,
was a profound secret. The idea of worshipping an image,
never crossed her innocent mind; and although she often
knelt before her own little ivory crucifix, she had never
supposed
any could be so ignorant as to confound the mere
material representation of the sacrifice it was meant to
pourtary
,
with the divine expiation itself.
It is decent to use proper vestments, at the altar, she
replied; and its servants ought not to be clad like other
men. We know it is the heart, the soul, that must be
touched, to find favour with God; but this does not make
the outward semblance of respect that we show even to each
other, the less necessary. As to worshipping imagesthat
would be idolatry; and as bad as the poor heathens,
themselves
.
Ithuel looked mystified; for he never doubted, in the least,
that the worshipping of images was a material part of
Catholic
devotion; and, as for the pope and the cardinals, he
deemed them all as indispensable to the creed of this church;
as he fancied it important, in his own, that the priests should
not wear gowns; and that the edifices in which they
worshipped
,
should have square-topped windows. Absurd as
all this may seem, to-day, and wicked as it will probably
appear a century hence, it formed, and forms, no small part
of sectarian belief; and entered into the animosities and
jealousies of those who seem to think it necessary to quarrel
for the love of God. Could we but look back at our own
changes of opinion, it would render us less confident of the
justice of our sentiments; and, most of all, one would think
that the American, who has lived long enough to witness
the summersets that have been thrown in the practices and
creeds of most of the more modern sects of his own country,
within the last quarter of a century, would come to have
something like a suitable respect for the more stable and
venerable divisions of the Christian world.
Proper vestments! repeated Ithuel, with contempt;
what vestments are wanting, in the eyes of the Supreme
Being? No; if I
must
have religion  and I know it's
necessary and whullsum', let it be a pure,
naked
religion,
that will stand to reason. Is not that your way of thinking,
Monsieur Rule?
Ma foi, oui
. Reason before all things, Ghita; and,
most of all, reason in religion.
Ah! Raoul, this it is which misleads and betrays you,
returned the girl, earnestly. Faith, and a meek dependence,
is what makes a proper state of feeling; and yet you demand
a reason of Him who created the universe, and breathed into
you the breath of life!
Are we not reasoning creatures, Ghita, returned Raoul,
gently, and yet with a sincerity and truth, for the
circumstances
,
that rendered even his scepticism piquant and
respectable
;
and is it unreasonable to expect us to act up to
our natures? Can I worship a God I do not understand?
Couldst thou worship one thou
didst?
He would cease
to be a deity, and would become one of ourselves, were his
nature and attributes brought down to the level of our
comprehensions
.
Did one of thy followers come on this
quarter-deck
,
and insist on hearing all thine own motives for the
orders given in this little felucca, how readily wouldst thou
drive him back, as mutinous and insolent; and yet thou
wouldst question the God of the universe, and pry into his
mysteries!
Raoul was mute, while Ithuel stared. It was so seldom
that Ghita lost her exceeding gentleness of manner, that the
flush of her cheek, the severe earnestness of her eyes, the
impassioned modulations of her voice, and the emphasis with
which she spoke on this occasion, produced a sort of awe,
that prevented the discourse from proceeding further. The
girl, herself, was so much excited, that, after sitting for a
minute with her hands before her face, the tears were seen
forcing their way through her fingers. She then arose, and
darted into the cabin. Raoul was too observant of the rules
of propriety to think of following; but he sat moody and
lost in thought, until Ithuel drew his attention to himself.
Gals will be gals, said that refined and philosophical
observer of the human family, and nothing touches their
natur's sooner than a little religious excitement. I dare
say, if it wasn't for images, and cardinals, and bishops, and
such creatur's, the Italians (Ithuel always pronounced this
word
Eye
talians) would make a very good sort of
Christians
.
But Raoul was in no humour to converse; and as the
hour had now arrived when the zephyr was to be expected,
he rose, ordered the awning taken in, and prepared to make
himself master of the state of things around him. There
lay the frigate, taking her siesta, like all near; her three
topsails standing, but every other sail that was loose,
hanging
in festoons, waiting for the breeze. Notwithstanding
her careless appearance, so closely had she been tended,
for the last few hours, however, and so sedulously had even
the smallest breath of air been improved, that Raoul started
with surprise, when he found how much nearer she was
than when he had last looked at her. The whole trick was
apparent to him, at a glance; and he was compelled to
acknowledge
his own remissness, when he perceived that he
lay within the reach of the shot of this powerful foe; though
still so distant as to render her aim a little uncertain; more
especially should a sea get up. The felucca had burnt to
the water's edge; but, owing to the smoothness of the water,
her wreck still floated, and was slowly setting into the bay,
there being a slight current in that direction, where she now
13*
lay. The town was basking in the afternoon's sun, though
hid from view, and the whole island of Elba had the
appearance
of being asleep.
What a siesta! said Raoul, to Ithuel, as both stood on
the heel of the bowsprit, looking curiously at the scene:
sea, land, mountains, bourgeois and mariners all dozing.
Bien;
there is life, yonder at the west, and we must get
farther from
votre Proserpine
. Call the hands, Monsieur
Lieutenant. Let us get out our sweeps, and put the head
of le Feu-Follet the other way. Peste! the lugger is so sharp,
and has such a trick of going exactly where she looks, that
I am afraid she has been crawling up towards her enemy,
as the child creeps into the fire that burns its fingers.
All hands were soon in motion on board le Feu-Follet,
the sweeps were on the point of being handled, when the
jigger fluttered, and the first puff of the expected western
breeze swept along the surface of the waters. To the
seamen
,
it was like inhaling oxygen gas. Every appearance
of drowsiness deserted the people of both vessels, and every
one was instantly busy in making sail. Raoul had a proof
into what dangerous proximity to the frigate he had got, by
the sound of the calls on board her; and the stillness of
the sea was yet so great, that the creaking of her fore-yard
was actually audible to him, as the English rounded in their
braces briskly, while laying their fore-top-sail aback.
At that moment a second respiration of the atmosphere
gave birth to the breeze. Raoul whistled for the wind, and
the lugger moved ahead, gliding towards the frigate. But,
in half a minute, she had gathered sufficient way, her helm
was put down, and she came round as easily and as
gracefully
as the bird turns on his wing. Not so with the heavier
frigate. She had hauled in her starboard head-braces, and
had to get the foretopsail aback, and to pay well off with
her head to leeward, in order to swing her yards and fill
her sails, while le Feu-Follet was slipping through the water,
going seemingly into the wind's eye. By this single
evolution
,
the lugger gained more than a cable's-length on her
enemy, and five minutes more would have put her beyond
all immediate danger. But, Captain Cuffe knew this, as
well as his competitor, and had made his preparations
accordingly
.
Keeping his head-yards aback, he knocked his
ship round off, until her broadside bore on the lugger, when
he let fly every gun of his starboard batteries, the utmost
care having been taken to make the shot tell. Twenty-two
heavy round-shot coming in at once upon a little craft, like
le Feu-Follet, was a fearful visitation; and, the boldest held
their breath for a time, as the iron whirlwind whistled past
them. Fortunately, the lugger was not hulled; but a grave
amount of mischief was done aloft. The jigger-mast was
cut in two, and flew upward like a pipe-stem. A serious
wound was given to the mainmast below the hounds, and the
yard itself was shivered in the slings. No less than six
shot plunged through both luggs, leaving holes in the canvass
that made it resemble a beggar's shirt, and the jib-stay was
cut in two half-way between the mast-head and the end of
the bowsprit. No one was hurt; and, yet, for a moment,
every one looked as if destruction had suddenly lighted on
the lugger. Then it was that Raoul came out, in his true
colours. He knew he could not spare a stitch of canvass
just at that moment, but, that on the next ten minutes
depended
every thing. Nothing was taken in, therefore, to
secure spars and sails, but all was left to stand, trusting to
the lightness of the breeze, which usually commenced very
moderately. Hands were immediately set to work, to get
up a new stay; a new main-yard and sail were got along,
and every thing was prepared for hoisting both, as soon as
it could be ascertained that the mast would bear them. Nearly
similar preparations were made forward, as the shortest way
of getting rid of the torn fore-sail; for these, it was the
intention
to unbend and bend, the yard being sound.
Luckily, Captain Cuffe determined to lose no more time
with his guns, but swinging his head-yards, the frigate came
sweeping up to the wind, and in three minutes every thing
was trimmed for the utmost. All this time, le Feu-Follet
had not stood still. Her canvass fluttered, but it held on,
and even the spars kept their places, though so much
injured
.
In a word, the wind was not yet strong enough to
tear the one, or to carry away the other. It was an
advantage
,
too, that these casualties, particularly the loss of her
jigger, rendered le Feu-Follet less weatherly than she would
otherwise have been, since by keeping the frigate directly
in her wake, she was less exposed to the chase-guns, than
she would have been a little on either bow. Of this truth,
Raoul was soon persuaded, the Proserpine beginning to work
both her bow-guns, as soon as she came to the wind, though
neither exactly bore; the shot of one ranging a little to
windward, and the other about as much on the other side.
By these shot, too, the young Frenchman soon had the
satisfaction
of seeing that, notwithstanding her injuries, the
lugger was drawing ahead;a fact of which the English
became so sensible themselves, that they soon ceased firing.
So far, things went better than Raoul had reason, at first,
to hope, though he well knew that the crisis was yet to
come. The westerly wind often blew fresh at that period
of the day, and should it now increase he would require all
his canvass to get clear of a ship with the known qualities
of the vessel in chase. How much longer his mast or his
main-yard would stand he did not know, but as he was fast
gaining, he determined to make hay while the sun shone,
and get far enough ahead, if possible, before the breeze
grew fresh, to enable him to shift his sails and fish his spars,
without being again brought within the reach of visiters as
rude as those who had so lately come hurtling into his thin
hamper. The proper precautions were not neglected, in the
meantime. Men were sent aloft to do what they could,
under the circumstances, with the two spars; and the strain
was a little relieved by keeping the lugger as much away,
as might be done without enabling the frigate to set her
studding sails.
There is always something so exciting in a chase, that
seamen never fail to wish for more wind; forgetful that the
power which increases their own speed, may also increase
the speed of the other party, and that too in an undue
proportion
.
It would have been more favourable to le
Feu-Follet
to have had less wind than even now blew, since her
relative rate of sailing was greater in light than in strong
breezes. Raoul knew, from Ithuel's statements, that the
Proserpine was an exceedingly fast ship, more especially
when it blew fresh; and yet it did not appear to him that
his lugger got along with sufficient speed, though his enemy
would be certain to follow at a rate of sailing in a just
proportion
to his own, did there come more wind.
The wish of the young privateersman, however, was soon
gratified. The wind freshened materially, and by the time
the two vessels opened the Canal of Corsica, as the passage
between that island and Elba is called, the frigate was
obliged to take in her royals, and two or three of those light
and lofty staysails, which it was then the custom for ships
to carry. At first, Raoul had thought he might fetch into
Bastia, which lies due-west of the southern end of Elba;
but though the wind drew a little down through the canal, it
soon blew too fresh to allow any formation of the land
materially
to alter its current. The zephyr, as the afternoon's
summer breeze of southern Italy, in particular, was termed
by the ancients, is seldom a due-west wind, there
generally
being a little northing in it, as seamen say; and, as one
gets farther up the coast, this same wind ordinarily comes
round the head of Corsica, blowing from nearly
west-northwest
.
This would have enabled the lugger to lay her course
for a deep bay on which lies the town of Biguglia, could she
have been jammed up on a wind, as might usually have been
done; but, a few minutes of experiment convinced Raoul
that he must be more tender on his wounded spars, and keep
off for the mouth of the Golo. This was a river of some
size into which it was possible for a vessel of a light draught
to enter; and, as there stood a small battery near the
anchorage
,
he determined to seek shelter in that haven, in order to
repair his damages. His calculations were made
accordingly
,
and, taking the snow-clad peaks in the neighbourhood
of Corte as his land-marks, he ordered the lugger to be
steered in the proper direction.
On board the Proserpine, there was scarcely less interest felt
in the result, than on board le Feu-Follet. If the people of
the frigate had nothing to apprehend, they had something to
revenge; in addition to the anticipated credit of having
captured
the boldest privateer that sailed out of France. For
a short time, as the ship came up with the west end of Elba,
it was a serious question whether she would be able to
weather
it, the lugger having gone past, within a cable's-length
of the cliffs, on the very verge of the breakers, and much
closer in than the frigate would dare to follow. But the last
had taken the breeze farther off the land than the first, and
might possibly fetch past the promontory, on the tack she
was then steering. To have gone about, would have been
to abandon the chase, as it would have carried the ship off,
due north, while le Feu-Follet was gliding down to the
southward
and westward, at the rate of seven knots. The
distance
across the canal is only about thirty miles, and there
would not have been time to recover the lost ground.
This uncertainty made a most feverish moment on board
the Proserpine, as she came up fast towards the headland.
All depended on getting by without tacking. The
appearances
were favourable for deep water, close in; but there is
always the danger of rocks to be dreaded, near mountainous
coasts. The promontory, too, was comparatively low; and
this was rather an indication that it ought not to be
approached
too closely. Winchester was in his berth, just
beginning to feel the smart of his wound; but Griffin was at
the captain's elbow, both he and the third lieutenant, entering
keenly into all their commander's wishes and anxieties.
There she goes, into the very breakers! exclaimed
Cuffe, as they watched le Feu-Follet, in her attempt to pass
the promontory; Monsieur Yvard must be determined to
cast away his craft, rather than be taken. It will be touch
and go with him.
I think not, Captain Cuffe, answered Griffin; the
coast is bold, hereabouts, and even the Proserpine would find
sufficient water, there, where the lugger now is. I hope we
shall not be obliged to tack, sir.
Ay, this is very well for an irresponsiblebut, when it
got to a court, and punishment, I fear that all the last would
fall on my shoulders, should his Majesty's ship happen to lay
her bones along-shore, here. No, no, Griffin; we must go
a clear cable's-length to windward of
that
, or I go about,
though Raoul Yvard were never taken.
There, he fetches-up, by George! cried Yelverton, the
youngest lieutenant; and, for a moment, it was, in truth,
believed in the frigate, that le Feu-Follet, as a breaker
actually
curled directly under her lee, was aground. But this
notion lasted a moment only, the little lugger continuing her
course as swiftly as before; and, a minute or two later,
keeping
a little away, to ease her spars, having been jammed up
as close as possible, previously, in order to weather the
extreme
end of what was thought to be the dangerous point.
The frigate was fully two miles a-stern; and, instead of
losing anything of her vantage-ground, she was kept so near
the wind, as to be occasionally touching. This was the more
safe, inasmuch as the sea was perfectly smooth, and the
vessel made no lee-way. Still the frigate looked, as it is
termed, barely up to the point it was deemed indispensable
to weather; and as ships rarely do better than they look,
it became a question of serious doubt, on board the
Proserpine
,
as she came up with the headland, whether she could
clear it.
I am afraid, Captain Cuffe, we shall never clear it with
a good-enough berth, sir, observed the fidgeting Griffin; it
seems, to me, the ship sets unaccountably to leeward,
to-day
!
She never behaved better, Griffin. I am really in hopes
there is a slight current off-shore, here; if anything, we
actually open the highlands of Corsica, by this promontory.
You see that the wreck of la Divina Providenza is sweeping
round the bay, and is coming out to windward, again.
That
may serve us, indeed! All ready in the chains,
sir!shall we make a cast of the lead?
Cuffe assented, and the lead was hove. At this moment
the ship was going eight knots, and the man reported no
bottom, with fifteen fathoms of line out. This was well;
and two or three subsequent casts confirmed it. Orders
were now given to drag every bowline, swig-off on every
brace, and flatten-in all the sheets. Even the halyards
were touched, in order that the sails might stand like boards.
The trying moment was near; five minutes must decide
the matter.
Let her shake a little Mr. Yelverton, and eat into the
wind, said Cuffe, addressing the officer of the watch; we
must do all we can here; for, when abreast of the breakers,
everything must be a rap-full, to keep the ship under quick
command. Theremeet her with the helm, and give her a
good full.
This experiment was repeated twice, and each time the
frigate gained her length to windward, though she
necessarily
lost more than three times that distance in her velocity.
At length, the trial came, and a profound silence, one in
which nervousness and anxiety were blended with hope,
reigned in the vessel. The eyes of all turned from the sails
to the breakers; from the breakers to the sails; and from
both to the wake of the ship.
At such moments the voice of the lead's-man prevails over
all other sounds. His warning cry is listened to with
breathless
attention, when the songs of a siren would be unheard.
Cast after cast was made, as the ship drove on, and the
answer to Cuffe's questions, was uniformly, no bottom, sir,
with fifteen fathoms out; but, just at this instant, arose the
regular song from the weather main-chains, of by the mark
seven! This came so suddenly on the Captain's ear, that
he sprang upon the taffrail, where he could command a full
view of all he wanted to see; and then he called out, in a
stentorian voice:
Heave again, sir!be brisk, my lad!be brisk!
Be-e-e-ther-r-r-dee-e-e-eep six! followed almost as
soon as the Captain's voice had ceased.
Ready-about! shouted Cuffe. See all clear,
gentlemen
.Move
lively, men; move lively.
And-a-a-eh half-ef-four
Stand by!What the devil are you at, sir, on that
fore-castle
?Are
you ready, forward?
All ready, sir
Down with your helmhard down, at once
Be-e-e-ther-r-r-dee-e-e-p nine
Meet her!  up with your helm.  Haul down your
sheets, forwardbrail the spankerlet go all the bowlines,
aft.Sowell, there, well.She flew round like a top; but,
by Jove, we've caught her, gentlemen.Drag your
bowlines
,
again.What's the news from the chains?
No bottom, sir, with fifteen fathoms outand as good
a cast, too, sir, as we've had to-day.
Soyou're rap fulldon't fall off  very well dyce
(
Anglice
, thus)keep her as you are.Well, by the Lord,
Griffin, that
was
a shave; half-four was getting to be squally,
in a quarter of the world where a rock makes nothing of
pouting its lips fifteen or twenty feet at a time at a mariner.
We are past it all, however, and here is the land, trending
away to the southward, like a man in a consumption, fairly
under our lee. A dozen Raoul Yvards wouldn't lead me
into such a dd scrape, again!
The danger that is over, is no longer a danger at all,
sir, answered Griffin, laughing. Don't you think,
Captain
Cuffe, we might ease her about half a point? that would
be just her play; and the lugger keeps off a little, I rather
suspect, to ease her mainmast. I'm certain I saw chips
fly from it, when we dosed her with them two-and-twenty
pills.
Perhaps you 're right, Griffin.Ease her, with the helm,
a little, Mr. Yelverton. If Master Yvard stands on his
present
course an hour longer, Biguglia will be too far
to-windward
for him; and, as for Bastia, that has been out of the
question, from the first. There is a river, called Golo, into
which he might run; and that, I rather think, is his aim.
Four hours, however, will let us into the secret.
And four intensely interesting hours were those which
succeeded. The wind was a cap-full; a good, fresh,
westerly
breeze, which seemed to have started out of the
oven-like
heat of a week of intensely hot weather that had
preceded
it, and to have collected the force of two or three zephyrs
into one. It was not a gale, at all, nor did it induce either
party to think of reefing; for, no trifle would have done
that, under the circumstances; but it caused the Proserpine
to furl her fore and mizzen-top-gallant-sails, and put Raoul
in better humour with the loss of his jigger. When fairly
round the headland, and, at a moment when he fancied the
frigate would be compelled to tack, the latter had seized an
opportunity to get in his foresail, to unbend it, and to bend
and set a new one; an operation that took just four minutes,
by the watch. He would have tried the same experiment
with the other lugg, but the mast was scarce worth the risk,
and he thought the holes might act as reefs, and thus
diminish
the strain. In these four hours, owing to the
disadvantage
under which le Feu-Follet laboured, there was not a
difference of half a knot in the distance run by the two
vessels
,
though each passed over more than thirty miles of
water. During this time they had been drawing rapidly
nearer to the coast of Corsica, the mountains of which,
ragged and crowned with nearly eternal snows, had been
glittering in the afternoon's sun, before them, though they
lay many a long league inland. But the formation of the
coast, itself, had now become plain, and Raoul, an hour
before the sun disappeared, had noted his landmarks, by
Vol. I.  14
which to make for the river he intended to enter. The
eastern coast of Corsica is as deficient in bays and harbours,
as its western is affluent with them; and this Golo, for which
the lugger was shaping her course, would never have been
thought of, as a place of shelter, under ordinary
circumstances
.
But, Raoul had once anchored in its mouth, and
he deemed it the very spot in which to elude his enemy. It
had shoals off its embouchure; and these, he rightly enough
fancied, would induce Captain Cuffe to be wary.
As the evening approached, the wind began to decrease in
force, and then the people of the lugger lost all their
apprehensions
.
The spars had all stood, and Raoul no longer
hesitated about trusting his wounded mainmast with a new
yard and sail. Both were got up, and the repairs were
immediately
commenced. The superiority of the lugger, in
sailing, was now so great, as to put it out of all question
that she was not to be overtaken in the chase; and Raoul, at
one time, actually thought of turning up along the land, and
going into Bastia, where he might even provide himself with
a new mainmast, at need. But this idea, on reflection, he
abandoned, as too hazardous; and he continued on, in the
direction of the mouth of the Golo.
Throughout the day the Proserpine had shown no colours,
except for the short period when her boats were engaged,
and while she herself was firing at the lugger. The same
was the fact with le Feu-Follet, though Raoul had run up
the tri-colour, as he opened on the felucca, and he kept it
flying as long as there was any appearance of hostilities.
As the two vessels drew in near to the land, several coasters
were seen beating up against the westerly wind, or running
down before it, all of which, however, seemed so much to
distrust
the appearance of the lugger, as to avoid her as far as
was possible. This was a matter of indifference to our
hero, who knew that they were all probably countrymen,
or, at least, smugglers, who would scarcely reward him for
the trouble, had he the time to bring them to, and capture
them. Corsica was then, again, in the hands of the French,
the temporary and imperfect possession of the English
having
terminated three or four years earlier; and Raoul felt
certain of a welcome anywhere in the island, and of
protection
wherever it could be offered. Such was the state of
things, when, just as the lugger was preparing to enter
among the shoals, the Proserpine unexpectedly tacked, and
seemed to bestow all her attention on the coasters, of which
three or four were so near that two fell into her hands almost
without an effort to escape.
It appeared to Raoul, and those with him in his little craft,
that the English seized these insignificant vessels solely with
a wish for vengeance, since it was not usual for ships of the
force of the Proserpine to turn aside to molest the poor
fishermen
and coasters. A few execrations followed, quite as
a matter of course, but the intricacy of the channel and the
necessity of having all his eyes about him; soon drove every
other thought from the mind of the dashing privateersman,
but such as were connected with the care and safety of his
own vessel.
Just as the sun set le Feu-Follet anchored. She had
chosen a berth sufficiently within the shallow water to be
safe from the guns of the frigate, though scarcely within the
river. The latter the depth of the stream hardly permitted,
though there was all the shelter that the season and weather
required. The Proserpine manifested no intention to give
up her pursuit; for she, too, came off the outlet, and brought
up with one of her bowers, about two miles to-seaward of the
lugger. She seemed to have changed her mind as to the
coasters, having let both proceed, after a short detention;
though, it falling calm, neither was enabled to get any
material
distance from her, until the land breeze should rise.
In these positions, the belligerents prepared to pass the night,
each party taking the customary precautions as to his ground
tackle, and each clearing up the decks and going through
the common routine of duty, as regularly as if he lay in a
friendly port.
CHAPTER XI.
The human mind, that lofty thing,
The palace and the throne,
Where reason sits, a scepter'd king,
And breathes his judgment tone;
Oh! who with silent step shall trace
The borders of that haunted place,
Nor in his weakness own,
That mystery and marvel bind
That lofty thingthe human mind.
Anonymous
.
It
is unnecessary to dwell on the glories of the
Mediterranean
.
They are familiar to every traveller, and books
have, again and again, laid them before the imaginations of
readers of all countries and ages. Still, there are lights and
shades peculiar to every picture, and this of ours has some
of its own that merit a passing notice. A sunset, in
midsummer
,
can add to the graces of almost any scene. Such
was the hour when Raoul anchored; and Ghita, who had
come on deck, now that the chase was over, and the danger
was thought to be past, fancied she had never seen her own
Italy, or the blue Mediterranean, more lovely.
The shadows of the mountains were cast far upon the
sea, long ere the sun had actually gone down, throwing the
witchery of eventide over the whole of the eastern coast,
some time before it came to grace its western. Corsica
and Sardinia resemble vast fragments of the Alps, which
have fallen into the sea by some accident of nature, where
they stand in sight of their native beds, resembling, as it
might be, out-posts to those great walls of Europe. Their
mountains have the same formations, the same white peaks,
for no small portion of the year at least, and their sides the
same mysterious and riven aspect. In addition, however, to
their other charms, they have one that is wanting in most
of Switzerland, though traces of it are to be found in Savoy
and on the southern side of the Alps; they have that strange
admixture of the soft and the severe, of the sublime and
beautiful, that so peculiarly characterize the witchery of
Italian nature. Such was now the aspect of all visible from
the deck of le Feu-Follet. The sea, with its dark-blue tint,
was losing every trace of the western wind, and was
becoming
glassy and tranquil; the mountains on the other side
were solemn and grand, just showing their ragged outlines
along a sky glowing with the pomp that shuts the day;
while the nearer valleys and narrow plains were mysterious,
yet soft, under the deep shadows they cast. Pianosa lay
nearly opposite, distant some twenty miles, rising out of the
water like a beacon; Elba was visible to the north-east, a
gloomy confused pile of mountain at that hour; and Ghita,
once or twice thought she could trace on the coast of the main,
the dim outline of her own hill, Monte Argentaro; though
the distance, some sixty or seventy miles, rendered this
improbable. Outside, too, lay the frigate, riding on the glassy
surface of the sea, her sails furled, her yards squared, every
thing about her cared for and in its place, until she formed
a faultless picture of nautical symmetry and naval propriety.
There are all sorts of men in a marine, as well as in civil
life; these taking things as they come, content to perform
their duties in the most quiet manner, while others again
have some such liking for their vessels as the dandy has for
his own person, and are never happy unless embellishing
them. The truth, in this, as in most other matters, lies in a
medium; the officer who thinks too much of the appearance
of his vessel, seldom having mind enough to bestow due
attention
on the great objects for which she was constructed,
and is sailed; while, on the other hand, he who is altogether
indifferent to these appearances is usually thinking of things
foreign to his duty and his profession; if, indeed, he thinks
at all. Cuffe was near the just medium, inclining a little too
much, perhaps, to the naval dandy. The Proserpine, thanks
to the builders of Toulon, was thought to be the handsomest
model then afloat in the Mediterranean, and like an
established
beauty, all who belonged to her were fond of
decorating
her, and of showing her fine proportions to advantage.
As she now lay, at single anchor, just out of gun-shot from
his own berth, Raoul could not avoid gazing at her with
envy, and a bitter feeling passed through his mind, when
he recalled the chances of fortune and of birth, which
deprived
him of the hope of ever rising to the command of
14 *
such a frigate, but which doomed him, seemingly, to the fate
of a privateersman for life.
Nature had intended Raoul Yvard for a much higher
destiny than that which apparently awaited his career. He
had come into active life with none of the advantages that
accompany the accidents of birth, and, at a moment, in the
history of his great nation when its morals, and its religious
sentiments, had become unsettled by the violent reaction
which was throwing off the abuses of centuries. They who
imagine, however, that France, as a whole, was guilty of
the gross excesses that disfigured her struggles for liberty,
know little of the great mass of moral feeling that endured
through all the abominations of the times; and mistake the
crimes of a few desperate leaders, and the exaggerations of
misguided impulses, for a radical and universal depravity.
The France of the Reign of Terror, even, has little more to
answer for than the compliance which makes bodies of men
the instruments of the enthusiastic, the designing, and the
activeour own country often tolerating error, that differs
only in the degree, under the same blind submission to
combinations
and impulses; this very degree, too, depending
more on the accidents of history and natural causes, than
any agencies which are to be imputed to the one party, as a
fault, or, to the other, as a merit. It was with Raoul, as it
had been with his countryeach was the creature of
circumstances
;
and if the man had some of the faults, he had also
most of the merits of his nation and his age. The looseness
on the subject of religion, which was his principal defect in
the eyes of Ghita, but which could scarcely fail to be a
material one, with a girl educated and disposed as was the
case with our heroine, was the error of the day, and with
Raoul it was, at least, sincere; a circumstance that rendered
him, with one so truly pious as the gentle being he loved,
the subject of a holy interest, which, in itself, almost rivalled
the natural tenderness of her sex, in behalf of the object of
her affections.
While the short engagement with the boats lasted, and
during the few minutes he was under the fire of the frigate,
Raoul had been himself; the excitement of actual war always
nerving him to deeds worthy of his command, and the high
name he had acquired; but, throughout the remainder of the
day, he had felt little disposed to strife. The chase, once
assured that his spars were likely to stand, gave him little
concern; and now that he was at anchor within the shallow
water, he felt much as the traveller who has found a
comfortable
inn, after the fatigue of a hard day's ride. When
Ithuel suggested the possibility of a night-attack, in boats,
he laughingly reminded the American that the burnt child
dreads the fire, and gave himself no great concern in the
matter. Still, no proper precaution was neglected. Raoul
was in the habit of exacting much of his men, in moments
of necessity; but, at all other times, he was as indulgent as
a kind father, among obedient and respectful children. This
quality, and the never-varying constancy and coolness that
he displayed in danger, was the secret of his great influence
with them; every seaman under his orders feeling certain,
that no severe duty was required at his hands, without a
corresponding necessity for it.
On the present occasion, when the people of le Feu-Follet
had supped, they were indulged in their customary dance;
and the romantic songs of Provence were heard on the
forecastle
.
A light-hearted gaiety prevailed, that wanted only
the presence of woman, to make the scene resemble the
evening amusement of some hamlet on the coast. Nor was
the sex absent in the sentiment of the hour, or wholly so in
person. The songs were full of chivalrous gallantry, and
Ghita listened, equally touched and amused. She sat on
the taffrail, with her uncle standing at her side, while Raoul
paced the quarter-deck, stopping, in his turn, to utter some
thought, or wish, to ears that were always attentive. At
length the song and the dance ended, and all but the few
who were ordered to remain on watch, descended to their
hammocks. The change was as sudden, as it was striking.
The solemn, breathing stillness of a star-lit night succeeded
to the light laugh, melodious song, and spirited merriment
of a set of men, whose constitutional gaiety seemed to be
restrained by a species of native refinement, that is unknown
to the mariners of other regions, and who, unnurtured as
they might be deemed, in some respects, seldom or never
offended against the proprieties; as is so common with the
mariners of the boasted Anglo-Saxon race. By this time
the cool air from the mountains began to descend, and
floating
over the heated sea, it formed a light land-breeze, that
blew in an exactly contrary direction to that, which, about
the same hour, came off from the adjacent continent. There
was no moon; but the night could not be called dark.
Myriads of stars gleamed out from the fathomless firmament,
filling the atmosphere with a light that served to render
objects sufficiently distinct; while it left them clad in a
semiobscurity
that suited the witchery of the scene and the hour.
Raoul felt the influence of all these circumstances in an
unusual degree. It disposed him to more sobriety of thought
than always attended his leisure moments, and he took a
seat on the taffrail, near Ghita, while her uncle went below,
to his knees and his prayers.
Every foot-fall in the lugger had now ceased. Ithuel
was posted on a knight-head, where he sat watching his old
enemy, the Proserpine; the proximity of that ship not
allowing
him to sleep. Two experienced seamen, who alone
formed the regular anchor-watch, as it is termed, were
stationed apart, in order to prevent conversation; one on the
starboard cat-head, and the other in the main rigging; both
keeping vigilant ward over the tranquil sea, and the different
objects that floated on its placid bosom. In that retired spot,
these objects were necessarily few, embracing the frigate,
the lugger, and three coasters; the latter of which had all
been boarded before the night set in, by the Proserpine, and,
after short detentions, dismissed. One of these coasters lay
about half-way between the two hostile vessels, at anchor,
having come-to, after making some fruitless efforts to get
to the northward, by means of the expiring west-wind.
Although the light land-breeze would now have sufficed to
carry her a knot or two through the water, she preferred
maintaining her position, and giving her people a good
night's rest, to getting under-way. The situation of this
felucca, and the circumstance that she had been boarded by
the frigate, rendered her an object of some distrust with
Raoul, through the early part of the evening, and he had
ordered a vigilant eye to be kept on her; but nothing had
been discovered to confirm these suspicions. The
movements
of her peoplethe manner in which she brought-up
the quiet that prevailed on board her, and even the lubberly
disposition of her spars and rigging, went to satisfy Raoul
that she had no man-of-war's men on board her. Still, as
she lay less than a mile outside of the lugger, though now
dead to leeward all that distance, she was to be watched;
and one of the seamen, he in the rigging, rarely had his eyes
off her, a minute at a time. The second coaster was a little
to the southward of the frigate, under her canvass, hauling
in for the land; doubtless with a view to get as much as
possible of the breeze from the mountains; and standing
slowly to the south. She had been set by compass, an hour
before, and all that time had altered her bearings but half a
point, though not a league offa proof how light she had
the wind. The third coaster, a small felucca, too, was to
the northward; but, ever since the land-breeze, if breeze it
could be called, had come, she had been busy turning slowly
up to windward; and seemed disposed either to cross the
shoals, closer in than the spot where the lugger lay, or to
enter the Golo. Her shadowy outline was visible, though
drawn against the land, moving slowly athwart the lugger's
hawse, perhaps half-a-mile in-shore of her. As there was a
current setting out of the river, and all the vessels rode with
their heads to the island, Ithuel occasionally turned his head
to watch her progress; which was so slow, however, as to
produce very little change.
After looking around him several minutes, in silence,
Raoul turned his face upward, and gazed at the stars.
You probably do not know, Ghita, he said, the use
those stars may be, and are, to us mariners. By their aid,
we are enabled to tell where we are, in the midst of the
broadest oceansto know the points of the compass; and to
feel at home even when furthest removed from it. The
seaman
must go far south of the equator, at least, ere he can
reach a spot where he does not see the same stars that he
beheld from the door of his father's house.
That is a new thought, to me, answered Ghita, quickly,
her tender nature, at once, struck with the feeling and
poetry
of such an idea; that is a new thought, to me, Raoul;
and I wonder you never mentioned it before. It is a great
thing to be able to carry home and familiar objects with you,
when so distant from those you love.
Did you never hear that lovers have chosen an hour
and a star, by gazing at which they might commune
together
,
though separated by oceans and countries?
That is a question you might put to yourself, Raoul;
all I have ever heard of lovers, and love, having come from
your own lips.
Well, then, I tell it you; and hope that we shall not
part, again, without selecting
our
star, and
our
hourif,
indeed, we ever part more. Though I have forgotten to tell
you this, Ghita, it is because you are never absent from my
thoughtsno star is necessary to recall Monte Argentaro
and the Towers.
If we should say Ghita was not pleased with this, it would
be to raise her above an amiable and a natural weakness.
Raoul's protestations never fell dead on her heart; and few
things were sweeter, to her ear, than his words, as they
declared his devotedness and passion. The frankness with
which he admitted his delinquencies, and most especially the
want of that very religious sentiment which was of so much
value in the eyes of his mistress, gave an additional weight
to his language, when he affirmed his love.
Notwithstanding
Ghita blushed, as she now listened, she did not smile;
she rather appeared sad. For near a minute she made no
reply; and when she did answer, it was in a low voice, like
one who felt and thought intensely.
Those stars may well have a higher office, she said.
Look at them, Raoul;count them we cannot, for they
seem to start out of the depths of heaven, one after another,
as the eye rests upon the space, until they mock our efforts
at calculation. We see they are there in thousands, and
may well believe they are in myriads. Now, thou hast been
taught, else couldst thou never be a navigator, that those
stars are worlds, like our own, or suns, with worlds sailing
around them; how is it possible to see and know this, without
believing in a God, and feeling the insignificance of our
being?
I do not deny that there is a power to govern all this,
Ghitabut I maintain that it is a principle; not a being, in
our shape and form; and that it is the reason of things,
rather than a deity.
Who has said that God is a being, in our shape and
form, Raoul? None know thatnone
can
know it; none
say
it, who reverence and worship him as they ought!
Do not your priests say that man has been created in
his image? and is not this creating him in his form and
likeness?
Nay, not so, dear Raoul, but in the image of his spirit
that man hath a soul which partakes, though in a small
degree, of the imperishable essence of God; and thus far
doth he exist in his image. More than this, none have
presumed
to say. But what a being, to be the master of all
those bright worlds!
Ghita, thou know'st my way of thinking, on these
matters
;
and thou also know'st that I would not wound thy
gentle spirit by a single word that could grieve thee.
Nay, Raoul, it is
not
thy way of
thinking
, but thy
fashion of
talking
, that makes the difference between us.
No one, who
thinks
, can ever doubt the existence of a being
superior to all of earth, and of the universe; and who is
Creator and Master of all.
Of a
principle
, if thou wilt, Ghita; but of a
being
, I ask
for the proof. That a mighty principle exists, to set all
these planets in motion  to create all these stars, and to
plant all these suns, in space, I never doubted; it would be
to question a fact which stands, day and night, before my
eyes; but to suppose a
being
capable of producing all these
things, is to believe in beings I never saw.
And why not as well suppose that it is a being that does
all this, Raoul, as to suppose it what you call a principle?
Because I see principles, beyond my understanding, at
work all around me: in yonder heavy frigate, groaning
under her load of artillery, which floats on this thin water;
in the trees, of the land that lies so near us; in the animals,
which are born, and die; the fishes, the birds, and the
human beings. But I see no beingknow no being, that is
able to do all this.
That is because thou know'st not God! He is the
creator of the principles of which thou speak'st, and is
greater than thy principles, themselves.
It is easy to say this, Ghitabut hard to prove. I take
the acorn, and put it in the ground; in due time it comes up
a plant; in the course of years, it becomes a tree. Now,
all this depends on a certain mysterious principle, which is
unknown to me, but which I am sure exists, for I can cause
it, myself, to produce its fruits, by merely opening the earth
and laying the seed in its bosom. Nay, I can do more
so well do I understand this principle, to a certain extent, at
least, that, by choosing the season and the soil, I can hasten
or retard the growth of the plant, and, in a manner, fashion
the tree.
True, Raoul,
to a certain extent
thou canst; and it is
precisely because thou hast been created after the image of
God. The little resemblance thou enjoyest to that Mighty
being, enables thee to do this much more than the beasts of
the field: wert thou his equal, thou couldst create that
principle
of which thou speakest, and which, in thy blindness,
thou mistakest for its master.
This was said with more feeling than Ghita had ever
before manifested, in their frequent discourses on this
subject
,
and with a solemnity of tone that startled her listener.
Ghita had no philosophy, in the common acceptation of the
term, while Raoul fancied he had much, under the
limitations
of a deficient education; and yet the strong religious
sentiment of the girl so quickened her faculties, that he had
often been made to wonder why she had seemingly the best
of the argument, on a subject in which he flattered himself
with being so strong.
I rather think, Ghita, we scarcely understand each
other, answered Raoul. I pretend not to see any more
than is permitted to man; or, rather, more than his powers
can comprehend; but this proves nothing, as the elephant
understands more than the horse, and the horse more than
the fish. There is a principle which pervades everything,
which we call Nature; and this it is which has produced
these whirling worlds, and all the mysteries of creation.
One of its laws is, that nothing it produces shall comprehend
its secrets.
You have only to fancy your principle a spirit, a being
with mind, Raoul, to have the Christian God. Why not
believe in him, as easily as you believe in your unknown
principle, as you call it? You know that you existthat
you can build a luggercan reason on the sun and stars,
so as to find your way across the widest ocean, by means
of your mind; and why not suppose that some superior being
exists, who can do even more than this? Your principles
can be thwarted, even by yourselfthe seed can be deprived
of its power to growthe tree destroyed; and, if principles
can thus be destroyed, some accident may one day destroy
creation, by destroying its principle. I fear to speak to
you of revelation, Raoul, for I know you mock it!
Not when it comes from
thy
lips, dearest. I may not
believe
, but I never
mock
at what thou utterest and
reverencest
.
I could thank thee for this, Raoul, but I feel it would be
taking to myself a homage that ought to be paid elsewhere.
But, here is my guitar, and I am sorry to say that the hymn
to the Virgin has not been sung on board this lugger
to-night
;
thou canst not think how sweet is a hymn sung upon
the waters. I heard the crew that is anchored towards the
frigate, singing that hymn, while thy men were at their light
Provencal songs, in praise of woman's beauty; instead of
joining in praise of their Creator.
Thou mean'st to sing thy hymn, Ghita, else the guitar
would not have been mentioned?
Raoul, I do. I have ever found thy soul the softest, after
holy music. Who knows, but the mercy of God may one
day touch it, through the notes of this very hymn!
Ghita paused a moment, and then her light fingers passed
over the strings of her guitar, in a solemn symphony; after
which came the sweet strains of Ave Maria, in a voice
and melody that might, in sooth, have touched a heart of
stone. Ghita, a Neapolitan by birth, had all her country's
love for music; and she had caught some of the science that
seems to pervade nations, in that part of the world. Nature
had endowed her with one of the most touching voices of her
sex; one less powerful, than mellow and sweet; and she never
used it, in a religious office, without its becoming tremulous
and eloquent with feeling. While she was now singing this
well-known hymn, a holy hope pervaded her moral system,
that, in some miraculous manner, she might become the
agent of turning Raoul to the love and worship of God; and
the feeling communicated itself to her execution. Never
before had she sung so well; as a proof of which, Ithuel left
his knight-head, and came aft, to listen, while the two French
Vol. I.  15
mariners on watch, temporarily forgot their duty, in
entranced
attention.
If anything could make me a believer, Ghita,
murmured
Raoul, when the last strain had died on the lips of
his beloved, it would be to listen to thy melody! What
now, Monsieur Etooell! are you, too, a lover of holy music?
This is rare singing, Captain Rule; but we have different
business on hand. If you will step to the other end of the
lugger, you can take a look at the craft that has been
crawling
along, in-shore of us, for the last three hoursthere is
something about her that is unnat'ral; she seems to be
dropping
down nearer to us, while she has no motion through
the water. The last circumstance I hold to be unnat'ral
with a vessel that has all sail set, and in this breeze.
Raoul pressed the hand of Ghita, and whispered her to go
below, as he was fearful the air of the night might injure her.
He then went forward, where he could command as good a
view of the felucca, in-shore, as the obscurity of the hour
permitted; and he felt a little uneasiness, when he found
how near she had got to the lugger. When he last noted
her position, this vessel was quite half-a-mile distant, and
appeared to be crossing the bows of le Feu-Follet, with
sufficient wind to have carried her a mile ahead, in the
interval
;
yet could he not perceive that she had advanced as far,
in that direction, as she had drifted down upon the lugger,
the while.
Have you been examining her long? he demanded of
the New-Hampshire-man.
Ever since she has seemed to stand still; which is now
some twenty minutes. She is dull, I suppose, for she has
been several hours getting along a league; and there is now
air enough for such a craft to go three knots to the hour.
Her coming down upon us is easily accounted for, there
being a considerable current out of this river, as you may
see by the ripple at our own cut-water; but I find nothing to
keep her from going ahead, at the same time. I set her by
the light you see, here in the wake of the nearest mountain,
at least a quarter of an hour since, and she has not advanced
five times her own length, since.
'T is nothing but a Corsican coaster, after all, Etooell:
I hardly think the English would risk our canister, again,
for the pleasure of being beaten off, in another attempt to
board!
They 're a spiteful set, aboard the frigate; and the Lord
only knows! See, here is a good heavy night-air, and that
felucca is not a cable's-length from us; set her by the
jib-stay
,
and judge for yourself, how slowly she goes ahead!
That
it is, which non-plushes
me!
Raoul did as the other desired, and, after a short trial, he
found that the coaster had no perceptible motion ahead, while,
it was certain, she was drifting down with the current,
directly athwart the lugger's hawse. This fact satisfied him
that she must have drags astern; a circumstance that, at
once, denoted a hostile intention. The enemy was probably
on board the felucca, in force; and it was incumbent on him
to make immediate preparations for defence.
Still, Raoul was reluctant to disturb his people. Like all
firm and cool men, he was averse to the parade of a false
alarm; and it seemed so improbable that the lesson of the
morning was so soon forgotten, that he could hardly
persuade
himself to believe his senses. Then the men had been
very hard at work, throughout the day; and most of them
were sleeping the sleep of the weary. On the other hand,
every minute brought the coaster nearer, and increased the
danger, should the enemy be really in possession of her.
Under all the circumstances, he determined, first, to hail;
knowing that his crew could be got up in a minute, and that
they slept with arms at their sides, under an apprehension
that a boat attack might possibly be attempted, in the course
of the night.
Felucca, ahoy! called out the captain of le Feu-Follet,
the other craft being too near to render any great effort of
the voice necessary; What felucca is that? and why have
you so great a drift?
La Bella Corsienne! was the answer, in a patois, half
French, half Italian, as Raoul expected, if all were right.
We are bound into la Padulella; and wish to keep in with
the land, to hold the breeze the longer. We are no great
sailer, at the best, and have a drift, because we are, just now,
in the strength of the current.
At this rate, you will come athwart my hawse.You
know I am armed, and cannot suffer that!
Ah, Signore, we are friends of the republic, and would
not harm you, if we could. We hope you will not injure
poor mariners, like us. We will keep away, if you please,
and pass you under your stern
This proposition was made so suddenly, and so
unexpectedly
,
that Raoul had not time to object; and, had he been
disposed to do so, the execution was too prompt to allow him
the means. The felucca fell broad off, and came down
almost in a direct line for the lugger's bows, before the wind
and current; moving fast enough, now, to satisfy all Ithuel's
scruples.
Call all hands to repel boarders! cried Raoul,
springing
aft to the capstan, and seizing his own armsCome
up lively,
mes enfans!
here is treachery!
These words were hardly uttered before Raoul was back
on the heel of the bowsprit, and the most active of his men
some five or six, at mostbegan to show themselves on deck.
In that brief space, the felucca had got within eighty yards,
when, to the surprise of all in the lugger, she luffed into the
wind, again, and drifted down, until it was apparent that she
was foul of the lugger's cable, her stern swinging round
directly on the latter's starboard bow. At that instant, or
just as the two vessels came in actual contact, and Raoul's
men were thronging around him, to meet the expected attack,
the sounds of oars, pulled for life or death, were heard, and
flames burst upward from the open hatch of the coaster.
Then a boat was dimly seen gliding away, in a line with the
hull, by the glowing light.
Un brlot!un brlot!a fireship! exclaimed twenty
voices together, the horror that mingled in the cries
proclaiming
the extent of a danger which is, perhaps, the most
terrific that seamen can encounter.
But the voice of Raoul Yvard was not among them.
The moment his eye caught the first glimpse of the flames,
he disappeared from the bowsprit. He might have been
absent about twenty seconds. Then he was seen on the
taffrail
of the felucca, with a spare shank-painter, which had
been lying on the forecastle, on his shoulder.
Antoine!Francois!Grgoire!he called out, in a
voice of thunder,follow me!the rest, clear away the
cable, and bend a hawser to the better end!
The people of le Feu-Follet were trained to order and
implicit obedience. By this time, too, the lieutenants were
among them; and the men set about doing as they had been
directed. Raoul, himself, passed into the felucca, followed
by the three men he had selected by name. The
adventurers
had no difficulty, as yet, in escaping the flames, though,
by this time, they were pouring upward from the hatch in a
torrent. As Raoul suspected, his cable had been grappled;
and, seizing the rope, he tightened it to a severe strain,
securing the in-board part. Then he passed down to the
cable, himself, directing his companions to hand him the
rope-end of the shank-painter, which he fastened to the cable
by a jamming hitch. This took half-a-minute; in
half-a-minute
more, he was on the felucca's forecastle, again.
Here the chain was easily passed through a hawse-hole; and
a knot tied, with a marlinespike passed through its centre.
To pass the fire, on the return, was now a serious matter;
but it was done without injury, Raoul driving his companions
before him. No sooner did his foot reach the bows of le
Feu-Follet, again, than he shouted
Veer away!pay out cable, men, if you would save
our beautiful lugger from destruction!
Nor was there a moment to spare. The lugger took the
cable that was given her, fast enough, under the pressure of
the current, and helped by the breeze; but at first the
fire-vessel
,
already a sheet of flame, her decks having been
saturated
with tar, seemed disposed to accompany her. To the
delight of all in the lugger, however, the stern of the felucca
was presently seen to separate from their own bows; and a
sheer having been given to le Feu-Follet, by means of the
helm, in a few seconds even her bowsprit and jib had cleared
the danger. The felucca rode stationary, while the lugger
dropped astern, fathom after fathom, until she lay more than
a hundred yards distant from the fiery mass. As a matter
of course, while the cable was paid out, the portion to which
the lanyard, or rope part of the shank-painter was fastened,
dropped into the water, while the felucca rode by the chain.
These events occupied less than five minutes; and all had
been done with a steadiness and promptitude that seemed
more like instinct, than reason. Raoul's voice was not
heard, except in the few orders mentioned; and when, by the
15*
glaring light, which illuminated all in the lugger and the
adjacent water to some distance, nearly to the brightness of
noon-day, he saw Ghita gazing at the spectacle in awed
admiration and terror, he went to her, and spoke as if the
whole were merely a brilliant spectacle, devised for their
amusement.
Our girandola is second only to that of St. Peter's, he
said, smiling. 'T was a narrow escape, love; but, thanks
to thy God, if thou wilt it shall be so, we have received no
harm.
And you have been the agent of his goodness, Raoul;
I have witnessed all, from this spot. The call to the men
brought me on deck; and, Oh! how I trembled, as I saw
you on the flaming mass!
It has been cunningly planned, on the part of Messieurs
les Anglais; but it has signally failed. That coaster has a
cargo of tar, and naval stores, on board; and, capturing her,
this evening, they have thought to extinguish our lantern by
the brighter and fiercer flame of their own. But, le
Feu-Follet
will shine again, when their fire is dead!
Is there, then, no danger that the brlot will yet come
down upon usshe is fearfully near!
Not sufficiently so to do us harm; more especially as
our sails are damp with dew. Here she cannot come, so
long as our cable stands; and, as that is under water, where
she lies, it cannot burn. In half-an-hour there will be little
of her left; and we will enjoy the bonfire, while it lasts.
And, now the fear of danger was past, it was a sight truly
to be enjoyed. Every anxious and curious face in the
lugger
was to be seen, under that brilliant light, turned toward
the glowing mass, as the sun-flower follows the great source
of heat, in his track athwart the heavens; while the spars,
sails, guns, and even the smallest object on board the
lugger
,
started out of the obscurity of night, into the brightness
of such an illumination, as if composing parts of some
brilliant
scenic display. But so fierce a flame soon exhausted
itself. Ere long, the felucca's masts fell, and with them a
pyramid of fire. Then the glowing deck tumbled in; and,
finally, timber after timber, and plank after plank fell, until
the conflagration, in a great measure, extinguished itself in
the water on which it floated. An hour after the flames
appeared, little remained but the embers which were
glowing
in the hold of the wreck.
CHAPTER XII.
A justice of the peace, for the time being,
They bow to, but may turn him out, next year:
They reverence their priest, but, disagreeing,
In price or creed, dismiss him without fear;
They have a natural talent for foreseeing
And knowing all things;  and should Park appear
From his long tour in Africa, to show
The Niger's source, they 'd meet him with  We know.
Halleck
.
Raoul
was not mistaken as to the manner in which they
were obtained, and the means employed by his enemies.
The frigate had found one of the feluccas loaded with naval
stores, including some ten or fifteen barrels of tar; and it
instantly struck Griffin, who was burning to revenge the
defeat of the morning, that the prize might be converted into
a fire-vessel. As the second lieutenant volunteered to carry
her in, always a desperate service, Cuffe gave his consent.
Nothing could have been better managed than the whole
duty connected with this exploit, including the manner in
which our hero saved his vessel from destruction. The
frigate kept between her prize and the lugger, to conceal the
fact that a boat remained on board the former; and, when
all was ready, the felucca was apparently permitted to
proceed
on her voyage. The other two prizes were allowed to
go free, also, as cloaks to the whole affair. Griffin, as has
been seen, kept standing in for the land; his object being to
get up stream from the lugger, and as near her as possible.
When he found himself almost as far ahead as was desirable,
drags were used, to keep the craft stationary; and, in this
manner, she drifted down on her intended victim, as has
been already described. But for the sagacity and uneasiness
of Ithuel, the plan would altogether have escaped detection;
and, but for the coolness, courage, and resources of Raoul,
it would infallibly have succeeded, notwithstanding the
suspicions
that had been excited.
Cuffe, and the people on deck, watched the whole affair
with the deepest interest. They were barely able to see
the sails of the felucca, by means of a night-glass, as she
was dropping down on the lugger; and Yelverton had just
exclaimed that the two vessels were foul of each other, when
the flames broke out. As a matter of course, at that
distance
,
both craft seemed on fire; and when le Feu-Follet
had dropped a hundred yards nearer to the frigate, leaving
the felucca blazing, the two were so exactly in a line, as to
bring them together, as seen from the former's decks. The
English expected, every moment, to hear the explosion of
the lugger's magazine; but, as it did not happen, they came
to the conclusion it had been drowned. As for Griffin, he
pulled in-shore, both to avoid the fire of le Feu-Follet, in
passing her broadside, and in the hope of intercepting Raoul,
while endeavouring to escape in a boat. He even went to
a landing in the river, quite a league from the anchorage,
and waited there until long past midnight, when, finding the
night beginning to cloud over, and the obscurity to increase,
he returned to the frigate, giving the smouldering wreck a
wide berth, for fear of accidents.
Such, then, was the state of things, when Captain Cuffe
appeared on deck, just as the day began to dawn, on the
following morning. He had given orders to be called at
that hour, and was now all impatience to get a view of the
sea, more particularly in-shore. At length the curtain began
slowly to rise, and his view extended farther and farther
towards the river, until all was visible, even to the very land.
Not a craft of any sort was in sight. Even the wreck had
disappeared; though this was subsequently discovered in the
surf; having drifted out with the current, until it struck an
eddy, which carried it in again, when it was finally stranded.
No vestige of le Feu-Follet, however, was to be seen. Not
even a tent on the shore, a wandering boat, a drifting spar,
or a rag of a sail! All had disappeared, no doubt, in the
conflagration. As Cuffe went below, he walked with a more
erect mien than he had done since the affair of the pre
vious morning; and as he opened his writing-desk, it was
with the manner of one entirely satisfied with himself, and
his own exertions. Still, a generous regret mingled with
his triumph. It was a great thing to have destroyed the
most pernicious privateer that sailed out of France; and yet
it was a melancholy fate to befall seventy or eighty human
beingsto perish like so many curling caterpillars,
destroyed
by fire. Nevertheless, the thing was done; and it
must be reported to the authorities above him. The
following
letter was consequently written to the commanding
officer in that sea, viz:
His Majesty's Ship, Proserpine, off the mouth of the Golo,
Island of Corsica,
July 23, 1799.
My LordI have the satisfaction of reporting, for the
information of my Lords Commissioners of the Admiralty,
the destruction of the Republican privateer, the le Few-Folly,
commanded by the notorious Raoul Yvard, on the night of
the 22d inst. The circumstances attending this important
success, are as follows. Understanding that the celebrated
picaroon had been on the Neapolitan and Roman coasts,
doing much mischief, I took His Majesty's ship close in,
following up the peninsula, with the land in sight, until we
got through the Canal of Elba, early on the morning of the
21st. On opening Porto Ferrajo bay, we saw a lugger
lying at anchor off the town, with English colours flying.
As this was a friendly port, we could not suppose the craft
to be the le Few-Folly; but, determined to make sure, we
beat in, signalling the stranger, until he took advantage of
our stretching well over to the eastward, to slip round the
rocks, and get off to-windward. We followed, for a short
distance, and then ran over under the lee of Capraya, where
we remained until the morning of the 22d, when we again
went off the town. We found the lugger in the offing; and
being now well satisfied of her character, and it falling calm,
I sent the boats after her, under Messrs. Winchester and
Griffin, the first and second of this ship. After a sharp
skirmish, in which we sustained some loss, though that of
the Republicans was evidently much greater, Monsieur
Yvard succeeded in effecting his escape, in consequence of a
breeze's suddenly springing up. Sail was now made on the
ship, and we chased the lugger into the mouth of the Golo.
Having fortunately captured a felucca, with a quantity of
tar, and other combustible materials on board, as we drew
in with the land, I determined to make a fire-ship of her, and
to destroy the enemy by that mode; he having anchored
within the shoals, beyond the reach of shot. Mr.
Winchester
,
the first, having been wounded in the boat-affair, I
entrusted the execution of this duty to Mr. Griffin, who
handsomely volunteered, and by whom it was effectually
discharged, about ten last evening, in the coolest and most
officer-like manner. I enclose this gentleman's report of
the affair, and beg leave to recommend him to the favour of
my Lords Commissioners. With Mr. Winchester's good
conduct, under a sharp fire, in the morning, the service has
also every reason to be satisfied. I hope this valuable officer
will soon be able to return to duty.
Permit me to congratulate you, my lord, on the complete
destruction of this most pernicious cruiser of the enemy. So
effectual has it been, that not a spar, or a fragment of wreck,
remains. We have reason to think every soul on board
perished; and though this fearful loss of human life is to be
deeply deplored, it has been made in the service of good
government and religion. The lugger was filled with loose
women; our people hearing them singing their philosophical
and irreligious songs, as they approached with the fire-vessel.
I shall search the coast for any rafts that may be drifting
about, and then proceed to Leghorn for fresh provisions.
I have the honour to be, my lord,
Your lordship's most obedient servant,
Richard Cuffe
.
To Rear Admiral the Right Hon. Lord Nelson,
Duke of Bronte, &c., &c., &c.
Cuffe read this report over twice; then he sent for Griffin,
to whom he read it aloud, glancing his eye meaningly at his
subordinate, when he came to the part where he spoke of
the young man's good conduct.
So much for that dd Jack-o'-Lantern, Griffin! I
fancy it will lead no one else on a wild-goose chase.
I trust not, sir. Will you allow me to suggest a slight
alteration in the spelling of the lugger's name, Captain Cuffe;
the clerk can make it, when he writes out the letter fairly.
AyI dare say, it is different from what
we
would have
it; French spelling being no great matter, in general. Put
it as you please; though Nelson has as great a contempt
for their boasted philosophy and learning, as I have myself.
I fancy you will find all the English spelt right. How do
you
write their confounded gibberish?
Feu-Follet, sir, pronouncing the last part of it fol-
lay;
not fol-
ly
. I was thinking of asking leave, Captain Cuffe,
to take one of the cutters, and pull up to the lugger's
anchorage
,
and see if anything can be found of her wreck. The
ship will hardly get under-way until the westerly wind
comes.
No, probably not. I will order my gig manned, and
we'll go together. Poor Winchester must keep house
awhile; so there is no use in asking him. I saw no
necessity
for putting Nelson into a passion, by saying anything
about the exact amount of our loss, in that boat scrape,
Griffin.
I agree with you, sir, that it is best as it is.`Some loss'
covers every thingit means, `more or less.'
That was just my notion.I dare say, there may have
been twenty women in the lugger?
I can't answer for the number, sir; but I heard female
singing, as we got near, in the fire-ship; and think it likely
there may have been that number. The lugger was
full-manned
;
for they were like bees swarming on her forecastle,
when we were dropping foul. I saw Raoul Yvard, by the
light of the fire, as plainly as I now see you; and might
have picked him off with a musket; but that would hardly
have been honourable.
To this Cuffe assented, and then he led the way on deck,
having previously ordered the boats manned. The two
officers proceeded to the spot where they supposed the
Feu-Follet
had been anchored, and rowed round, for near an
hour, endeavouring to find some traces of her wreck on the
bottom. Griffin suggested that, when the magazine was
drowned, in the hurry and confusion of the moment, the cock
may have been left opena circumstance that might very
well have carried down the bottom of so small a vessel, in
two or three hours; more especially after her hull had
burnt to the water's edge. The next thing was to find this
bottom, by no means a hopeless task, as the waters of the
Mediterranean are usually so clear, that the eye can
penetrate
several fathoms, even off the mouth of the Golo; a
stream that brought more or less dbris from the mountains.
It is scarcely necessary to say, that the search was not
rewarded with success, the Feu-Follet being, just at that
time, snug at anchor at Bastia, where her people had already
taken out her wounded mainmast, with a view to step a new
one in its place. At that very moment, Carlo Giuntotardi
his niece, and Raoul Yvard, were walking up the principal
street of the town, the place standing on a hill, like Porto
Ferrajo, perfectly at their ease, as regards fire-ships,
English
frigates, and the dangers of the seas. But all this was
a profound mystery to Cuffe and his companions, who had
long been in the habit of putting the most favourable
constructions
on the results of their professional undertakings,
and, certainly, not altogether without reason; and who
nothing doubted that le Feu-Follet had, to use their own
language, laid her bones somewhere along-shore, here.
After two or three hours passed in a fruitless search, Cuffe
determined to return to his ship. He was a keen sportsman,
and had brought a fowling-piece with him, in his gig, with a
half-formed design of landing, and whiling away the time,
until the westerly wind came, among some marshes that he
saw near the shore; but had been persuaded, by Griffin, not
to venture.
There must be woodcock in that wet ground, Griffin,
he said, as he reluctantly yielded a little in his intention;
and Winchester would fancy a bird, exceedingly, in a day
or two. I never was hit, in my life, that I did not feel a
desire for game, after the fever was gone. Snipe, too, must
live on the banks of that stream. Snipe are coming in
season, now, Griffin?
It's more likely, sir, that some of the privateersmen
have got ashore on planks, and empty casks, and are
prowling
about in the weeds, watching our boats. Three or four
of them would be too much for you, Captain Cuffe, as the
scoundrels all carry knives as long as ships' cutlasses.
I suppose your notion may be true; and I shall have to
give it up. Pull back to the frigate, Davy, and we'll be off
after some more of these French ragamuffins.
This settled the matter. In half-an-hour, the boats were
swinging at the Proserpine's quarters; and three hours
later, the ship was under her canvass, standing slowly off
the land. That day, however, the zephyr was exceedingly
light, and the sun set, just as the ship got the small island
of Pianosa abeam; when the air came from the northward,
and the ship's head was laid in to the eastward; the course
lying between the land just mentioned, and that of Elba.
All night the Proserpine was slowly fanning her way along
the south side of the latter island, when, getting the southerly
air again, in the morning, she reappeared in the Canal of
Piombino, as the day advanced, precisely as she had done
before, when first introduced to the acquaintance of the
reader. Cuffe had given orders to be called, as usual, when
the light was about to return; it being a practice with him,
in that active and pregnant war, to be on deck at such
moments
,
in order to ascertain, with his own eyes, what the
fortunes of the night had brought within his reach.
Well, Mr. Griffin, he said, as soon as he had received
the salutation of the officer of the watch, you have had a
still night of it. Yonder is the Point of Piombino, I see; and
here we have got Elba, and this little rocky island, again,
on our larboard hand. One day is surprisingly like another,
about these times, for us mariners, in particular.
Do you really think so, Captain Cuffe?Now, to my
notion, this day hasn't had its equal on the Proserpine's log,
since we got hold of I'Epervier, and her convoy. You
forget
,
sir, that we destroyed le Feu-Follet, last night!
Ay  that is something  especially for
you
, Griffin.
Well, Nelson will hear of it by mail, as soon as we can get
into Leghorn; which will be immediately after I have had
an opportunity of communicating with these people in Porto
Ferrajo. After all that has passed, the least we can do is to
let your veechy-govern-the-tories know of our success.
Sail, ho! shouted the look-out, on the foretopsail-yard.
The two officers turned, and gazed around them, in every
direction, when the captain made the customary demand of
Where-away?
Here, sir, close aboard of us, on our larboard hand, and
on our weather quarter.
On our weather quarter!Dn me, if that
can
be
Vol. I.  16
true, Griffin. There is nothing but the island, there.The
fellow cannot have mistaken this little island for the hull of
a ship!
If he has, sir, answered Griffin, laughing, it must be
for a twenty-decker. That is Ben Brown, aloft; and he is
as good a look-out as we have in the ship.
Do you see her, sir? demanded Ben Brown, looking
over his shoulder, to put the question.
Not a bit of her, cried Cuffe. You must be
dreaming
,
fellow.What does she look like!
There, this small island shuts her in, from the deck, sir.
She is a lugger; and looks as much like the one we burnt
last night, sir, as one of our cat-heads is like t'other.
A lugger! exclaimed Cuffe. What, another of the
blackguards! By Jove! I'll go aloft, and take a look for
myself. It's ten to one that I see her from the maintop.
In three minutes more, Captain Cuffe was in the top in
question; having passed through the lubber-hole, as every
sensible man does, in a frigate, more especially when she
stands up for want of wind. That was an age in which
promotion was rapid; there being few grey-bearded
lieutenants
,
then, in the English marine; and even admirals were
not wanting who had not cut all their wisdom-teeth. Cuffe,
consequently, was still a young man; and it cost him no
great effort to get up his ship's ratlins, in the manner named.
Once in the top, he had all his eyes about him. For quite
a minute, he stood motionless, gazing in the direction that
had been pointed out by Ben Brown. All this time Griffin
stood on the quarter-deck, looking quite as intently at his
superior, as the latter gazed at the strange sail. Then Cuffe
deigned to cast a glance literally beneath him, in order to
appease the curiosity, which, he well understood, it was so
natural for the officer of the watch to feel. Griffin did not
dare to ask his
captain
what he saw; but he looked a volume
of questions on the interesting subject.
A sister corsair, by Jupiter Ammon! cried Cuffe; a
twin
sister, too; for they
are
as much alike as one cat-head
is like another. More, by Jove, if I am any judge.
What will you have us do, Captain Cuffe? inquired the
lieutenant. We are now going to leeward, all the while.
I don't know, sir, that there is positively a current here,
but
Very well, sirvery wellhaul up on the larboard
tack, as soon as possible, and get the larboard batteries clear.
We may have to cripple the chap, in order to get hold of
him.
As this was said, Cuffe descended through the same
lubber-hole
,
and soon appeared on deck. The ship, now, became
a scene of activity and bustle. All hands were called, and
the guns were cleared away, by some, while others braced
the yards, according to the new line of sailing.
The reader would be greatly aided, in understanding what
is to follow, could he, perchance, cast a look at a map of
the cast of Italy. He will there see that the eastern side
of the Island of Elba, runs in a nearly north and south
direction, Piombino lying off about north-north-east, from its
northern extremity. Near this northern extremity, lies the
little rocky islet, so often mentioned, or the spot which
Napoleon
,
fifteen years later, selected as the advanced redoubt
of his insular empire. Of course, the Proserpine was on one
side of this islet, and the strange lugger on the other. The
first had got so far through the Canal, as to be able to haul
close upon the wind, on the larboard tack, and yet to clear
the islet; while the last was just far enough to windward, or
sufficiently to the southward, to be shut out from view, from
the frigate's decks, by the intervening rocks. As the
distance
from the islet to the island did not much exceed a
hundred or two yards, Captain Cuffe hoped to enclose his
chase between himself and the land, never dreaming that
the stranger would think of standing through so narrow and
rocky a pass. He did not know his man, however, who
was Raoul Yvard; and who had come this way, from Bastia,
in the hope of escaping any further collision with his
formidable
foe. He had seen the frigate's lofty sails, above the
rock, as soon as it was light; and being under no
hallucination
,
on the subject of
her
existence, he knew her at a glance.
His first order was to haul everything as flat as possible;
and his great desire was, to get from under the lee of the
mountains of Elba, into this very pass, through which the
wind drew with more force, than it blew anywhere, near by.
As the Proserpine was quite a league off, in the Canal, le
Feu-Follet, which sailed so much the fastest, in light winds,
had abundance of time to effect her object. Instead of
avoiding the narrow pass between the two islands, Raoul
glided boldly into it; and, by keeping vigilant eyes on his
fore-yard, to apprize him of danger, he succeeded in making
two stretches, in the strait itself, coming out to the southward,
on the starboard tack, handsomely clearing the end of the
islet, at the very instant the frigate appeared on the other
side of the pass. The lugger had now an easy task of it;
for she had only to watch her enemy, and tack in season, to
keep the islet between them; since the English did not dare
to carry so large a ship through so narrow an opening.
This advantage Raoul did not overlook, and Cuffe had gone
about twice, closing, each time, nearer and nearer to the islet,
before he was satisfied that his guns would be of no service,
until he could, at least, weather the intervening object; after
which they would most probably be useless, in so light a
wind, by the distance between them and their enemy.
Never mind, Mr. Griffin; let this scamp go, said the
captain, when he made this material discovery; it is pretty
well to have cleared the seas of one of them.Besides, we
do not know that this
is
an enemy, at all. He showed no
colours, and seems to have just come out of Porto Ferrajo,
a friendly haven.
Raoul Yvard did
that
, sir, not once, but twice, muttered
Yelverton, who, from the circumstance that he had not been
employed in the different attempts on le Feu-Follet, was one
of the very few dissentients in the ship, touching her fate.
These twins
are
exceedingly alike; especially
Pomp
, as
the American negro said of his twin children.
This remark passed unheeded; for so deep was the
delusion
,
in the ship, touching the destruction of the privateer, it
would have been as hopeless an attempt, to try to persuade
her officers and people, generally, that le Feu-Follet was not
burned, as it would be to induce a great nation to believe
it had any of the weaknesses and foibles that confessedly
beset smaller communities. The Proserpine was put about,
again; and, setting her ensign, she stood into the bay of
Porto Ferrajo; anchoring quite near the place that Raoul
had selected for the same purpose, on two previous occasions.
The gig was lowered, and Cuffe, accompanied by Griffin, as
an interpreter, landed, to pay the usual visit of ceremony to
the authorities.
The wind being so light, several hours were necessary
to effect all these changes; and, by the time the two officers
were ascending the terraced street, the day had advanced
sufficiently to render the visit suitable, as to time. Cuffe
appearing in full uniform, with epaulettes and sword, his
approach attracted notice; and Vito Viti had hurried off to
apprize his friend of the honour he was about to receive.
The vice-governatore was not taken by surprise, therefore,
but had some little time to prepare his excuses, for being the
dupe of a fraud, as impudent as that which Raoul Yvard
had so successfully practised on him. The reception was
dignified, though courteous; and it had none the less of
ceremony, from the circumstance that all which was said by
the respective colloquists, had to be translated, before it
could be understood. This circumstance rendered the few
first minutes of the interview a little constrained; but each
party having something on his mind, of which it was his
desire to be relieved, natural feeling soon got the better of
forms.
I ought to explain to you, Sir Cuffe, the manner in
which a recent event occurred in our bay, here, observed
the vice-governatore; since, without such explanation, you
might be apt to consider us neglectful of our duties, and
unworthy of the trust which the Grand Duke reposes in
us. I allude, as you will at once understand, to the
circumstance
that le Feu-Follet has twice been lying peaceably
under the guns of our batteries, while her commander, and,
indeed, some of her crew, have been hospitably entertained
on shore.
Such things must occur, in times like these, Mr.
Veechy-Governatory
;
and we seamen set them down to the luck of
war, Cuffe answered, graciously, being much too
magnanimous
,
under his own success, to think of judging others too
harshly. It might not be so easy to deceive a
man-of-war's-man
,
like myself; but, I dare say,
Veechy-Governatory
,
had it been anything relating to the administration of
your little island, here, even Monsieur Yvard would have
found you too much for him?
The reader will perceive that Cuffe had got a new way
16 *
of pronouncing the appellation of the Elban functionary; a
circumstance that was owing to the desire we all have, when
addressing foreigners, to speak in their own language, rather
than in our own. The worthy captain had no more precise
ideas of what a
vice
-governor means, than the American
people, just now, seem to possess of the signification of
vice
-president
;
but, as he had discovered that the word was
pronounced veechy, in Italian, he was quite willing to
give it its true sound; albeit, a smile struggled round the
mouth of Griffin, while he listened.
You do me no more than justice, Signor Kooffe, or Sir
Kooffe, as, I presume, I ought to address you, answered the
functionary; for, in matters touching our duties on shore,
here, we are by no means as ignorant, as on matters
touching
your honourable calling. This Raoul Yvard presented
himself, to me, in the character of a British officer, one I
esteem and respect; having audaciously assumed the name
of a family of high condition, and of great power, I believe,
among your people
Ahthe Barone! exclaimed Cuffe; who, having
discovered
by his intercourse with the southern Italians that
this word meant a rascal, as well as a baron, was fond
of using it, on suitable occasions. Pray,
Veechy-Governatory
,
what name did he assume? Ca'endish, or Howard,
or Seymour, or some of those great nobs, Griffin, I'll engage!
I wonder that he spared Nelson!
No, Signore, he took the family appellation of another
illustrious race. The republican corsair presented himself
before me as a Sir Smeesthe son of a certain Milordo
Smees.
SmeesSmeesSmees!I've no recollection of any
such name, in the peerage. It can't be Seymour that the
Veechy means!
That
is a great name, certainly; and some
of them have been in the service; it is possible this barone
may have had the impudence to hail for a Seymour!
I rather think not, Captain Cuffe. `Smees' is very
much as an Italian would pronounce `Smith,' as, you know,
the French call it `Smeet.' It will turn out that this Mr.
Raoul has seized upon the first English name he fell in with,
as a man overboard clutches at a spar adrift, or a life-buoy;
and that happened to be `Smith.'
Who the devil ever heard of a my lord Smith! A
pretty sort of aristocracy we should have, Griffin, if it were
made up of such fellows!
Why, sir, the
name
can make no great difference; the
deeds and the antiquity forming the essentials.
And he assumed a title to
Sir
Smees!I dare say, he
was ready to swear His Majesty made him a Knight
Banneret
,
under the royal ensign, and on the deck of his own
ship; as was done with some of the old admirals. The
veechy, however, has forgotten a part of the story, as it
must have been Sir
John
, or Sir
Thomas
Smees, at least.
No, sir; that is the way with the French and the Italians,
who do not understand our manner of using Christian names
with titles; as in our Sir Edwards, and Lord Harrys, and
Lady Bettys.
Blast the French! I can believe anything of
them
,
though I should have thought that these
Italians
knew
better
.
However, it may be well to give the veechy a hint of
what we have been saying, or it may seem rudeand,
hearkee, Griffin, while you
are
about it, rub him down a
little touching books, and that sort of thing; for the surgeon
tells me, he has heard of him, in Leghorn, as a regular
leaf-cutter
.
The lieutenant did as ordered, throwing in an allusion to
Andrea's reputation for learning, that, under the
circumstances
,
was not ill-timed; and which, as it was well-enough
expressed, was exceedingly grateful to his listener, just at
that awkward moment.
My claims to literature are but small, Signore,
answered
Andrea, with humility, as I beg you will inform
Sir Kooffe; but they were sufficient to detect certain
assumptions
of this corsair; a circumstance that came very near
bringing about an exposure, at a most critical moment. He
had the audacity, Signore, to wish to persuade
me
, that there
was a certain English orator of the same name, and of equal
merit of him of Roma and Pompeiione Sir Cicero!
The Barone! again exclaimed Cuffe, when this new
offence of Raoul's was explained to him. I believe the
rascal was up to anything. But there is an end of him,
now, with all his Sir Smees, and Sir Ciceroes, into the
bargain
.
Just let the veechy into the secret of the fellow's fate,
Griffin.
Griffin then related to the vice-governatore the manner in
which it was supposed that le Feu-Follet, Raoul Yvard, and
all his associates, had been consumed, like caterpillars on a
tree. Andrea Barrofaldi listened, with a proper degree of
horror expressed in his countenance; but Vito Viti heard the
tale with signs of indifference and incredulity that he did not
care to conceal. Nevertheless, Griffin persevered, until he
had even given an account of the manner in which he and
Cuffe examined the lugger's anchorage, in the bootless attempt
to discover the wreck.
To all this, the two functionaries listened with profound
attention, and a lively surprise. After looking at each other
several times, and exchanging significant gestures, Andrea
assumed the office of explaining.
There is some extraordinary mistake in this, Signor
Tenente, he said; for Raoul Yvard still lives. He passed
this promontory just as day dawned, in his lugger, this very
morning!
Ay, he has got that notion from having seen the fellow
we fell in with off the harbour, here, answered Cuffe, when
this speech was translated to him; and I don't wonder at
it, for the two vessels were surprisingly alike. But the
Barone, that we saw burned with our own eyes, Griffin, can
never float again. I say Barone; for, in my opinion, the
Few-Folly was just as much of a rascal, as her commander,
and all who sailed in her.
Griffin explained this; but it met with no favour from the
two Italians.
Not so, Signor Tenentenot so, returned the
vice-governatore
;
the lugger that passed, this morning, we
know
to be le Feu-Follet, inasmuch as she took one of our
own feluccas, in the course of the night, coming from
Livorno, and Raoul Yvard permitted her to come in, as he
said to her padrone, on account of the civil treatment he had
received, while lying in our port. Nay, he even carried his
presumption so far, as to send me, by means of the same
man, the compliments of `Sir Smees,' and his hopes of being
able, some day, to make his acknowledgments in person.
The English Captain received this intelligence, as might
be expected; and, unpleasant as it was, after putting various
questions to the vice-governatore, and receiving the answers,
he was obliged, unwillingly enough, to believe it all. He
had brought his official report in his pocket; and, as the
conversation proceeded, he covertly tore it into fragments,
so small, that even a Mahommedan would reject them, as
not large enough to write the word Allah on.
It 's dh lucky, Griffin, that letter didn't get to
Leghorn
,
this morning, he said, after a long pause. Nelson
would have Brontd me, famously, had he got it! Yet, I
never believed half as devoutly in the twenty-nine articles,
as
I believe there are
thirty
-nine of them, Captain Cuffe,
modestly put in Griffin.
Well,
thirty
-nine, if you willwhat signifies ten, more
or less, in such matters? A man is ordered to believe them
all
, if there were a hundred.But I never believed in
them
,
as devoutly, as I believed in the destruction of that infernal
picaroon. My faith is unsettled, for life!
Griffin offered a few words of condolence, but he was also
too much mortified to be very able to administer consolation.
Andrea Barrofaldi, understanding the state of the case, now
interposed with his courtesies, and the two officers were
invited
to share his bachelor's breakfast. What followed, in
consequence of this visit, and the communications to which
it gave rise, will appear in the course of the narrative.
CHAPTER XIII.
If ever you have looked on better days,
If ever been where bells have knolled to church;
If ever sat at any good man's feast!
If ever from your eyelids wiped a tear,
And know what 'tis to pity, and be pitied,
Let gentleness my strong enforcement be.
Shakspeare
.
It
is now necessary to advance the time, and to transfer
the scene of our tale to another, but not a distant part of the
same sea. Let the reader fancy himself standing at the
mouth of a large bay, of some sixteen or eighteen miles
in diameter, in nearly every direction; though the shores
must be indented, with advancing promontories, and receding
curvatures, while the depth of the whole might possibly a little
exceed the greatest width. He will then occupy the spot at
which we wish to present to him one of the fairest panoramas
of earth. On his right stands a high, rocky island, of dark
tufa, rendered gay, amid all its magnificent formations, by
smiling vineyards and teeming villages, and interesting by
ruins that commemorate events as remote as the Csars.
A narrow passage of the blue Mediterranean separates this
island from a bold cape on the main, whence follows a
succession
of picturesque, village-clad heights and valleys,
relieved by scenery equally bold and soft, and adorned by
the monkish habitations called in the language of the
country
,
Camaldolis, until we reach a small city which stands on
a plain that rises above the water between one and two
hundred
feet, on a base of tufa, and the houses of which extend
to the very verge of the dizzy cliffs that limit its extent on
the north. The plain, itself, is like a hive, with its dwellings
and scenes of life, while the heights behind it teem with
cottages
and the signs of human labour. Quitting this smiling
part of the coast, we reach a point, always following the
circuit of the bay, where the hills or heights tower into
ragged mountains, which stretch their pointed peaks
upwards
to some six or seven thousand feet towards the
clouds, having sides now wild with precipices and ravines,
now picturesque with shooting-towers, hamlets, monasteries
and bridle-paths; and bases dotted, or rather lined, with
towns and villages. Here the mountain formation quits the
margin of the bay, following the coast southward, or running
into the interior of the country; and the shore, sweeping
round to the north and west, offers a glimpse into a
back-ground
of broad plain, ere it meets a high, insulated, conical
mountain, which properly forms the head of the coast
indentation
.
The human eye never beheld a more affluent
scene of houses, cities, villages, vineyards and country
residences
,
than was presented by the broad breast of this
isolated mountain; passing which, a wider view is obtained
of the rich plain that seems to lie behind it, bounded, as it is,
by a wall of a distant and mysterious-looking, yet bold
range of the Apennines. Returning to the shore, which now
begins to incline more westwardly, we come to another swell
of tufa, which has all the characteristic fertility and
abruptness
of that peculiar formation, a vast and populous town of
near half a million of souls being seated, in nearly equal
parts, on the limits of the plain and along the margin of the
water, or on the hill-sides, climbing to their summits. From
this point, the northern side of the bay is a confused mass
of villages, villas, ruins, palaces and vines, until we reach
its extremity; a low promontory, like its opposite
neighbour
.
A small island comes next, a sort of natural sentinel;
then the coast sweeps northward, into another and a smaller
bay, rich, to satiety, with relics of the past, terminating at a
point, some miles farther seaward, with a high, reddish,
sandy bluff, which almost claims to be a mountain. After
this we see two more islands, lying westward, one of which
is flat, fertile, and more populous, as is said, than any other
part of Europe of the same extent; while the other is a
glorious combination of pointed mountains, thronged towns,
fertile valleys, castles, country-houses, and the wrecks of
long-dormant volcanoes, thrown together in a grand, yet
winning confusion. If the reader will, to this description,
add a shore that has scarce a foot that is not interesting
with some lore of the past, extending from yesterday into the
darkest recesses of history, give life to the water-view with a
fleet of little latine-rigged craft, rendered more picturesque by
an occasional ship, dot the bay with countless boats of
fishermen
,
and send up a wreath of smoke from the summit of the
cone-like mountain that forms the head of the bay, he will
get an outline of all that strikes the eye, as the stranger
approaches Naples from the sea.
The zephyr was again blowing, and the daily fleet of
sparanaras, or undecked feluccas, that passes every morning,
at this season, from the south shore to the capital, and
returns
at this hour, was stretching out from under Vesuvius;
some looking up as high as Massa; others heading towards
Sorrento, or Vico, or Persano, and many keeping more
before the wind, towards Castel a Mare, or the landings in
that neighbourhood. The breeze was getting to be so fresh,
that the fishermen were beginning to pull in towards the land,
breaking up their lines, which, in some places, had extended
nearly a league, and this, too, with the boats lying within
speaking distance of each other. The head of the bay,
indeed, was alive with craft, moving in different directions,
while a large fleet of English, Russians, Neapolitans, and
Turks, composed of two-deckers, frigates and sloops, lay at
their anchors, in front of the town. On board of one of the
largest of the former, was flying the flag of a rear-admiral
at the mizzen, the symbol of the commander's rank. A
corvette, alone, was under-way. She had left the
anchorage
an hour before, and, with studding-sails on her starboard
side, was stretching diagonally across the glorious bay,
apparently heading towards the passage between Capri and
the Point of Campanella, bound to Sicily. This ship might
easily have weathered the island; but her commander, an
easy sort of person, chose to make a fair wind of it from the
start, and he thought, by hugging the coast, he might
possibly
benefit by the land-breeze, during the night, trusting to
the zephyr that was then blowing, to carry him across the
Gulf of Salerno. A frigate, too, shot out of the fleet, under
her staysails, as soon as the westerly wind made; but, she
had dropped an anchor under-foot, and seemed to wait some
preparation, or orders, before taking her departure; her
captain being, at that moment, on board the flag-ship, on
duty with the rear-admiral. This was the Proserpine
thirty-six
,
Captain Cuffe, a vessel and an officer that are already
both acquaintances of the reader. About an hour before the
present scene opens, Captain Cuffe, in fact, had been called
on board the Foudroyant, by signal, where he had found a
small, sallow-looking, slightly-built man, with his right arm
wanting, pacing the deck of the fore-cabin, impatient for his
appearance.
Well, Cuffe, said this uninviting-looking personage,
twitching the stump of the maimed arm, I see you are out
of the flock; are you all ready for sailing?
We have one boat ashore, after letters, my lord; as
soon as she comes off, we shall lift our anchor, which is only
under-foot.
Very wellI have sent the Ringdove to the southward,
on the same errand, and I see she is half-a-league from the
anchorage, on her way, already. This Mr. Griffin appears
to be a fine young manI like his account of the way he
handled his fire-ship; though the French scoundrel did
contrive
to escape! After all, this Rowl EE how do you
pronounce the fellow's name, Cuffe?I never can make
anything out of their gibberish
Why, to own the truth, Sir HoratioI beg pardonmy
lordthere is something in the English grain of my feelings
that would prevent my ever learning French, had I been
born and brought up in Paris. There is too much Saxon in
me, to swallow words that half the time have no meaning.
I like you all the better, for that, Cuffe, answered the
admiral, smiling, a change that converted a countenance that
was almost ugly, when in a state of rest, into one that was
almost handsomea peculiarity that is by no means of rare
occurrence, when a strong will gives the expression to the
features, and the heart, at bottom, is really sound. An
Englishman has no business with any Gallic tendencies.
This young Mr. Griffin seems to have spirit; and I look
upon it, always, as a good sign, when a young man
volunteers
for a desperate thing of this sortbut, he tells me, he
is only second; where was your first, all the while?
Why, my lord, he got a little hurt in the brush of the
morning; and I would not let him go, as a matter of course.
His name is Winchester; I think you must remember him,
as junior of the Captain, at the affair off St. Vincent. Miller
[5]
[5]
Ralph Willet Miller, the officer who commanded the ship to which
Nelson shifted his pennant, at the battle of Cape St. Vincent. This
gentleman was an American, and a native Manhattanese; his near
relatives, of the same name, still residing in New York. It is believed
that he got the name of
Willet
from the first English mayor; a
gentleman
from whom are descended many of the old families of the lower
part of the state; more particulary those on Long-Island.
Vol. I  17
had a good opinion of him; and, when I went from the
Arrow to the Proserpine, he got him sent as my second.
The death of poor Drury made him first, in the natural
way.
I have some recollection of him, Cuffe.That was a
brilliant day, and all its events should be impressed on my
mind. You tell me, Mr. Griffin fairly grappled the lugger's
cable?
Of that there can be no manner of doubt.I saw the
two vessels foul of each other, with my night-glass  and,
seemingly, both were on fireas plainly as I ever saw
Vesuvius
,
in a dark night.
And yet this Few-Folly has escaped!Poor Griffin has
run a desperate risk, for little purpose.
He has, indeed, my lord.
Here, Nelson, who had been pacing the cabin with quick
steps, while Cuffe stood, respectfully declining the gesture to
be seated, at the table in its centre, suddenly stopped, and
looked the Captain steadily in the face. The expression of
his countenance was now mild and earnest, and the pause
which preceded his words, gave the latter solemnity and
weight.
The day will come, Cuffe, he said, when this young
man will rejoice that his design on these picaroons,
Frenchmen
as they are, failed. Yes, from the bottom of his heart,
will he be glad.
My lord!
I know you think this strange, Captain Cuffe; but no
man sleeps the sounder for having burnt or blown up a
hundred of his fellow-creatures, like so many widows at a
suttee.But we are not the less to commend those who did
what was certainly their duty.
Am I to understand, Lord Nelson, that the Proserpine
is
not
to destroy the Few-Folly, at every hazard, should we
again have the luck to fall in with her?
By no means, sir. Our orders are to burn, sink and
destroy. Such is England's policy, in this desperate war;
and it must be carried out. You know what we are
contending
for, as well as I do; and it is a struggle that is not
to be carried on with courtesies; still, one would not wish to
see a glorious and sacred cause tarnished by inhumanity.
Men that fall in fair, manly combat, are to be envied rather
than pitied, since it is only paying the great debt of nature
a little sooner than might otherwise have happened; but
there is something revolting to humanity, in burning up our
fellow-creatures, as one would burn rags, after the plague.
Nevertheless, this lugger must be had, at any price; for
English commerce and English power are not to be cut up
and braved, in this audacious manner, with impunity. The
career of these French tigers must be stopped, at every
sacrifice
,
Captain Cuffe.
I know that, my lord; and I like a republican as little
as you can do; or His Majesty, himself, for that matter;
and, I take it,
he
has as little relish for the animal as flesh
and blood can give.
I know you do, CuffeI 'm
sure
you do; and I esteem
you all the more for it. It is a part of an Englishman's
religion, in times like these, to hate a Frenchman. I went
across the Channel, after the peace of '83, to learn their
language, but had so little sympathy with them, even in
peaceable times, as never to be able to make out to write a
letter in it, or even to ask intelligibly for the necessaries of
life.
If you can ask for anything, it far surpasses my efforts;
I never can tell head from stern, in their dialect.
It is an infernal jargon, Cuffe, and has got to be so
confused
by their academies, and false philosophy, and infidelity,
that they will shortly be at a loss to understand it
themselves
.
What sort of names they give their ships, for
instance
,
now they have beheaded their king, and denounced
their God!Who ever heard of christening a craft, as you
tell me this lugger is named, the `Few-Folly?'  I believe
I 've got the picaroon's title right?
Quite rightGriffin
pronounces
it so, though he has
got to be a little queerish, in his own English, by using so
much French and Italian. The young man's father was a
consul; and he has half-a-dozen foreign lingos stowed away
in his brain. He pronounces Folly, something broadish
like Fol
lay
, I believe  but it means all the same thing.
Folly is folly, pronounce it as you will.
Nelson continued to pace his cabin, working the stump
of his arm, and smiling half-bitterly; half in a sort of irony
that inclined him to be in a good-humour with himself.
Do you remember the ship, Cuffe, we had that sharp
brush with, off Toulon, in old Agamemnon? he said, after
making a turn or two, in silence? I mean the dismasted
eighty-four, that was in tow of the frigate, and which we
peppered until their Gallic soup had some taste to it! Now,
do you happen to know
her
real name, in good honest
English
?
I do not, my lord. I remember, they said she was
called the Ca Ira; and I always supposed that it was the
name of some old Greek or Romanor, perhaps, of one of
their new-fangled republican saints.
They!Dn 'em, they 've
got
no saints, to name,
my good fellow, since they cashiered all the old ones!
There
is
something respectable in the names of a
Spanish
fleet; and one feels that he is flogging gentlemen, at least,
while he is at work on them. No, sir, Ca Ira means, neither
more nor less, than `That 'll Do;' and, I fancy, Cuffe, they
thought of their own name more than once, while the old
Greek was hanging on their quarter, smashing their
cabin-windows
for them! A pretty sound it would have been, had
we got her, and put her into our own serviceHis Majesty's
ship `That 'll Do,' 84, Captain Cuffe!
I certainly should have petitioned my Lords
Commissioners
to change her name.
You would have done quite right.A man might as
well sail in a man-of-war called the `Enough.' Then, there
was the three-decker, that helped her out of the scrape, the
Sans-Culottes, as the French call her;I suppose, you know
what
that
means?
Not I, my lord; to own the truth, I 'm no scholar; and
am entirely without ambition, in that way. `Sans,' I
suppose
,
is the French for `saint;' but who `Culottes' was, I 've
not the least notion.
Nelson smiled, and the turn the conversation had taken
appeared to give him secret satisfaction. If the truth were
known, something lay heavily on his mind; and, with one
of his strong impulses, his feelings disposed him to rush
from one extreme to the other, as is often the case, with men
who are controlled by such masters; more especially, if their
general disposition is to the right.
You 're wrong, this time, my dear Cuffe, he said; for
`sans,' means `without,' in French, and `culottes,' means
`breeches.' Think of naming a three-decker, the `Without
Breeches!' I do not see how any respectable flag-officer
can mention such names, in his despatches, without a feeling
of awkwardness, that must come near to capsizing all his
philosophy. The line was formed by the Republic's ship,
the `That 'll Do,' leading, supported by the `Without
Breeches,' as her second astern!Ha! CuffeDe, sir,
if I 'd serve in a marine, that had such names to the ships!
It 's a thousand times worse, than all those saints, the
Spaniards
tack on to their vesselslike a line of boats, towing a
ship up to her moorings!
Here the conversation was interrupted by the appearance
of a midshipman, who came down to say that a man and a
woman, from the shore, wished to see the rear-admiral, on
pressing business.
Let them come down, sir, answered Nelson; I 've a
hard life of it, Cuffe; there is not a washerwoman, or a
shopkeeper
,
in Naples, who does not treat me exactly as if I
were a podest, and it were my duty to hear all the
contentions
about lost clothes, and mislaid goods. His Majesty
must appoint a Lord Chief Justice of the Steerage, to
administer
the law, for the benefit of the young gentlemen, or he 'll
soon get no officer to serve, with a flag at his mast-head.
Surely, my lord, the captains can take this weight off
your shoulders!
Ay, there are men, in the fleet, that
can
, and there are
men who
do;
but there are men who do
not
. But here
comes the plaintiff, I supposeyou shall hear the case, and
act as a puisne judge, in the matter.
This was said as the cabin-door opened, and the expected
guests entered. They were, a man turned of fifty, and a
girl of nineteen. The former was a person of plain exterior,
abstracted air, and downcast look; but the latter had all
the expression, beauty, nature, and grace of mien, that so
17 *
singularly marked the deportment and countenance of Ghita
Caraccioli. In a word, the two visiters were Carlo
Giuntotardi
,
and his gentle niece. Nelson was struck with the
modesty of mien and loveliness of the latter, and he
courteously
invited her to be seated, though he and Cuffe both
continued standing. A few efforts at making himself
understood
,
however, soon satisfied this renowned admiral that he
had need of an interpreter, his guests speaking no English,
and his own Italian being too imperfect to carry on anything
like a connected conversation. He hesitated an instant, and
then went to the door of the inner cabin, an apartment in
which voices had occasionally been heard, the whole time,
one of the speakers being evidently a female. Here he stood,
leaning against the bulkhead, as if in doubt; and then he
uttered his wishes.
I must ask a service of you, which I would not think of
doing in any ordinary case, he said, with a gentleness of
voice and manner that showed he addressed one who had
habitual influence over him. I want an interpreter,
between myself and the second handsomest woman in the
kingdom of Naples; and I know no one so fit for the office,
as the first.
With all my heart, dear Nelson, answered a full, rich,
female voice from within. Sir William is busied in his
antiquities; and I was really getting to be ennuied, for want
of an occupation. I suppose you have the wrongs of some
injured lady to redress, in your capacity of Lord High
Chancellor
of the Fleet.
I am yet ignorant of the nature of the complaint; but it
is not unlikely it will turn out to be something like that
which you suspect. Even in such a case, no better
intercessor
can be required, than one who is so much superior to
the frailties and weaknesses of her sex, in general.
The lady who now made her appearance from the inner
cabin, though strikingly handsome, had not that in her
appearance which would justify the implied eulogium of the
British admiral's last speech. There was an appearance of
art and worldliness, in the expression of her countenance,
that was only so much the more striking, when placed in
obvious contrast to the ingenuous nature and calm purity
that shone in every lineament of the face of Ghita. One
might very well have passed for an image of the goddess
Circe; while the other would have made no bad model for
a vestal, could the latter have borne the moral impression
of the sublime and heart-searching truths that are inculcated
by the real oracles of God. Then the lady was a woman
in the meridian of her charms, aided by all the cunning of
the toilet, and a taste that was piquant and peculiar, if not
pure; while the other stood in her simple, dark Neapolitan
boddice, and a head that had no other ornament than its own
silken tresses; a style of dress, however, that set off her
faultless form, and winning countenance, more than could
have been done by any of the devices of the mantua-maker
or the milliner. The lady betrayed a little surprise, and,
perhaps, a shade of uneasiness, as her glance first fell on
Ghita; but, much too good an actress to be disconcerted
easily, she smiled, and immediately recovered her ease.
Is
this
the being, Nelson, who comes with
such
a
petition
?
she demanded, with a touch of natural, womanly
sensibility, in her voice;and that poor old man, I dare
say, is the heart-stricken father.
As to the errand, you will remember, I know nothing,
as yet; and pledge myself to nothing.
Captain Cuffe, I hope I have the pleasure to see you
well.Sir William joins the admiral, in hoping you will
make one of our little family party to-day, at dinner, and
And what says the mistressnot of the house, but of
the
ship?
put in Nelson, whose eyes had scarce turned an
instant from the face of the siren, since she entered the
fore-cabin.
That she  always disclaiming the title, honourable
though it bethat she unites with all the rest, in inviting
Captain Cuffe to honour us with his company. Nelson tells
me you were one of his old Agamemnons, as he calls you
all, aged and young, men and boys, little and big; and I
love even the sound of the name. What a glorious title for
a shipAgamemnon!A Greek, led on by a true English
heart!
Ay, it
is
somewhat better than `That 'll Do,' and the
other affair, Ha! Cuffe! returned the admiral, smiling, and
glancing at his subordinateBut, all this time, we are
ignorant of the errand of this honest-looking Italian, and his
exceedingly innocent-looking companion.
Well, then, in this matter, gentlemen, I am only to be
regarded as a mere mouth-piece, put in the ladyan
echo, to repeat what reaches my ear, though it be an Irish
echo, which repeats in a different tongue from that in which
the sounds first reach it. Put your questions, my lord; they
shall be faithfully rendered, with all the answers that may
be given. I only hope Captain Cuffe will come out of this
affair, as innocent as he now looks.
The two gentlemen smiled; but the trifling could not
disturb
its subject, as he was profoundly ignorant of the
existence
of the two strangers, five minutes before; while the
boldness of the allusions, rather suited the freedom of a ship,
and the habits of the part of the world in which they happened
to be.
We will first inquire the name of this worthy man, if
you will condescend to ask it, observed Nelson, to his fair
friend.
Carlo Giuntotardi, noble ladyonce a poor scholar, in
Napoli, here, and now a keeper of the prince's watch-towers,
on the heights of Argentaro, was the quiet, but respectful
answer of the man, who, like his niece, had declined taking
a seat, a circumstance that left the whole party standing;
Carlo Giuntotardi, illustrious lady.
A very good name, Signore, and one of which you have
no need to be ashamed. And thine? turning to the girl.
Ghita Caraccioli, Eccellenza; the sister's daughter of
this honest tower-keeper of the prince.
Had a bomb exploded over the Foudroyant, Nelson
certainly
would not have been as much startled; while the
lady's beautiful face assumed a look of dark resentment, not
unmingled with fear. Even Cuffe understood enough of the
sounds to catch the name, and he advanced a step, with
lively curiosity, and an anxious concern expressed on his
ruddy face. But these emotions soon subsided, the lady
first regaining her self-possession, though Nelson paced the
cabin five or six times, working the stump of his arm, before
he even looked up, again.
I was about to ask if there
never
is to be an end of these
annoyances, observed the lady, in English; but there must
be some mistake in this. The house of Caraccioli is one of the
most illustrious of Italy, and can scarcely have any of this
class, who feel an interest in him of whom we are thinking.
I will, therefore, inquire further into this matter. Signorina,
changing the language to Italian, and speaking with
severity
,
like one who questioned what she heard
Caraccioli
is a noble name; and is not often borne by the daughter
of any prince's tower-keepers!
Ghita trembled, and she looked abashed. But she was
sustained by too high a principle, and was too innocent,
herself, to stand long rebuked, in the presence of guilt; and,
as the flush, which resembled that which so often passes over
her native skies, at even, left her countenance, she raised
her eyes to the dark-looking face of the lady, and gave her
answer.
I know what your Eccellenza means, she said, and
feel its justice. Still, it is cruel to the child, not to bear the
name of her parent. My father was called Caraccioli; and
he left me his name as my sole inheritance. What may
have been
his
right to it, let my uncle say.
Speak, then, Signor Giuntotardi. First, give us the
history of this
name;
then tell us what has brought you
here.
Noble lady, my sister, as pious and innocent a woman
as ever lived in Italy, and now, blessed in heaven, married
Don Francesco Caraccioli, the son of Don Francesco of that
illustrious family, who now stands condemned to death, for
having led the fleet against the king; and Ghita, here, is
the only fruit of the union. It is true, that the church did
not authorize the connection which brought my niece's
father into being; but the noble admiral never hesitated to
acknowledge his son, and he gave him his name, until love
bound him in wedlock with a poor scholar's sister. Then,
indeed, his father turned his face from him; and death soon
removed both husband and wife from the reach of all earthly
displeasure. This is our simple story, noble and illustrious
signora; and the reason why my poor niece, here, bears a
name as great as that of Caraccioli.
You mean us to understand, Signor Giuntotardi, that
your niece is the grand-daughter of Don Francesco
Caraccioli
,
through a natural son of that unfortunate admiral?
Such is the fact, Signora. As
my
sister was honestly
married, I could do no less than bring up her daughter to
bear a name that her father was permitted to bear before
her.
Such things are common; and require no apology.
One question more, before I explain to the English admiral
what you have said.Does Prince Caraccioli know of the
existence of this grand-daughter?
Eccellenza, I fear not. Her parents died so soonI
loved the child so welland there was so little hope that one
illustrious as he, would wish to acknowledge a connection
through the holy church, with persons humble as we, that I
have never done more to make my niece known, than to let
her bear the same name as her father.
The lady seemed relieved, by this; and she now briefly
explained to Nelson, the substance of what the other had
said.
It may be, she added, they are here on that errand,
concerning which we have, already, heard so much, and so
uselessly; but I rather think not, from this account; for
what interest
can
they feel in one who is absolutely a
stranger to them. It may be some idle conceit, however,
connected with this same affair. What is your wish, Ghita?
This is Don Horatio Nelsoni, the illustrious English
admiral
,
of whom you have heard so much.
Eccellenza, I am sure of it, answered Ghita, earnestly;
my good uncle, here, has told you who we are; and you
may well guess our business. We came from St. Agata, on
the other side of the bay, only this morning, and heard from
a relation in the town, that Don Francesco had been seized,
that very hour. Since, we are told, that he has been
condemned
to die, for treason against the king; and that, by
officers who met in this very ship. Some even say, signora,
that he is to meet his fate ere the sun set!
If this should be so, what reason is it that thou shouldst
give thyself concern?
Eccellenza, he was my father's father; and though I
never saw him, I know that the same blood runs in our
veins. When this is so, there should be the same feelings
in our hearts.
This is well, Ghita in appearance, at least; but thou
canst hardly feel much for one thou never saw'st, and who
has even refused to own thee for a child. Thou art young,
too, and of a sex that should ever be cautious; it is unwise
for men, even, to meddle with politics, in these troubled
times.
Signora, it is not politics that brings me here, but nature,
and duty, and pious love for my father's father.
What wouldst thou say, then? answered the lady,
impatiently
;
remember, thou occupiest one whose time is
precious, and of high importance to entire nations.
Eccellenza, I believe it; and will try to be brief. I wish
to beg my grandfather's life, of this illustrious stranger.
They tell me, the king will refuse him nothing; and he has
only to ask it of Don Ferdinando, to obtain it.
Many would have thought the matured charms of the
lady superior to the innocent-looking beauty of the girl; but
no one could have come to such an opinion, who saw them
both, at that moment. While Ghita's face was radiant with
a holy hope, and the pious earnestness which urged her on,
a dark expression lowered about the countenance of the
English beauty, that deprived it of one of its greatest
attractions
,
by depriving it of the softness and gentleness of her
sex. Had there not been observers of what passed, it is
probable the girl would have been abruptly repulsed; but
management formed no small part of the character of this
woman; and she controlled her feelings, in order to effect
her purposes.
This admiral is not a Neapolitan, but an Englishman,
she answered; and can have no concern with the justice
of your king. He would scarcely think it decent, to
interfere
with the execution of the laws of Naples.
Signora, it is always decent to interfere to save life;
nay, it is moreit is merciful, in the eyes of God.
What canst thou know of this! A conceit that thou
hast the blood of the Caraccioli, has made thee forget thy
sex and condition, and placed a romantic notion of duty
before thine eyes.
No, signora, it is not so. For eighteen years have I
been taught that the unfortunate admiral was my
grandfather
;
but, as it has been his pleasure to wish not to see
me, never have I felt the desire to intrude on his time.
Before this morning, never has the thought that I have the
blood of the Caraccioli, crossed my mind; unless it was to
mourn for the sin of my grandmother; and even now, it has
come to cause me to mourn for the cruel fate that threatens
the days of her partner in guilt.
Thou art bold, to speak thus of thy parents, girl; and
they, too, of the noble and great!
This was said with a flushed brow, and still more lowering
look; for, haply, there were incidents in the past life of that
lady, which made the simple language of a severe morality,
alike offensive to her ears and her recollections.
It is not I, Eccellenza, but God, that speaketh thus.
The crime, too, is another reason why this great admiral
should use his influence to save a sinner from so hurried an
end. Death is terrible, to all, but to those who trust, with
heart and soul, to the mediation of the Son of God; but
it is doubly so, when it comes suddenly, and unlooked for.
It is true, Don Francesco is aged; but have you not
remarked
,
signora, that it is these very aged who become
hardened to their state, and live on, as if never to die?I
mean those aged, who suffer youth to pass, as if the pleasures
of life are never to have an end.
Thou art too young to set up for a reformer of the
world, girl; and forgettest that this is the ship of one of the
greatest officers of Europe, and that he has many demands
on his time. Thou canst now go; I will repeat what thou
hast said.
I have another request to ask, Eccellenzapermission
to see Don Francesco; that I may, at least, receive his
blessing
.
He is not in this ship. Thou wilt find him on board the
Minerva frigate; no doubt, he will not be denied. Stop
these few lines will aid thy request. Addio, signorina.
And may I carry hope with me, Eccellenza?Think
how sweet life is to those who have passed their days, so
long, in affluence and honour. It would be like a messenger
from heaven, for a grandchild to bring but a ray of hope.
I authorize none. The matter is in the hands of the
Neapolitan authorities; and we English cannot meddle. Go,
now, both of youthe illustrious admiral has business of
importance, that presses.
Ghita turned, and slowly and sorrowfully she left the
cabin. At its very door, she met the English lieutenant,
who was in charge of the unhappy prisoner, coming with a
last request that he might not be suspended like a thief, but
might, at least, die the death of a soldier. It would exceed
the limits set to our tale, were we to dwell on the
conversation
which ensued; but every intelligent reader knows,
that the application failed.
CHAPTER XIV.
Like other tyrants, Death delights to smite
What smitten most proclaims the pride of power,
And arbitrary nod.
Young
.
It
is probable that Nelson never knew, precisely, what
passed between Ghita and the lady mentioned in the last
Chapter. At all events, like every other application that
was made to the English admiral, in connection with this sad
affair, that of Ghita produced no results. Even the mode of
execution was unchanged; an indecent haste accompanying
the whole transaction; as in the equally celebrated trial and
death of the unfortunate Duc d'Enghien. Cuffe remained to
dine with the commander in chief, while Carlo Giuntotardi
and his niece got into their boat, and took their way, through
the crowded roadstead, towards the Neapolitan frigate, that
now formed the prison of the unfortunate Caraccioli.
A request, at the gangway, was all that was necessary, to
procure an admission on board the ship. As soon as the
Signor Giuntotardi reached the quarter-deck, he let his
errand be known, and a messenger was sent below, to
ascertain
if the prisoner would see two visiters; the name of the
uncle being alone given. Francesco Caraccioli, of the
Princes Caraccioli, or, as he was more commonly called, in
English, Prince Caraccioli, was now a man approaching
seventy; and being a member of one of the most illustrious
Vol. I.  18
houses of Lower Italy, he had long been trusted in
employments
of high dignity and command. On his offenceits
apologythe indecent haste of his trial and execution, and
the irregularity of the whole proceedings, it is now
unnecessary
to dwell; they have all passed into history, and are
familiarly known to the world. That very morning had he
been seized, and sent on board the Foudroyant;  in the
cabin of that vessel had a court of his own countrymen
convened
;
and there had he been hastily condemned to death.
The hour of doom was near; and he was already in the
ship where the execution was to take place.
The messenger of Carlo Giuntotardi found this
unfortunate
man with his confessor; by whom he had just been
shrived. He heard the request with cold indifference, but
granted it on the instant, under the impression that it came
from some dependent of his family, or estates, who had a
last favour to ask, or an act of justice to see performed.
Remain here, father, I beseech you, said the prisoner,
perceiving that the priest was about to retire; it is some
contadino, or some tradesman, whose claims have been
overlooked
.
I am happy that he has come; for one would wish
to stand acquitted of injustice, before he dies. Let them
come in, my friend.
A sign was given, with these words, the door of the cabin
was opened, and Ghita, with her uncle, entered. A pause
of quite a minute followed, during which the parties regarded
each other in silence; the prisoner endeavouring, in vain, to
recall the countenances of his guests, and the girl trembling,
equally with grief and apprehension. Then the last
advanced
to the feet of the condemned man, knelt, bowed
her head, and said
Grandfather, your blessing, on the child of your only
son.
Grandfather!Son!and his child! repeated Don
Francesco. I
had
a son, to my shame and contrition be
it now confessed; but he has long been dead. I never knew
that he left a child.
This is his daughter, Signore, replied Carlo
Giuntotardi
;
her mother was my sister. You thought us, then,
too humble to be received into so illustrious a connection;
and we have never wished to bring ourselves before your
eyes, until we thought our presence might be welcome.
And thou comest now, good man, to claim affinity with
a condemned criminal!
Not so, grandfather, answered a meek voice, at his
feet; it is your son's daughter, that craves a blessing from
her dying parent. The boon shall be well requited, in
prayers for your soul.
Holy father! I deserve not this! Here has this tender
plant lived, neglected in the shade, until it raises its timid
head to offer its fragrance in the hour of death! I deserve
not this!
Son, if heaven offered no mercies, until they are merited,
hopeless, truly, would be the lot of man. But we must not
admit illusions, at such a moment. Thou art not a husband,
Don Francesco; hadst thou ever a son?
That, among other sins, have I long since confessed;
and, as it has been deeply repented of, I trust it is forgiven.
I had a sona youth who bore my name, even; though he
never dwelt in my palace; until a hasty and indiscreet
marriage
,
banished him from my presence. I ever intended
to pardon him, and to make provision for his wants; but
death came too soon, to both husband and wife, to grant the
time. This much I
did
know; and it grieved me that it
was so; but, of his child, never, before this instant, have I
heard! 'T is a sweet countenance, father; it seems the very
abode of truth!
Why should we deceive you, grandfather, rejoined
Ghita, stretching her arms upward, as if yearning for an
embrace; most of all, at a time like this? We come not
for honours, or riches, or your great name; we come simply
to crave a blessing, and to let you know that a child of your
own blood will be left on earth, to say aves, in behalf of
your soul!
Holy priest, there can be no deception, here!This
dear child even looks like her wronged grandmother; and
my heart tells me she is mine. I know not whether to
consider
this discovery a good or an evil, at this late hour;
coming, as it does, to a dying man!
Grandfather, your blessing. Bless Ghita, once, that I
may hear the sound of a parent's benediction.
Bless thee!bless thee, daughter! exclaimed the
admiral
,
bending over the weeping girl, to do the act she
solicited, and then, raising her to his arms, and embracing
her tenderly; this
must
be my childI feel that she is no
other.
Eccellenza, said Carlo, she is the daughter of your
son, Don Francesco, and of my sister, Ghita Giuntotardi,
born in lawful wedlock. I would not deceive anyleast of
all, a dying man.
I have no estates to bequeathno honours to transmit
no name to boast of. Better the offspring of the lazzaroni,
than a child of Francesco Caraccioli, at this moment.
Grandfather, we think not of thiscare not for this. I
have come only to ask the blessing you have bestowed, and
to offer the prayers of believers, though we are so lowly.
More than this we ask notwish notseek not. Our
poverty is familiar to us, and we heed it not. Riches would
but distress us, and we care not for them.
I remember, holy father, that one great reason of
displeasure
at my son's marriage, was distrust of the motive of
the family which received him; and yet, here, have these
honest people suffered me to live on unmolested in prosperity,
while they now first claim the affinity, in my disgrace and
ignominy! I have not been accustomed to meet with wishes
and hearts like these!
You did not know us, grandfather, said Ghita, simply,
her face nearly buried in the old man's bosom. We have
long prayed for you, and reverenced you, and thought of
you as a parent, whose face was turned from us in anger;
but we never sought your gold and honours.
Gold and honours! repeated the admiral, gently placing
his grand-daughter in a chair. These are things of the past,
for me. My estates are sequesteredmy name disgraced;
and, an hour hence, I shall have suffered an ignominious
death. No selfish views
can
have brought these good
people, father, to claim affinity with me, at a moment like
this.
It comes from the goodness of God, son. By letting
you feel the consolation of this filial love, and by awakening
in your own bosom the spark of parental affection, he
foreshadows
the fruits of his own mercy and tenderness, to the
erring but penitent. Acknowledge his bounty, in your soul;
it may bring a blessing on your last moment.
Holy priest, I hope I do.But what says this?
Don Francesco took a note from the hand of a servant,
and read its contents eagerly; the world, and its feelings,
having too much hold on his heart, to be plucked out in an
instant. Indeed, so sudden had been his arrest, trial and
conviction, that it is not surprising the priest found in him a
divided spirit, even at an instant like that. His countenance
fell; and he passed a hand before his eyes, as if to conceal a
weakness that was unbecoming.
They have denied my request, father, he said; and
I must die like a felon
The Son of God suffered on the cross, suspended
between
two thieves.
I believe there is far less, in these opinions, than we are
accustomed to thinkyet it is cruel for one who has filled
so high employmentsa princea Caraccioli, to die like a
lazzarone!
Grandfather
Did you speak, child? I wonder not that this indignity
should fill thee with horror.
It is not
that
, grandfather, resumed Ghita, shaking off
her doubts, and looking up with flushed cheeks, and a face
radiant with holy feelingsOh! it is not
that
. If my
life could save thine, gladly would I give it up for such a
purpose; but, do notdo notat this awful moment,
mistake
the shadow for the substance. What matters it how
death is met, when it opens the gates of heaven? Pain, I
am sure,
you
cannot fear;even I, weak and feeble girl
that I am, can despise
that;
what other honour can there
be, in the hour of death, than to be thought worthy of the
mercy and care of God? Caraccioli or lazzaroneprince
or beggarit will matter not, two hours hence; and let me
reverently beg of you, to humble your thoughts to the level
which becomes all sinners.
Thou say'st thou art my grand-child, Ghitathe
daughter
of my son Francesco?
Signore, I am, as all tell meas my heart tells me
and as I believe.
And thou look'st upon these opinions as unworthy
18 *
unsuited
, if thou lik'st that betterto this solemn moment,
and considerest the
manner
of a death, as matter of
indifference
,
even to a soldier?
When placed in comparison with his hopes of heaven
when viewed through his own demerits, and the merits of
his Saviour, grandfather.
And wilt thou, then, just entering on the stage of life,
with the world before thee, and all that its future can offer,
accompany me to the scaffold; let it be known to the
mocking crowd, that thou derivest thy being through the
felon, and art not ashamed to own him for a parent?
I will, grandfatherthis have I come to do, answered
Ghita, steadily. But do not ask me to look upon thy
sufferings! All that can be done to lessen, by sharing
thy disgrace, if disgrace it be, will I most gladly do; though
I dread to see thy aged form in pain!
And this wilt thou do for one thou never beheld'st, until
this hour?one thou canst hardly have been taught to
consider
just to thyself?
If I have never seen thee before this visit, grandfather,
I have loved thee, and prayed for thee, from infancy. My
excellent uncle early taught me this lesson in duty; but he
never taught me to hate thee, or any one. My own father
is taken away; and that which he would have been to thee,
this day, will I endeavour to be for him. The world is
nought to me; and it will console thee to think that one is
near, whose heart weeps for thee, and whose soul is lost in
prayers, for thy eternal pardon.
And this being, father, is made known to me, an hour
before I die! God punishes me sufficiently for the wrong
I've done her, in letting me thus know her worth, when it
is too late to profit by it. No, Ghitablessed child, such a
sacrifice shall not be asked of thee. Take this crossit
was my mother's; worn on her bosom, and has long been
worn on minekeep it as a memorial of thy unhappy
parent
,
and pray for me; but, quit this terrible ship, and do
not grieve thy gentle spirit with a scene that is so unfit for
thy sex and years. Bless thee  bless thee, my child.
Would to heaven I had earlier known theebut even this
glimpse of thy worth, has lightened my heart. Thou find'st
me, here, a poor condemned criminal; unable to provide for
thy future wantsnay, I
can
yet do a little for thee, too.
This bag contains gold. It has been sent to me by a
relative
,
thinking it might be of service, in averting the
punishment
that awaits me. For that purpose, it is now useless;
with thy simple habits, however, it will render thy life easy,
and above care.
Ghita, with streaming eyes, steadily put aside the gold,
though she pressed the cross to her bosom, kissing it fervently,
again and again.
Not thatnot that, grandfather, she said; I want it
notwish it not. This is enough; and this will I keep to
my own last moment. I will quit the ship, too; but not the
place. I see many boats collecting, and mine shall be among
them; my prayers shall go up to God for thee, now thou
art living; and, daily, after thou art dead. There needs no
gold, grandfather, to purchase a daughter's prayers.
Don Francesco regarded the zealous and lovely girl with
intense feeling; then he folded her to his heart, once more,
blessing her audibly, again and again. While thus employed,
the Foudroyant's bell struck once, and then those of all the
surrounding ships, English and Neapolitan, repeated the
stroke. This, Caraccioli, a seaman himself, well knew
denoted that the time was half-past four; five being the hour
named for his execution. He felt it necessary, therefore,
to dismiss his new-found relative, that he might pass a few
more minutes alone with his confessor. The parting was
solemn, but tender; and as Ghita left the cabin, her
condemned
grandfather felt, as he would, had he taken leave,
for ever, of one whom he had long loved, and whose virtues
had been a solace to him from the hour of his birth.
The deck of the Minerva presented a sorrowful scene.
Although the prisoner had been condemned by a court of
Neapolitan officers, the trial was had under the British
ensign; and the feeling of the public was with the prisoner.
There existed no necessity for the hurry in which everything
had been done; for no immediate danger pressed; and an
example would have been more impressive, had there been
less of the appearance of a desire for personal vengeance,
and more of the calm deliberation of justice, in the affair.
Ghita's connexion with the prisoner could not be even
suspected
;
but, as it was known that she had been in the cabin,
and believed that she felt an interest in the condemned, the
officers manifested an interest in her wishes, and too evident
emotions. An immense throng of boats had assembled
around the ship; for, hasty as had been the proceedings, the
tidings that Francesco Caraccioli was to be hanged for
treason, spread like wild-fire; and scarce a craft, of proper
size, was left within the mole, so eager was the desire to
witness that which was to occur. Either in the confusion,
or bribed by money, the man who had brought off Carlo
Giuntotardi and his niece, was no longer to be found; and
the means of quitting the ship seemed, momentarily, to be
lost.
Here is a boat, close to our gangway, said the officer
of the deck, who had kindly interested himself in behalf of
so interesting a girl, with a single man in it; a few grani
would induce him to put you ashore.
The fellow in the boat was of the class of the lazzaroni,
wearing a clean cotton shirt, a Phrygian cap, and cotton
trowsers, that terminated at the knees; leaving his muscular
arms and legs entirely bare; models for the statuary, in their
neatness, vigour and proportions. The feet, alone, formed
an exception to the ordinary attire, for they were cased in a
pair of quaint canvass shoes, that were ornamented a little
like the moccasins of the American Indian. Carlo caught
the eye of this man, who appeared to be eagerly watching
the frigate's gangway, for a fare, and, holding up a small
piece of silver, in a moment the light boat was at the foot
of the accommodation-ladder. Ghita now descended; and,
as soon as her uncle and she were seated, the skiff, for it
was little more, whirled away from the ship's side, though
two or three more, who had also been left by recreant
boatmen
,
for better fares, called out to him to receive them, also.
We had best go alone, even though it cost us a heavier
price, quietly observed Carlo, to his niece, as he noted this
occurrence. Pull us a short distance from the ship, friend;
here, where there are fewer boats; and thou shalt meet
with a fair reward. We have an interest in this solemn
scene, and could wish not to be observed.
I know that well, Signor Carlo, answered the
boatman
;
and will see that you are not molested.
Ghita uttered a faint exclamation, and, looking up, first
saw that the feigned lazzarone was no other than Raoul
Yvard. As her uncle was too unobservant, in general, to
detect his disguise, he made a sign for her to command
herself
,
and continued rowing, as if nothing had occurred.
Be at ease, Ghita, said Carlo; it is not yet the time,
and we have twenty good minutes, for our aves.
Ghita, however, was far from being at ease. She felt all
the risks that the young man now ran, and she felt that it
was on her account, solely, that he incurred them. Even
the solemn feeling of the hour, and the occasion, was
disturbed
by his presence; and she wished he were away, on
more accounts than one. Here he was, nevertheless, and in
the midst of enemies; and it would not have been in nature,
for one of her years and sex, and, most of all, of her feelings,
not to indulge in a sentiment of tender gratitude towards
him, who had, as it were, thrust his head into the very lion's
mouth, to do her a service. Between Raoul and Ghita, there
had been no reserves, on the subject of parentage; and the
former understood why his mistress was here, as well as the
motive that brought her. As for the last, she glanced timidly
around her, fearful that the lugger, too, had been brought
into the throng of ships that crowded the anchorage. For
this, however, Raoul was much too wary, nothing resembling
his little craft being visible.
The reader will have understood that many vessels of war,
English, Russian, Turkish and Neapolitan, were now
anchored
in the bay. As the French still held the Castle of
St. Elmo, or the citadel that crowns the heights, that, in their
turn, crown the town, the shipping did not lay quite as close
to the mole as usual, lest a shot from the enemy above might
do them injury; but they were sufficiently near to permit all
the idle and curious of Naples, who had the hearts and the
means, to pull off and become spectators of the sad scene
that was about to occur. As the hour drew near, boat after
boat arrived, until the Minerva was surrounded with
spectators
,
many of whom belonged even to the higher classes of
society.
The distance between the Neapolitan frigate, and the ship
of the English rear-admiral, was not great; and everything
that occurred on board the former, and which was not
actually
hidden by the sides and bulwarks of the vessel itself,
was easily to be seen from the decks of the latter. Still, the
Foudroyant lay a little without the circle of boats; and in
that direction Raoul had pulled, to avoid the throng, resting
on his oars, when about a third of a cable's-length from the
British admiral's stern. Here it was determined to wait for
the awful signal, and its fatal consequences. The brief
interval was passed, by Ghita, in telling her beads, while
Carlo joined in the prayers, with the devotion of a zealot. It
is scarcely necessary to say, that all this Raoul witnessed
without faith, though it would be doing injustice to his
nature
,
as well as to his love for Ghita, to say he did so
without
sympathy.
A solemn and expecting silence reigned in all the
neighbouring
ships. The afternoon was calm and sultry, the
zephyr ceasing to blow, earlier than common, as if unwilling
to disturb the melancholy scene, even with its murmurs. On
board the Minerva, no sign of lifescarcely of deathwas
seen; though a single whip was visible, rigged to the
fore-yard-arm
,
one end being led in-board, while the other ran
along the yard, passed through a leading-block, in its quarter,
and descended to the deck. There was a platform fitted, on
two of the guns, beneath this expressive, but simple
arrangement
;
but, as it was in-board, it was necessarily concealed
from all but those who were on the Minerva's decks. With
these preparations Raoul was familiar, and his
understanding
eye saw the particular rope that was so soon to
deprive Ghita of her grandfather; though it was lost to her
and her uncle, among the maze of rigging by which it was
surrounded.
There might have been ten minutes passed, in this solemn
stillness, during which the crowd of boats continued to
collect
;
and the crews of the different ships were permitted to
take such positions, as enabled them to become spectators
of a scene that it was hoped might prove admonitory. It is
part of the etiquette of a vessel of war to make her people
keep close; it being deemed one sign of a well-ordered ship,
to let as few men be seen as possible, except on those
occasions
when duty requires them to show themselves. This
rigid rule, however, was momentarily lost sight of, and the
teeming masses that floated around La Minerva, gave up
their thousands, like bees clustering about their hives. It
was in the midst of such signs of expectation, that the call
of the boatswain was heard piping the side, on board the
Foudroyant, and four side-boys lay over on the
accommodation-ladder
,
a mark of honour never paid to one of a rank
less than that of a captain. Raoul's boat was within fifty
yards of that very gangway, and he turned his head in idle
curiosity, to see who might descend into the gig that was
lying at the foot of the long flight of steps. A stranger, with
two epaulettes, came first, showing the way to two civilians,
and a sea-lieutenant; when all descended in a line, and
entered the boat. The next instant, the oars fell, and the
gig whirled round under the Foudroyant's stern, and came
glancing up towards his own skiff. Four or five of the
strong man-of-war jerks, sufficed to send the long, narrow
boat as far as was desired, when the men ceased rowing,
their little craft losing her way within ten feet of the skiff
occupied by our party. Then it was that Raoul, to his
surprise, discovered that the two civilians were no other than
Andrea Barrofaldi, and Vito Viti, who had accompanied
Cuffe and Griffin, their companions in the gig, on a cruise;
of which the express object was to capture himself and his
vessel.
Another man would have been alarmed, at finding himself
in such close vicinity to his enemies; but Raoul Yvard was
amused, rather than rendered uneasy, by the circumstance.
He had faith in his disguise; and he was much too familiar
with incidents of this sort, not to retain his self-command
and composure. Of course, he knew nothing of the persons
of the two Englishmen; but, perfectly aware of the presence
of the Proserpine, he guessed at their identity, and very
correctly imagined the circumstances that brought
companions
,
so ill-assorted, together. He had taken no
precautions
to disguise his face; and the red Phrygian cap which
he wore, in common with thousands on that bay, left every
feature and lineament fully exposed. With Ghita, however,
the case was different. She was far better known to the
two Elbans, as indeed was the person of her uncle, than he
was himself; but both had veiled their faces in prayer.
I do not half like this business, Griffin, observed the
captain, as his gig entirely lost its way; and wish, with all
my heart, we had nothing to do with it. I knew this old
Caraccioli; and a very good sort of man he was; and, as to
treason, it is not easy to say who is, and who is not a traitor,
in times like these, in such a nation as this.Ha!I believe
my soul, this is the same old man, and the same pretty girl,
that came to see Nelson, half-an-hour ago, about this very
execution?
What could
they
have to do with Prince Caraccioli, or
his treason, sir?The old chap looks bookish; but he is not
a priest; and, as to the girl, she is trim-built enough; I fancy
the face is no great matter, however, or she would not take
so much pains to hide it.
Raoul muttered a sacr-r-re, between his teeth, but he
succeeded in suppressing all outward expression of feeling.
Cuffe, on the contrary, saw no other motive for unusual
discretion
,
beyond the presence of his boat's crew, before whom,
however, he was accustomed to less reserve, than with his
people in general.
If she be the same as the one we had in the cabin, he
answered, there is no necessity for a veil; for a prettier,
or a more modest-looking girl, is not often fallen in with.
What she wanted, exactly, is more than I can tell you, as
she spoke Italian, altogether; and `miladi' had the interview
pretty much to herself. But her good looks seem to have
taken with this old bachelor, the justice of the peace, who
eyes her as if he had an inclination to open his mind to the
beauty. Ask him, in Italian, Griffin, what mare's nest he
has run foul of, now.
You seem to have found something to look at, beside the
Minerva, Signor Podest, observed Griffin, in an
under-tone
;
I hope it is not Venus.
Cospetto! grunted Vito Viti, nudging his neighbour,
the vice-governatore, and nodding towards the other boat;
if that be not little Ghita, who came into our island like a
comet, and went out of itto what shall I liken her sudden
and extraordinary disappearance, Signor Andrea?
To that of le Feu-Follet, or ze Ving-y-Ving, put in
Griffin; who, now he had got the two functionaries fairly
afloat, spared none of the jokes that come so easy and natural
to a man-of-war's man.
She
went out, too, in an `
extraordinary
disappearance,' and perhaps the lady and the lugger
went out together.
Vito Viti muttered an answer; for, by this time, he had
discovered that he was a very different personage, on board
the Proserpine, from what the other had appeared to consider
him, while in his native island. He might have expressed
himself aloud, indeed; but, at that instant, a column of
smoke glanced out of the bow part of the Minervaa yellow
flag was shown aloftand then came the report of the
signal-gun
.
It has been said that vessels of war, of four different
nations, were, at that time, lying in the Bay of Naples.
Nelson had come in, but a short time previously, with
seventeen
ships of the line; and he found several more of his
countrymen lying there. This large force had been
assembled
to repel an expected attack on the Island of Minorca;
and it was still kept together in an uncertainty of the future
movements of the enemy. A Russian force had come out
of the Black Sea, to act against the French, bringing with
it a squadron of the Grand Signor; thus presenting to the
world the singular spectacle of the followers of Luther,
devotees
of the Greek church, and disciples of Mahomet, uniting
in defence of our rights, our firesides, and our altars!
To these vessels must be added a small squadron of ships
of the country; making a mixed force of four different
ensigns, that was to witness the melancholy scene we are
about to relate.
The yellow flag, and the signal-gun, brought everything,
in the shape of duty, to a stand-still, in all the fleets. The
hoarse commands ceasedthe boatswains, and their mates,
laid aside their calls, and the echoing midshipmen no longer
found orders to repeat. The seamen gathered to the sides
of their respective vesselsevery part glistened with
expectant
eyesthe booms resembled clusters of bees, suspended
from the boughs of a forestand the knight-heads, taffrails,
gangways, and stretchers of the rigging, were garnished with
those whose bright buttons, glazed hats, epaulettes, and
dark-blue dresses, denoted to belong to the privileged classes
of a ship. Notwithstanding all this curiosity, nothing like
the feeling which is apt to be manifested, at an exhibition of
merited punishment, was visible in a single countenance.
An expression resembling a sombre gloom, appeared to have
settled on all those grim warriors of the deep; English,
Vol. I  19
Russian, Neapolitan or Turk, apparently reserving all his
sympathies for the sufferer, rather than for the majesty of
justice. Still, no murmur aroseno sign of resistance was
madeno look of remonstrance given. The unseen mantle
of authority covered all; and these masses of discontented
men submitted, as we bow to what is believed to be the fiat
of fate. The deep-seated and unresisting habit of discipline,
suppressed complaint; but there was a general conviction
that some act was about to be committed, that, it were better
for humanity and justice, should not be done; or, if done at
all, that it needed more of form, greater deliberation, and a
fairer trial, to be so done as to obtain the commendation of
men. The Turks, alone, showed apathy; though all showed
submission. These subjects of destiny looked on coldly;
though even among them, a low rumour had passed, that a
malign influence prevailed in the fleet; and that a great and
proud spirit had gotten to be mastered by the passion that so
often deprives heroes of their self-command and
independence
.
Ghita ceased her prayers, as the report of the gun broke
rudely on her ears, and, with streaming eyes, she even
dared to look towards the frigate. Raoul, and all the rest,
bent their gaze in the same direction. The sailors, among
them, saw the rope at the fore-yard-arm move, and then
heads rose slowly above the hammock-cloths; when the
prisoner
and his attendant priest were visible even to their feet.
The unfortunate Caraccioli, as has been said, had nearly
numbered his threescore and ten years, in the regular course
of nature; and his bare head now showed the traces of
time. He wore no coat; and his arms were bound behind
his back, at the elbows, leaving just motion enough to the
hands, to aid him in the slighter offices about his own person.
His neck was bare, and the fatal cord was tightened
sufficiently
around it, to prevent accidents, constantly
admonishing
its victim of its revolting office.
A low murmur arose among the people in the boats, as
this spectacle presented itself to their eyes; and many bowed
their faces in prayer. The condemned man caught a ray
of consolation from this expression of sympathy; and he
looked around him, an instant, with something like a return
of those feelings of the world, which it had been his effort
and his desire totally to eradicate, since he had taken leave
of Ghita, and learned that his last request  that of
changing his mode of punishmenthad been denied. That
was a fearful moment, for one like Don Francesco
Caraccioli
,
who had passed a long life in the midst of the scene
that surrounded himillustrious by birth, affluent, honoured
for his services, and accustomed to respect and deference.
Never had the glorious panorama of the bay, appeared more
lovely than it did at that instant, when he was about to quit
it for ever, and this by means of a violent and disgraceful
death. From the purple mountainsthe cerulean void above
himthe blue waters over which he seemed already to be
suspendedand the basking shores, rich in their towns,
villas and vines, his eye turned toward the world of ships,
each alive with its masses of living men. A glance of
melancholy reproach was cast upon the little flag that was
just waving at the mizzen-mast-head of the Foudroyant;
and then it fell on the carpet of faces beneath, that seemed
fairly to change the surface of the smooth sea, into an arena
of human countenances. His look was steady, though his
soul was in a tumult. Ghita was recognized by her
companion
,
and by her dress. He moved towards the edge of
his narrow scaffolding, endeavoured to stretch forth his arms,
and blessed her, again, aloud. The poor girl dropped on
her knees, in the bottom of the boat, bowed her head, and in
that humble attitude did she remain, until all was over; not
daring once to look upward, again.
Son, said the priest, this is a moment when the earth,
and its feelings, must be forgotten.
I know it, father, answered the old man, his voice
trembling with emotion, for his sensations were too powerful,
too sublime, even, for the degrading passion of fearbut
never before did this fair piece of the creation seem so lovely
in my eyes, as now, when I am about to quit it for the last
time.
Look beyond this scene, into the long vista of eternity,
son; there thou wilt behold that, which mocks at all human,
all earthly means, to equal. I fear that our time is but
shorthast thou aught yet to say, in the flesh?
Let it be known, holy priest, that in my dying moment
I prayed for Nelson, and for all who have been active in
bringing me to this end. It is easy for the fortunate, and the
untempted, to condemn; but he is wiser, as he is safer, who
puts more reliance on the goodness of God, than on his own
merits.
A ray of satisfaction gleamed athwart the pale countenance
of the priesta sincerely pious man, or fear of personal
consequences might have kept aloof from such a scene
and he closed his eyes, while he expressed his gratitude to
God, in the secret recesses of his own spirit. Then he
turned to the prince, and spoke cheeringly.
Son, he said, if thou quittest life with a due
dependence
on the Son of God, and in this temper towards thy
fellow-creatures, of all this living throng, thou art he who is
most to be envied! Address thy soul in prayer, once more,
to Him, whom thou feelest can alone serve thee.
Caraccioli, aided by the priest, knelt on the scaffold; for
the rope hung loose enough to permit that act of humiliation,
and the other bent at his side.
I wish to God, Nelson had nothing to do with this!
muttered Cuffe, as he turned away his face, inadvertently
bending his eyes on the Foudroyant, nearly under the stern
of which ship, his gig lay. There, in the stern-walk, stood
the lady, already mentioned in this Chapter, a keen
spectator
of the awful scene. No one, but a maid, was near her,
however, the men of her companionship not being of moods
stern enough to be at her side. Cuffe turned away from
this sight, in still stronger disgust, and just at that moment,
a common cry arose from the boats. Looking round, he
was just in time to see the unfortunate Caraccioli dragged
from his knees, by the neck, until he rose, by a steady,
man-of-war
pull, to the end of the yard; leaving his companion
alone on the scaffold, still lost in prayer. There was a
horrible minute, of the struggles between life and death,
when the body, so late the tenement of an immortal spirit,
hung, like one of the jewel-blocks of the ship, dangling
passively
at the end of the spar, as insensible as the wood which
sustained it.
CHAPTER XV.
Sleep, sleep, thou sad one, on the sea!
The wash of waters lulls thee, now;
His arm no more will pillow thee,
Thy hand upon his brow.
He is not near, to hurt thee, or to save:
The ground is his  the sea must be thy grave.
Dana
.
A long
summer's evening did the body of Francesco
Caraccioli hang suspended at the yard-arm of the Minerva;
a revolting spectacle to his countrymen, and to most of the
strangers who had been the witnesses of his end. Then was
it lowered into a boat, its feet loaded with double-headed
shot, and it was carried out a league, or more, into the bay,
and cast into the sea. The revolting manner in which it
rose to the surface, and confronted its destroyers, a fortnight
later, has passed into history; and, to this day, forms one
of the marvels related by the ignorant and wonder-loving of
that region.
[6]
[6]
Singular as was this occurrence, and painful as it must have
proved to the parties to the execution, it is one of the simplest
consequences
of natural causes. All animal matter swells, in water,
previously
to turning corrupt. A body that has become of twice its
natural size, in this manner, as a matter of course, displaces twice the
usual quantity of water; the
weight
of the mass remaining the same.
Most human frames floating, in their natural state, so long as the
lungs are inflated with air, it follows that one in this condition would
bring up with it, as much weight, in iron, as made the difference
between
its own gravity, and that of the water it displaced. The upright
attitude of Caraccioli, was owing to the shot attached to the feet; of
which, it is also probable, one or two had become loosened.
As for Ghita, she disappeared, no one knew
how; Vito Viti, and his companions, being too much absorbed
with the scene, to note the tender and considerate manner in
which Raoul rowed her off from a spectacle that could but
be replete with horrors, to one so situated. Cuffe, himself,
stood but a few minutes longer; but he directed his boat's
crew to pull alongside of the Proserpine. In half-an-hour
after the execution took place, this frigate was aweigh; and
then she was seen standing out of the bay, before a light air,
19 *
covered with canvass, from her truck to her
hammock-cloths
.
Leaving her, for the moment, we will return to the
party in the skiff.
Neither Carlo Giuntotardi, nor Ghita Caracciolifor so
we must continue to call the girl, albeit the name is much
too illustrious to be borne by one of her humble condition in
lifebut, neither of these two had any other design, in thus
seeking out the unfortunate admiral, than to perform what
each believed to be a duty. As soon as the fate of
Caraccioli
was decided, both were willing to return to their old
position in life; not that they felt ashamed to avow their
connection with the dead; but because they were quite
devoid
of any of that worldly ambition, which renders rank
and fortune necessary to happiness.
When he left the crowd of boats, Raoul pulled towards
the rocks which bound the shores of the bay, near the
gardens
of Portici. This was a point sufficiently removed from
the common anchorage, to be safe from observation; and
yet so near, as to be reached in considerably less than an
hour. As the light boat proceeded, Ghita gradually regained
her composure. She dried her eyes, and looked around her
inquiringly, as if wondering whither their companion was
taking them.
I will not ask you, Raoul, why you are here, at a
moment
like this, and whence you have come, she said; but
I may ask whither you are now carrying us? Our home
is at St. Agata, on the heights above Sorrento, and on the
other side of the bay. We come there, annually, to pass
a month with my mother's sister; who asks this much of
our love.
If I did not know all this, Ghita, I would not, and could
not be here. I have visited the cottage of your aunt, this
day; followed you to Naples; heard of the admiral's trial
and sentence; understood how it would affect your feelings;
traced you on board the English admiral's ship, and was in
waiting, as you found me; having first contrived to send
away the man who took you off. All this has come about
as naturally, as the feeling which has induced me to venture,
again, into the lion's mouth.
The pitcher that goes often to the well, Raoul, gets
broken at last, said Ghita, a little reproachfully, though it
surpassed her power to prevent the tones of tenderness from
mingling with her words.
You know all, Ghita. After months of perseverance,
and a love such as man seldom felt before, you deliberately
and coldly refused to be my wife;nay, you have deserted
Monte Argentaro, purposely to get rid of my importunities;
for there I could go with the lugger, at any moment; and
have come here, upon this bay, crowded with the English,
and other enemies of France, fancying that I would not dare
to venture hither.Well, you see with what success; for
neither Nelson, nor his two-deckers, can keep Raoul Yvard
from the woman he loves, let him be as victorious and
skilful
as he may!
The sailor had ceased rowing, to give vent to his feelings
in this speech, neither of the two colloquists regarding the
presence of Carlo Giuntotardi, any more than if he had been
a part of themselves. This indifference to the fact that a
third person was a listener, proceeded from habit, the worthy
scholar and religionist being usually too abstracted to attend
to concerns as light as love, and the youthful affections.
Ghita was not surprised, either at the reproaches of her
suitor, or at his perseverance; and her conscience told her
he uttered but the truth, in attributing to her the motives he
had, in urging her uncle to make their recent change of
residence
;
for, while a sense of duty had induced her to quit
the towers, her art was not sufficient to suggest the
expediency
of going to any other abode than that which she was
accustomed to inhabit periodically, and about which Raoul
knew, from her own innocent narrations, nearly as much as
she knew herself.
I can say no more than I have said, already, the
thoughtful girl answered, after Raoul had begun again to
row. It is better, on every account, that we should part.
I cannot change my country; nor can you desert that
glorious republic, of which you feel so proud. I am an
Italian, and you are French; while, more than all, I worship
my God, while you believe in the new opinions of your own
nation. Here are causes enough for separation, surely,
however favourably and kindly we may happen to think
of each other, in general.
Tell me not, any more, of the heart of an Italian girl,
and of her readiness to fly to the world's end, with the man
of her choice! exclaimed Raoul, bitterly. I can find a
thousand girls, in Languedoc, who would make the circuit
of the earth, yearly, rather than be separated, a day, from
the seamen they have chosen for their husbands.
Then look among the girls of Languedoc, for a wife,
answered Ghita, with a smile so melancholy that it
contradicted
her words. Better to take one of your own nation
and opinion, Raoul, than risk your happiness with a stranger;
who might not answer all your hopes, when you came to
know her better.
We will not talk further of this, now, dearest Ghita;
my first care must be to carry you back to the cottage of
your auntunless, indeed, you will at once embark in le
Feu-Follet, and return to the towers?
Le Feu-Follet!  she is hardly here, in the midst of a
fleet of her enemies!  Remember, Raoul, that your men
will begin to complain, if you place them too often in such
risks, to gratify your own wishes.
Peste!  I keep them in good-humour, by rich prizes.
They have been successful; and that which makes yonder
Nelson popular, and a great man, makes Raoul Yvard
popular
,
and a great man, also, in his little way. My crew is
like its captainit loves adventures, and it loves success.
I do not see the luggeramong a hundred ships, there
is no sign of yours?
The Bay of Napoli is large, Ghita, returned Raoul,
laughing; and le Feu-Follet takes but little room. See
yonder vaisseaux-de-ligne appear trifling among these noble
mountains, and on this wide gulf; you cannot expect my
little lugger to make much show. We are small, Ghita
mia, if not insignificant!
Still, where there are so many vigilant eyes, there is
always danger, Raoul! Besides, a lugger is an unusual rig,
as you have owned to me, yourself.
Not here, among all these eastern craft. I have always
found, if I wished to be unnoticed, it was best to get into a
crowd; whereas, he who lives in a village, lives in open
day-light. But we will talk of these things, when alone,
Ghitayonder fisherman is getting ready to receive us.
By this time the skiff was near the shore, where a little
yawl was anchored, containing a solitary fisherman. This
man was examining them, as they approached; and,
recognising
Raoul, he was gathering in his lines, and preparing
to raise his grapnel. In a few minutes the two craft lay
side by side; and then, though not without difficulty, owing
to a very elaborate disguise, Ghita recognised Ithuel Bolt.
A very few words sufficed to let the American into all that
it was necessary he should know, when the whole party
made its arrangements to depart. The skiff which Raoul,
having found it lying on the beach, had made free with,
without leave, he anchored, in the full expectation that its
right owner might find it, some day or other; while its cargo
was transferred to the yawl, which was one of the lugger's
own attendants. The latter was a light, swift-pulling little
boat, admirably constructed, and fit to live in a sea-way;
requiring, moreover, but two good oars, one of which Raoul
undertook to pull, himself, while Ithuel managed the other.
In five minutes after the junction was made, the party was
moving again from the land, in a straight line across the bay,
steering in the direction of its southern cape, and proceeding
with the steady, swift movement of men accustomed to the
toil.
There are few portions of the sea in which a single ship
or boat is an object of so little notice, as the Bay of Naples.
This is true of all times and seasons; the magnificent scale
on which nature has created her panorama, rendering
ordinary
objects of comparative insignificance; while the
constant
movement, the fruit of a million of souls thronging
around its teeming shores, covers it, in all directions, with
boats, almost as the streets of a town are crowded with
pedestrians. The present occasion, too, was one likely to
set everything in motion; and Raoul judged rightly, when
he thought himself less likely to be observed in such a scene,
than on a smaller and less-frequented water. As a matter
of course, while near the mole, or the common anchorage,
it was necessary to pass amid a floating throng; but, once
beyond the limits of this crowd, the size of the bay rendered
it quite easy to avoid unpleasant collisions, without any
apparent
effort; while the passage of a boat, in any direction,
was an occurrence too common to awaken distrust. One
would think no more of questioning a craft that was
encountered
,
even in the centre of that spacious bay, than he would
think of inquiring about the stranger, met in a market-place.
All this both Raoul and Ithuel knew and felt; and, once in
motion, in their yawl, they experienced a sense of security,
that, for the four or five previous hours, had not always
existed.
By this time, the sun was low, though it was possible, as
Raoul perceived, to detect the speck that was still swinging
at the Minerva's fore-yard-arm; a circumstance to which
the young man, with considerate feeling, refrained from
adverting. The Proserpine had been some time in motion,
standing out of the fleet under a cloud of canvass, but with
an air so light as to permit the yawl to gain on her, though
the heads of both were turned in the same direction. In this
manner, mile after mile was passed, until darkness came.
Then the moon arose, rendering the bay less distinct, it is
true, but scarcely more mysterious, or more lovely, than in
the hours of stronger light. The gulf, indeed, forms an
exception
,
in this particular, to the general rule, by the extent
of its shores, the elevation of its mountains, the beauty of its
waterwhich has the deep tint of the ocean off soundings
and the softness of the atmosphere; lending to it, by day,
all the mellowed and dreamy charms that other scenes
borrow
from the illusions of night, and the milder brilliance of
the secondary planets. Raoul did not exert himself, at the
oar; and, as he sat aft, his companion was obliged to take
the stroke from his movement. It was so pleasant to have
Ghita with him, on his own element, that he never hurried
himself, while in the enjoyment of her society. The
conversation
,
it will readily be imagined, was not lively; but
the saddened melancholy of Ghita's voice, as she
occasionally
hazarded a remark of her own, or answered one of his
questions, sounded sweeter, in his ears, than the music of
the ships' bands, that was now wafted to them across the
water.
As the evening advanced, the land-breeze increased, and
the Proserpine gradually gained upon the boat. When the
latter was about two-thirds of the distance across the bay,
the frigate caught the stronger current, that came down
athwart the campagna, between Vesuvius and the mountains
behind Castel  Mare, when she drove ahead fast. Her
sails, as seamen express it, were all asleep; or swelled
outward
,
without collapsing; and her rate of sailing was between
five and six miles in the hour. This brought them up with
the boat, hand-over-hand, as it is called; and Ghita, at Raoul's
request, put the helm aside, in order that they might get
out of the way of the huge body that was approaching. It
would seem that there was some design, on the part of the
ship, in coming so near, for she made a sheer towards the
yawl, in a way to frighten the timid helmswoman, and to
induce her to relinquish her hold of her tiller.
Fear nothing, called out Griffin, in Italianwe
intend
to offer you a tow. Stand by, and catch the line
Heave
A small rope was thrown; and, falling directly across
Ithuel's head, that person could do no less than seize it.
With all his detestation of the English in general, and of this
vessel in particular, the man-of-all-work had the
labour-saving
propensity of his countrymen; and it struck him as
a good thing, to make a king's ship aid an enemy's
privateer
,
by accepting the offer. As he used the line with proper
dexterity, the yawl was soon towing on the quarter of the
frigate; Raoul taking the helm, and giving the boat the
sheer necessary to prevent her dragging in, alongside. This
was a change so sudden, and so totally unexpected, that
Ghita murmured her disapprobation, lest it should lead to a
discovery of the true character of her companions.
Fear nothing, dearest, answered Raoul, they cannot
suspect us; and we may learn something useful by being
here. At all events, le Feu-Follet is safe from their designs,
just at this moment.
Are you boatmen of Capri? called out Griffin, who
stood on the taffrail of the ship, with Cuffe and the two
Italians near by; the first dictating the questions his
lieutenant
put.
S'nore, si; answered Raoul, adopting the patois of the
country, as well as he could, and disguising his deep mellow
voice, by speaking on a high shrill key. Boatmen of
Capri, that have been to Napoli with wine, and have been
kept out later than we intended by the spectacle at the
yard-arm
of the Minerva. Cospetto! them signori make no more
of a prince, than we do of a quail, in the season, on our
little island. Pardon me, dearest Ghita; but we
must
throw
dust into their eyes.
Has any strange sail been seen about your island,
within the last twenty-four hours?
The bay is full of strange sail, S'nore; even the Turks
coming to see us, since the last trouble with the French.
Aybut the Turks are now your allies, like us
English
.Have
you seen any other strangers?
They tell me, there are ships from the far north, too,
S'nore, off the town. Russians, I believe, they call them.
They, too, are allies; but, I mean, enemies. Has there
not been a lugger seen off your island, within the last day
or twoa lugger of the French?
SisiI know what you mean, now, S'nore; there
has
been a vessel like that you mention, off the island; for I
saw her with my own eyessisi. It was about the
twenty-third hour, last eveninga lugger, and we all said
she must be French, by her wicked looks.
Raoul! said Ghita, as if reproaching him for an
indiscretion
.
This is the true way to befog them, answered the young
man; they have certainly heard of us; and by seeming
to tell a little truth, frankly, it will give me an opportunity
of telling more untruth.
Ah, Raoul, it is a sad life, that renders untruths
necessary
!
It is the art of war, dearest; without it, we should soon
be outwitted, by these knaves of English.Sisi, S'nori;
we all said just that, concerning her looks and rig.
Will you sheer your boat alongside, friend! inquired
Griffin, and come on board of us? We have a ducat,
here, that wants an owner; I fancy it will fit your pocket,
as well as another's. We will haul you ahead, abreast of
the gangway.
Oh! Raoul, do not think of this rash act, whispered
Ghita; the vice-governatore, or the podest, will recollect
you; and then all will be lost!
Fear nothing, Ghitaa good cause, and a keen wit,
will carry me through; while the least hesitation might,
indeed, ruin us. These English first ask, and then take,
without asking, if you tell them no. Corpo di Bacco! who
ever heard, either, of a lazzarone's refusing a ducat!
Raoul then whispered a few words to Ithuel, when, the
boat being, by this time, far enough ahead, he gave it a
sheer alongside of the ship, seized a man-rope, and went up
the cleets as actively as a cat. It is certain, not a soul on
board that fine frigate had the least suspicion of the true
character
of the individual who now confidently trod her
quarter-deck
.
The young man, himself, loved the excitement of
such an adventure, and he felt the greater confidence in his
impunity, from the circumstance that there was no other
light than that of the moon. The sails, too, cast their
shadows
upon deck; and then, neither of the two Italians was
a wizard, at detecting impostors, as he knew by experience.
The watch was set for the night, and Winchester, who
had returned to duty, held the trumpet, while Griffin had no
other immediate office, but to interpret. Two or three
midshipmen
were lounging about the quarter-deck; here and
there a seaman was on the look-out, at the halyards, or on
a cat-head; some twenty or thirty old sea-dogs were pacing
the gangways or the forecastle, with their arms crossed, and
hands stuck in their jackets; and a quick-eyed, active
quarter-master stood near the man at the wheel, conning
the ship. The remainder of the watch had stowed
themselves
between the guns, or among the booms, in readiness
to act, but, in truth, dozing. Cuffe, Griffin, and the two
Italians, descended from the taffrail, and awaited the
approach
of the supposed lazzarone, or boatman of Capri, as he
was now believed to be, near the stern of the vessel. By an
arrangement among themselves, Vito Viti became the
spokesman
;
Griffin translating to the captain, all that passed, in
an under-tone, as soon as it was uttered.
Come hither, friend, commenced the podest, in a
patronizing, but somewhat lofty manner; this generous and
noble English captain, Sir Kooffe, desires me to present you
with a ducat, by way of showing that he asks no more of
you than he is willing to pay for. A ducat
[7]
[7]
The silver ducat of Naples is worth 80 grani, or rather less than
80 cents; the golden ducat, or sequin of Italy, Holland, Turkey, &c.
is worth a trifle more than two American dollars. Raoul was offered
the former.
is a great deal
Vol. I.  20
of money, as you know; and good pay merits good
services
.
S'nore, si; your eccellenza says the truth; a good
ducat, certainly, deserves good services.
Bene. Now, tell these signori all you know about that
said lugger; where you saw her; when you saw her; and
what she was about. Keep your mind clear, and tell us
one thing at a time.
S'nore, si. I will keep my mind clear, and tell you no
more than one thing at a time. I believe, eccellenza, I am
to begin with
where
I saw her; then I'm to tell you
when
I saw her; after which, you wish to know what she was
about. I believe, this is the way you put it, S'nore?
Excellently well; answer in that order, and you will
make yourself understood. But, first, tell me;do all the
natives of Capri speak the same sort of Italian as you do
yourself, friend?
S'nore, sithough my mother having been a French
woman, they tell me that I have caught a little from her.
We all get something from our mothers, eccellenza; and its
a pity we could not keep more of it.
True, friend; but now for the lugger. Remember that
honourable signori will hear what you say; therefore, for
your own credit, speak to the point; and speak nothing but
truth, for the love of God.
Then, S'nore, first, as to
where
I saw herdoes your
eccellenza mean, where I was at the time, or where the
lugger was?
Where the lugger was, fellow. Dost think Sir Kooffe
cares where thou spent thy day!
Well, then, eccellenza, the lugger was near the Island
of Capri, on the side next the Mediterranean, which, you
know, S'nore, is on the side opposite to the bay, and near,
as might be, abreast of the house of Giacomo Albertidoes
your eccellenza know anything of the house I mean?
Not I; but tell your story, as if I knew all about it. It
is these particulars which give value to a tale. How far
from the nearest land?Mention that fact, by all means, if
you happen to remember.
Well, eccellenza, could the distance be measured, now
I think it would prove to be about as farnot quite, S'nore
but, I say,
about
about as far as from the said Giacomo's
largest fig-tree, to the vines of Giovanni, his wife's cousin.
SiI think, just about that distance.
And how far may that be, friend. Be precise, as much
may depend on your answers.
S'nore, that may be a trifle farther than it is from the
church to the top of the stairs that lead to Ana Capri.
Cospetto!Thou wilt earn thy ducat speedily, at this
rate! Tell us, at once, in miles; was the lugger one, two,
six, or twenty miles from your island, at the time thou
speak'st of?
Eccellenza, you bid me speak of the
time
, in the second
place; after I had told you of the
where
, in the first place.
I wish to do whatever will give you pleasure, S'nore.
Neighbour Vito Viti, put in the vice-governatore, it
may be well to remember that this matter is not to be
recorded
,
as you would put on file the confessions of a thief;
it may be better to let the honest boatman tell his story in his
own way.
Ay, now the veechy has set to work, I hope we shall
get the worth of our ducat, observed Cuffe, in English.
S'nori, rejoined Raoul, it shall be just as your
eccellenzi say. The lugger you speak of was off the island,
last evening, steering towards Ischia; which place she must
have reached, in the course of the night, as there was a good
land-wind, from the twenty-third to the fifth hour.
This agrees with our account, as to the time and place,
said Griffin; but not at all, as to the direction the corsair
was steering. We hear, she was rather rounding the
southern cape, for the Gulf of Salerno.
Raoul started, and gave thanks, mentally, that he had
come on board, as this statement showed that his enemies
had received only too accurate information of his recent
movements. He had hopes, however, of being able, yet, to
change their intentions, and to put them on a wrong scent.
S'nori, he said, I should like to know who it is that
mistakes south-east for north-west. None of our pilots or
boatmen, I should think, could ever make so great a blunder.
S'nore, you are an officer, and understand such things; and
I will just ask you, if Ischia does not lie north-west of
Capri?
Of that fact, there can be no manner of doubt, returned
Griffin; it is equally true, that the Gulf of Salerno lies
south-east of both
There, now! interrupted Raoul, with a well-acted
assumption of vulgar triumph; I knew, your eccellenza,
when you came to look into it, would see the folly of saying
that a vessel, which was standing from Capri towards Ischia,
was going on any other course than north-west!
But this is not the question, amico. We all understand
the bearings of these islands, which are the bearings of the
whole coast, down here-away; but the question is, which
way the lugger was steering?
I thought I had said, eccellenza, that she was heading
across towards Ischia, answered Raoul, with an air of
obtuse innocence.
If you do, you give an account exactly different from
that which has been sent to the admiral, by the good bishop
of your own island. May I never eat another of his own
quails, if I think
he
would deceive us; and it is not easy to
suppose, a man like him, does not know north from south.
Raoul inwardly muttered a malediction on all priests; a
class of men, which, rightly enough, he believed to be united
in their hostility to France. But, it would not do to express
this, in his assumed character; and he affected to listen, as
one of his class ought to give ear, to a fact that came from
his spiritual father.
North from south, eccellenza!Monsignore knows a
great deal more than that, if the truth were said; though, I
suppose, these noble signori are acquainted with the right
reverend father's great infirmity?
Not wenone of us, I fancy, ever had the honour to be
in his company. Surely, fellow, your bishop is a man of
truth?
Truth!Yes, eccellenza, so true is he, that if he were
to tell me that the thing I saw myself, had not, and could
not happen, I should rather believe Monsignore, than believe
my own eyes. Still, signori, eyes are
something;
and as
the right reverend father has
none
, or, what are as bad as
none, for any use they can be in looking at a vessel
half-a-mile
off, he may not always see what he thinks he sees.
When Monsignore tells us that so and so is Gospel, we all
believe it; for we know the time has been when he
could
read;
but we never think of going to his door to ask which way a
ship is steering, having the use of our own senses.
Can this fellow tell us the truth, Griffin? asked Cuffe,
a good deal mystified by Raoul's artifice, and his assumed
simplicity. If so, we shall be going exactly on the wrong
scent, by hauling round Campanella, and running into the
Gulf of Salerno. The French hold Gaeta, yet, and it is
quite likely that Master Yvard may wish to keep a friendly
port open under his lee!
You forget, Captain Cuffe, that his lordship has sent a
light cruiser, already, up that way; and le Feu-Follet would
hardly dare to show herself near one of our regular
fellows
Umph!I don't know that, Mr. Griffin;I don't
exactly
know that. The Proserpine is a `regular fellow,' after
a fashion, at least; and the Few-Folly has dared to show
herself to
her
. Jack-o'-Lantern!Dn-me, Griffin, but
I think she is well named, now. I'd rather chase a
jack-o'-lantern
,
in the Island of Sicily, than be hunting after such a
chap;first, he's here; then, he's there; and, presently,
he's nowhere. As for the sloop, she's gone south, at my
suggestion, to look into the bays along the Calabrian coast.
I told Nelson I wanted another ship; for, just so certain as
this RuleRaw-owlwhat the dI do you call the
pirate, Griffin?
Raoul, Captain Cuffe; Raoul Yvard is his name. 'T is
thoroughly French.Raoul, means Rodolph.
Well, I told Nelson, if this lad should get to dodging
round one of the islands, we might as well set about playing
`puss in the corner,' by the week, as to think of driving him
off the land, for a fair chase. He works his boat like a
stage-coach, turning in to an inn-yard!
I wonder my lord did not think of this, and give us a
sloop or two, to help us.
Catch Nel. at that!He might send one Englishman to
look after two Frenchmen; but he'd never dream of sending
two Englishmen to look after one Frenchman.
But this is not a fighting matter, sir; only a chase
and one Frenchman will run faster than two Englishmen,
any day of the week.
20 *
Sa-c-r-r-r-e, muttered Raoul, in a tone that he
endeavoured
to suppress, and which was inaudible, to all ears,
but those of Andrea Barrofaldi; the vice-governatore
happening
to stand nearer his person, just at that moment, than
any other of the party.
Very true, answered Cuffe; but so it is. We are
sent alone; and if this Few-Folly get in between Ischia and
Procida, it will be easier to unearth a fox, than to drive her
out, single-handed. As for any more boat-service against
her, I suppose, you've all had enough of
that?
Why, sir, I rather think the people would be shy,
answered Griffin, with a little hesitation of manner, and yet
with the directness and simplicity of a truly brave man.
We must let them get over the last brush, before they are
depended on much, for any new set-to, of that sort.
Bon!
muttered Raoul, quite unconscious he was
overheard
.
Nevertheless, we must catch this fellow, if we wear out
our shoes, in the chase.
All this time Andrea Barrofaldi and Vito Viti were
profoundly
ignorant of what was passing between the two
officers
,
though Raoul listened eagerly, and so well understood
every syllable they uttered. Until this moment, the
vice-governatore
had been rather indifferent and inattentive, as to
what occurred; but the two exclamations of Raoul, awakened
a vague distrust in his mind, which, while it had no direct
object
,
was certainly pregnant with serious consequences to the
Frenchman himself. Deep mortification at the manner in
which they had been duped by this celebrated privateersman,
with a desire to absent themselves from the island, until the
edge was a little taken off the ridicule they both felt they
merited, blended with certain longings to redeem their
characters
,
by assisting in capturing the corsair, were the reasons
why these two worthies, the deputy-governor and the podest,
were now on board the Proserpine. Cuffe had offered them
cots in his cabin, and seats at his table, in a moment of
confidence
;
and the offer was gladly accepted. Andrea had
not been on board the ship a day, however, before he became
thoroughly convinced of his utter uselessness; a
circumstance
that added materially to the awkwardness of his
situation. Like all well-meaning and simple-minded men,
he had a strong wish to be doing; and day and night he
ruminated on the means, by himself, or discussed them in
private dialogues with his friend, the podest. Vito Viti
frankly admonished him to put his faith in heaven;
affirming
that something worth while, would yet turn up, in the
cruise, to render the enterprise memorable; it being a habit,
with the magistrate, to say an ave or two, on all trying
occasions, and then trust to God.
You never knew a miracle, vice-governatore, said Vito
Viti, one day, when they were discussing the matter by
themselves; you never knew a miracle come to pass, that
another was not close on its heels; the first being a mere
preparation for the last, and the last always proving to be
the most remarkable. Now, when Anina Gotti fell off the
cliffs, it was a miracle she didn't break her neck; but, when
she rolled over into the sea, it was a much greater she wasn't
drowned!
It is better to leave these things to the church, neighbour
Vito, was the vice-governatore's answer; nor do I see
that there has been any miracle in the affair, to start with.
How!Do you not call it a miracle, Signor Andrea,
that two such men as you and I, should be deceived, as we
were, beyond all doubt, by this knave of a French corsair?
I look upon it as so great a miracle, myself, that it ought
to follow, instead of going before its companion.
To this Andrea made an answer suitable to his greater
information, and the discourse took its usual direction,
towards
the means of doing something to relieve the two
functionaries
from the stigma, that they mutually felt now rested
on their sagacity; and that, too, as this sagacity might be
considered conjointly or individually.
It was probably owing to this fever of the mind, that the
vice-governatore, a man usually so simple and confiding,
was now so suspicious and keen-sighted. The presence of
Carlo Giuntotardi and Ghita had, at first, struck him as a
little out of the common way; and, though he could not
distinguish their faces by the light of the moon, and at the
distance at which they were placed in the yawl, he fancied,
from the first, that his old acquaintances were in the boat
the ship was towing. Now Andrea Barrofaldi, certainly,
had never, before that day, connected Ghita, or her uncle,
in any manner with Raoul Yvard; but, it was beyond
dispute
,
that the mysterious manner in which they disappeared
from the island, had excited some remarks; and, in his
present state of mind, it was not an extraordinary
circumstance
that he had some distant and vague glimmerings of
the truth. But for Raoul's indiscreet exclamations, however,
nothing probably would have come of these indistinct fancies;
and we are to refer all that followed to those unguarded
out-breakings
of the Frenchman's humour, rather than to any
very clear process of ratiocination on the part of the
vice-governatore
.
Just as Cuffe made the declaration last recorded, Andrea
stepped up to the spot where he and Griffin were conversing
apart, and whispered a few words in the ear of the latter.
The dl! exclaimed the lieutenant, in English.
If what the vice-governatore tells me, be true, Captain
Cuffe, the work is half done to our hands!
Ay, the veechy is a good fellow, at the bottom, Griffin;
though he'll never burn the bay of Naples. What has he
to say, now?
Griffin led his captain a little aside, and conferred a
moment
with him, alone. Orders were then passed to the
officer of the deck, when Cuffe and his companion went
below, like men in a hurry.
END OF THE FIRST VOLUME.His Majesty's Ship, Proserpine, off the mouth of the Golo,
Island of Corsica,
July 23, 1799.
My LordI have the satisfaction of reporting, for the
information of my Lords Commissioners of the Admiralty,
the destruction of the Republican privateer, the le Few-Folly,
commanded by the notorious Raoul Yvard, on the night of
the 22d inst. The circumstances attending this important
success, are as follows. Understanding that the celebrated
picaroon had been on the Neapolitan and Roman coasts,
doing much mischief, I took His Majesty's ship close in,
following up the peninsula, with the land in sight, until we
got through the Canal of Elba, early on the morning of the
21st. On opening Porto Ferrajo bay, we saw a lugger
lying at anchor off the town, with English colours flying.
As this was a friendly port, we could not suppose the craft
to be the le Few-Folly; but, determined to make sure, we
beat in, signalling the stranger, until he took advantage of
our stretching well over to the eastward, to slip round the
rocks, and get off to-windward. We followed, for a short
distance, and then ran over under the lee of Capraya, where
we remained until the morning of the 22d, when we again
went off the town. We found the lugger in the offing; and
being now well satisfied of her character, and it falling calm,
I sent the boats after her, under Messrs. Winchester and
Griffin, the first and second of this ship. After a sharp
skirmish, in which we sustained some loss, though that of
the Republicans was evidently much greater, Monsieur
Yvard succeeded in effecting his escape, in consequence of a
breeze's suddenly springing up. Sail was now made on the
ship, and we chased the lugger into the mouth of the Golo.
Having fortunately captured a felucca, with a quantity of
tar, and other combustible materials on board, as we drew
in with the land, I determined to make a fire-ship of her, and
to destroy the enemy by that mode; he having anchored
within the shoals, beyond the reach of shot. Mr.
Winchester
,
the first, having been wounded in the boat-affair, I
entrusted the execution of this duty to Mr. Griffin, who
handsomely volunteered, and by whom it was effectually
discharged, about ten last evening, in the coolest and most
officer-like manner. I enclose this gentleman's report of
the affair, and beg leave to recommend him to the favour of
my Lords Commissioners. With Mr. Winchester's good
conduct, under a sharp fire, in the morning, the service has
also every reason to be satisfied. I hope this valuable officer
will soon be able to return to duty.
Permit me to congratulate you, my lord, on the complete
destruction of this most pernicious cruiser of the enemy. So
effectual has it been, that not a spar, or a fragment of wreck,
remains. We have reason to think every soul on board
perished; and though this fearful loss of human life is to be
deeply deplored, it has been made in the service of good
government and religion. The lugger was filled with loose
women; our people hearing them singing their philosophical
and irreligious songs, as they approached with the fire-vessel.
I shall search the coast for any rafts that may be drifting
about, and then proceed to Leghorn for fresh provisions.
I have the honour to be, my lord,
Your lordship's most obedient servant,
Richard Cuffe
.To Rear Admiral the Right Hon. Lord Nelson,
Duke of Bronte, &c., &c., &c.
Cuffe read this report over twice; then he sent for Griffin,
to whom he read it aloud, glancing his eye meaningly at his
subordinate, when he came to the part where he spoke of
the young man's good conduct.
So much for that dd Jack-o'-Lantern, Griffin! I
fancy it will lead no one else on a wild-goose chase.
I trust not, sir. Will you allow me to suggest a slight
alteration in the spelling of the lugger's name, Captain Cuffe;
the clerk can make it, when he writes out the letter fairly.
AyI dare say, it is different from what
we
would have
it; French spelling being no great matter, in general. Put
it as you please; though Nelson has as great a contempt
for their boasted philosophy and learning, as I have myself.
I fancy you will find all the English spelt right. How do
you
write their confounded gibberish?
Feu-Follet, sir, pronouncing the last part of it fol-
lay;
not fol-
ly
. I was thinking of asking leave, Captain Cuffe,
to take one of the cutters, and pull up to the lugger's
anchorage
,
and see if anything can be found of her wreck. The
ship will hardly get under-way until the westerly wind
comes.
No, probably not. I will order my gig manned, and
we'll go together. Poor Winchester must keep house
awhile; so there is no use in asking him. I saw no
necessity
for putting Nelson into a passion, by saying anything
about the exact amount of our loss, in that boat scrape,
Griffin.
I agree with you, sir, that it is best as it is.`Some loss'
covers every thingit means, `more or less.'
That was just my notion.I dare say, there may have
been twenty women in the lugger?
I can't answer for the number, sir; but I heard female
singing, as we got near, in the fire-ship; and think it likely
there may have been that number. The lugger was
full-manned
;
for they were like bees swarming on her forecastle,
when we were dropping foul. I saw Raoul Yvard, by the
light of the fire, as plainly as I now see you; and might
have picked him off with a musket; but that would hardly
have been honourable.
To this Cuffe assented, and then he led the way on deck,
having previously ordered the boats manned. The two
officers proceeded to the spot where they supposed the
Feu-Follet
had been anchored, and rowed round, for near an
hour, endeavouring to find some traces of her wreck on the
bottom. Griffin suggested that, when the magazine was
drowned, in the hurry and confusion of the moment, the cock
may have been left opena circumstance that might very
well have carried down the bottom of so small a vessel, in
two or three hours; more especially after her hull had
burnt to the water's edge. The next thing was to find this
bottom, by no means a hopeless task, as the waters of the
Mediterranean are usually so clear, that the eye can
penetrate
several fathoms, even off the mouth of the Golo; a
stream that brought more or less dbris from the mountains.
It is scarcely necessary to say, that the search was not
rewarded with success, the Feu-Follet being, just at that
time, snug at anchor at Bastia, where her people had already
taken out her wounded mainmast, with a view to step a new
one in its place. At that very moment, Carlo Giuntotardi
his niece, and Raoul Yvard, were walking up the principal
street of the town, the place standing on a hill, like Porto
Ferrajo, perfectly at their ease, as regards fire-ships,
English
frigates, and the dangers of the seas. But all this was
a profound mystery to Cuffe and his companions, who had
long been in the habit of putting the most favourable
constructions
on the results of their professional undertakings,
and, certainly, not altogether without reason; and who
nothing doubted that le Feu-Follet had, to use their own
language, laid her bones somewhere along-shore, here.
After two or three hours passed in a fruitless search, Cuffe
determined to return to his ship. He was a keen sportsman,
and had brought a fowling-piece with him, in his gig, with a
half-formed design of landing, and whiling away the time,
until the westerly wind came, among some marshes that he
saw near the shore; but had been persuaded, by Griffin, not
to venture.
There must be woodcock in that wet ground, Griffin,
he said, as he reluctantly yielded a little in his intention;
and Winchester would fancy a bird, exceedingly, in a day
or two. I never was hit, in my life, that I did not feel a
desire for game, after the fever was gone. Snipe, too, must
live on the banks of that stream. Snipe are coming in
season, now, Griffin?
It's more likely, sir, that some of the privateersmen
have got ashore on planks, and empty casks, and are
prowling
about in the weeds, watching our boats. Three or four
of them would be too much for you, Captain Cuffe, as the
scoundrels all carry knives as long as ships' cutlasses.
I suppose your notion may be true; and I shall have to
give it up. Pull back to the frigate, Davy, and we'll be off
after some more of these French ragamuffins.
This settled the matter. In half-an-hour, the boats were
swinging at the Proserpine's quarters; and three hours
later, the ship was under her canvass, standing slowly off
the land. That day, however, the zephyr was exceedingly
light, and the sun set, just as the ship got the small island
of Pianosa abeam; when the air came from the northward,
and the ship's head was laid in to the eastward; the course
lying between the land just mentioned, and that of Elba.
All night the Proserpine was slowly fanning her way along
the south side of the latter island, when, getting the southerly
air again, in the morning, she reappeared in the Canal of
Piombino, as the day advanced, precisely as she had done
before, when first introduced to the acquaintance of the
reader. Cuffe had given orders to be called, as usual, when
the light was about to return; it being a practice with him,
in that active and pregnant war, to be on deck at such
moments
,
in order to ascertain, with his own eyes, what the
fortunes of the night had brought within his reach.
Well, Mr. Griffin, he said, as soon as he had received
the salutation of the officer of the watch, you have had a
still night of it. Yonder is the Point of Piombino, I see; and
here we have got Elba, and this little rocky island, again,
on our larboard hand. One day is surprisingly like another,
about these times, for us mariners, in particular.
Do you really think so, Captain Cuffe?Now, to my
notion, this day hasn't had its equal on the Proserpine's log,
since we got hold of I'Epervier, and her convoy. You
forget
,
sir, that we destroyed le Feu-Follet, last night!
Ay  that is something  especially for
you
, Griffin.
Well, Nelson will hear of it by mail, as soon as we can get
into Leghorn; which will be immediately after I have had
an opportunity of communicating with these people in Porto
Ferrajo. After all that has passed, the least we can do is to
let your veechy-govern-the-tories know of our success.
Sail, ho! shouted the look-out, on the foretopsail-yard.
The two officers turned, and gazed around them, in every
direction, when the captain made the customary demand of
Where-away?
Here, sir, close aboard of us, on our larboard hand, and
on our weather quarter.
On our weather quarter!Dn me, if that
can
be
Vol. I.  16
true, Griffin. There is nothing but the island, there.The
fellow cannot have mistaken this little island for the hull of
a ship!
If he has, sir, answered Griffin, laughing, it must be
for a twenty-decker. That is Ben Brown, aloft; and he is
as good a look-out as we have in the ship.
Do you see her, sir? demanded Ben Brown, looking
over his shoulder, to put the question.
Not a bit of her, cried Cuffe. You must be
dreaming
,
fellow.What does she look like!
There, this small island shuts her in, from the deck, sir.
She is a lugger; and looks as much like the one we burnt
last night, sir, as one of our cat-heads is like t'other.
A lugger! exclaimed Cuffe. What, another of the
blackguards! By Jove! I'll go aloft, and take a look for
myself. It's ten to one that I see her from the maintop.
In three minutes more, Captain Cuffe was in the top in
question; having passed through the lubber-hole, as every
sensible man does, in a frigate, more especially when she
stands up for want of wind. That was an age in which
promotion was rapid; there being few grey-bearded
lieutenants
,
then, in the English marine; and even admirals were
not wanting who had not cut all their wisdom-teeth. Cuffe,
consequently, was still a young man; and it cost him no
great effort to get up his ship's ratlins, in the manner named.
Once in the top, he had all his eyes about him. For quite
a minute, he stood motionless, gazing in the direction that
had been pointed out by Ben Brown. All this time Griffin
stood on the quarter-deck, looking quite as intently at his
superior, as the latter gazed at the strange sail. Then Cuffe
deigned to cast a glance literally beneath him, in order to
appease the curiosity, which, he well understood, it was so
natural for the officer of the watch to feel. Griffin did not
dare to ask his
captain
what he saw; but he looked a volume
of questions on the interesting subject.
A sister corsair, by Jupiter Ammon! cried Cuffe; a
twin
sister, too; for they
are
as much alike as one cat-head
is like another. More, by Jove, if I am any judge.
What will you have us do, Captain Cuffe? inquired the
lieutenant. We are now going to leeward, all the while.
I don't know, sir, that there is positively a current here,
but
Very well, sirvery wellhaul up on the larboard
tack, as soon as possible, and get the larboard batteries clear.
We may have to cripple the chap, in order to get hold of
him.
As this was said, Cuffe descended through the same
lubber-hole
,
and soon appeared on deck. The ship, now, became
a scene of activity and bustle. All hands were called, and
the guns were cleared away, by some, while others braced
the yards, according to the new line of sailing.
The reader would be greatly aided, in understanding what
is to follow, could he, perchance, cast a look at a map of
the cast of Italy. He will there see that the eastern side
of the Island of Elba, runs in a nearly north and south
direction, Piombino lying off about north-north-east, from its
northern extremity. Near this northern extremity, lies the
little rocky islet, so often mentioned, or the spot which
Napoleon
,
fifteen years later, selected as the advanced redoubt
of his insular empire. Of course, the Proserpine was on one
side of this islet, and the strange lugger on the other. The
first had got so far through the Canal, as to be able to haul
close upon the wind, on the larboard tack, and yet to clear
the islet; while the last was just far enough to windward, or
sufficiently to the southward, to be shut out from view, from
the frigate's decks, by the intervening rocks. As the
distance
from the islet to the island did not much exceed a
hundred or two yards, Captain Cuffe hoped to enclose his
chase between himself and the land, never dreaming that
the stranger would think of standing through so narrow and
rocky a pass. He did not know his man, however, who
was Raoul Yvard; and who had come this way, from Bastia,
in the hope of escaping any further collision with his
formidable
foe. He had seen the frigate's lofty sails, above the
rock, as soon as it was light; and being under no
hallucination
,
on the subject of
her
existence, he knew her at a glance.
His first order was to haul everything as flat as possible;
and his great desire was, to get from under the lee of the
mountains of Elba, into this very pass, through which the
wind drew with more force, than it blew anywhere, near by.
As the Proserpine was quite a league off, in the Canal, le
Feu-Follet, which sailed so much the fastest, in light winds,
had abundance of time to effect her object. Instead of
avoiding the narrow pass between the two islands, Raoul
glided boldly into it; and, by keeping vigilant eyes on his
fore-yard, to apprize him of danger, he succeeded in making
two stretches, in the strait itself, coming out to the southward,
on the starboard tack, handsomely clearing the end of the
islet, at the very instant the frigate appeared on the other
side of the pass. The lugger had now an easy task of it;
for she had only to watch her enemy, and tack in season, to
keep the islet between them; since the English did not dare
to carry so large a ship through so narrow an opening.
This advantage Raoul did not overlook, and Cuffe had gone
about twice, closing, each time, nearer and nearer to the islet,
before he was satisfied that his guns would be of no service,
until he could, at least, weather the intervening object; after
which they would most probably be useless, in so light a
wind, by the distance between them and their enemy.
Never mind, Mr. Griffin; let this scamp go, said the
captain, when he made this material discovery; it is pretty
well to have cleared the seas of one of them.Besides, we
do not know that this
is
an enemy, at all. He showed no
colours, and seems to have just come out of Porto Ferrajo,
a friendly haven.
Raoul Yvard did
that
, sir, not once, but twice, muttered
Yelverton, who, from the circumstance that he had not been
employed in the different attempts on le Feu-Follet, was one
of the very few dissentients in the ship, touching her fate.
These twins
are
exceedingly alike; especially
Pomp
, as
the American negro said of his twin children.
This remark passed unheeded; for so deep was the
delusion
,
in the ship, touching the destruction of the privateer, it
would have been as hopeless an attempt, to try to persuade
her officers and people, generally, that le Feu-Follet was not
burned, as it would be to induce a great nation to believe
it had any of the weaknesses and foibles that confessedly
beset smaller communities. The Proserpine was put about,
again; and, setting her ensign, she stood into the bay of
Porto Ferrajo; anchoring quite near the place that Raoul
had selected for the same purpose, on two previous occasions.
The gig was lowered, and Cuffe, accompanied by Griffin, as
an interpreter, landed, to pay the usual visit of ceremony to
the authorities.
The wind being so light, several hours were necessary
to effect all these changes; and, by the time the two officers
were ascending the terraced street, the day had advanced
sufficiently to render the visit suitable, as to time. Cuffe
appearing in full uniform, with epaulettes and sword, his
approach attracted notice; and Vito Viti had hurried off to
apprize his friend of the honour he was about to receive.
The vice-governatore was not taken by surprise, therefore,
but had some little time to prepare his excuses, for being the
dupe of a fraud, as impudent as that which Raoul Yvard
had so successfully practised on him. The reception was
dignified, though courteous; and it had none the less of
ceremony, from the circumstance that all which was said by
the respective colloquists, had to be translated, before it
could be understood. This circumstance rendered the few
first minutes of the interview a little constrained; but each
party having something on his mind, of which it was his
desire to be relieved, natural feeling soon got the better of
forms.
I ought to explain to you, Sir Cuffe, the manner in
which a recent event occurred in our bay, here, observed
the vice-governatore; since, without such explanation, you
might be apt to consider us neglectful of our duties, and
unworthy of the trust which the Grand Duke reposes in
us. I allude, as you will at once understand, to the
circumstance
that le Feu-Follet has twice been lying peaceably
under the guns of our batteries, while her commander, and,
indeed, some of her crew, have been hospitably entertained
on shore.
Such things must occur, in times like these, Mr.
Veechy-Governatory
;
and we seamen set them down to the luck of
war, Cuffe answered, graciously, being much too
magnanimous
,
under his own success, to think of judging others too
harshly. It might not be so easy to deceive a
man-of-war's-man
,
like myself; but, I dare say,
Veechy-Governatory
,
had it been anything relating to the administration of
your little island, here, even Monsieur Yvard would have
found you too much for him?
The reader will perceive that Cuffe had got a new way
16 *
of pronouncing the appellation of the Elban functionary; a
circumstance that was owing to the desire we all have, when
addressing foreigners, to speak in their own language, rather
than in our own. The worthy captain had no more precise
ideas of what a
vice
-governor means, than the American
people, just now, seem to possess of the signification of
vice
-president
;
but, as he had discovered that the word was
pronounced veechy, in Italian, he was quite willing to
give it its true sound; albeit, a smile struggled round the
mouth of Griffin, while he listened.
You do me no more than justice, Signor Kooffe, or Sir
Kooffe, as, I presume, I ought to address you, answered the
functionary; for, in matters touching our duties on shore,
here, we are by no means as ignorant, as on matters
touching
your honourable calling. This Raoul Yvard presented
himself, to me, in the character of a British officer, one I
esteem and respect; having audaciously assumed the name
of a family of high condition, and of great power, I believe,
among your people
Ahthe Barone! exclaimed Cuffe; who, having
discovered
by his intercourse with the southern Italians that
this word meant a rascal, as well as a baron, was fond
of using it, on suitable occasions. Pray,
Veechy-Governatory
,
what name did he assume? Ca'endish, or Howard,
or Seymour, or some of those great nobs, Griffin, I'll engage!
I wonder that he spared Nelson!
No, Signore, he took the family appellation of another
illustrious race. The republican corsair presented himself
before me as a Sir Smeesthe son of a certain Milordo
Smees.
SmeesSmeesSmees!I've no recollection of any
such name, in the peerage. It can't be Seymour that the
Veechy means!
That
is a great name, certainly; and some
of them have been in the service; it is possible this barone
may have had the impudence to hail for a Seymour!
I rather think not, Captain Cuffe. `Smees' is very
much as an Italian would pronounce `Smith,' as, you know,
the French call it `Smeet.' It will turn out that this Mr.
Raoul has seized upon the first English name he fell in with,
as a man overboard clutches at a spar adrift, or a life-buoy;
and that happened to be `Smith.'
Who the devil ever heard of a my lord Smith! A
pretty sort of aristocracy we should have, Griffin, if it were
made up of such fellows!
Why, sir, the
name
can make no great difference; the
deeds and the antiquity forming the essentials.
And he assumed a title to
Sir
Smees!I dare say, he
was ready to swear His Majesty made him a Knight
Banneret
,
under the royal ensign, and on the deck of his own
ship; as was done with some of the old admirals. The
veechy, however, has forgotten a part of the story, as it
must have been Sir
John
, or Sir
Thomas
Smees, at least.
No, sir; that is the way with the French and the Italians,
who do not understand our manner of using Christian names
with titles; as in our Sir Edwards, and Lord Harrys, and
Lady Bettys.
Blast the French! I can believe anything of
them
,
though I should have thought that these
Italians
knew
better
.
However, it may be well to give the veechy a hint of
what we have been saying, or it may seem rudeand,
hearkee, Griffin, while you
are
about it, rub him down a
little touching books, and that sort of thing; for the surgeon
tells me, he has heard of him, in Leghorn, as a regular
leaf-cutter
.
The lieutenant did as ordered, throwing in an allusion to
Andrea's reputation for learning, that, under the
circumstances
,
was not ill-timed; and which, as it was well-enough
expressed, was exceedingly grateful to his listener, just at
that awkward moment.
My claims to literature are but small, Signore,
answered
Andrea, with humility, as I beg you will inform
Sir Kooffe; but they were sufficient to detect certain
assumptions
of this corsair; a circumstance that came very near
bringing about an exposure, at a most critical moment. He
had the audacity, Signore, to wish to persuade
me
, that there
was a certain English orator of the same name, and of equal
merit of him of Roma and Pompeiione Sir Cicero!
The Barone! again exclaimed Cuffe, when this new
offence of Raoul's was explained to him. I believe the
rascal was up to anything. But there is an end of him,
now, with all his Sir Smees, and Sir Ciceroes, into the
bargain
.
Just let the veechy into the secret of the fellow's fate,
Griffin.
Griffin then related to the vice-governatore the manner in
which it was supposed that le Feu-Follet, Raoul Yvard, and
all his associates, had been consumed, like caterpillars on a
tree. Andrea Barrofaldi listened, with a proper degree of
horror expressed in his countenance; but Vito Viti heard the
tale with signs of indifference and incredulity that he did not
care to conceal. Nevertheless, Griffin persevered, until he
had even given an account of the manner in which he and
Cuffe examined the lugger's anchorage, in the bootless attempt
to discover the wreck.
To all this, the two functionaries listened with profound
attention, and a lively surprise. After looking at each other
several times, and exchanging significant gestures, Andrea
assumed the office of explaining.
There is some extraordinary mistake in this, Signor
Tenente, he said; for Raoul Yvard still lives. He passed
this promontory just as day dawned, in his lugger, this very
morning!
Ay, he has got that notion from having seen the fellow
we fell in with off the harbour, here, answered Cuffe, when
this speech was translated to him; and I don't wonder at
it, for the two vessels were surprisingly alike. But the
Barone, that we saw burned with our own eyes, Griffin, can
never float again. I say Barone; for, in my opinion, the
Few-Folly was just as much of a rascal, as her commander,
and all who sailed in her.
Griffin explained this; but it met with no favour from the
two Italians.
Not so, Signor Tenentenot so, returned the
vice-governatore
;
the lugger that passed, this morning, we
know
to be le Feu-Follet, inasmuch as she took one of our
own feluccas, in the course of the night, coming from
Livorno, and Raoul Yvard permitted her to come in, as he
said to her padrone, on account of the civil treatment he had
received, while lying in our port. Nay, he even carried his
presumption so far, as to send me, by means of the same
man, the compliments of `Sir Smees,' and his hopes of being
able, some day, to make his acknowledgments in person.
The English Captain received this intelligence, as might
be expected; and, unpleasant as it was, after putting various
questions to the vice-governatore, and receiving the answers,
he was obliged, unwillingly enough, to believe it all. He
had brought his official report in his pocket; and, as the
conversation proceeded, he covertly tore it into fragments,
so small, that even a Mahommedan would reject them, as
not large enough to write the word Allah on.
It 's dh lucky, Griffin, that letter didn't get to
Leghorn
,
this morning, he said, after a long pause. Nelson
would have Brontd me, famously, had he got it! Yet, I
never believed half as devoutly in the twenty-nine articles,
as
I believe there are
thirty
-nine of them, Captain Cuffe,
modestly put in Griffin.
Well,
thirty
-nine, if you willwhat signifies ten, more
or less, in such matters? A man is ordered to believe them
all
, if there were a hundred.But I never believed in
them
,
as devoutly, as I believed in the destruction of that infernal
picaroon. My faith is unsettled, for life!
Griffin offered a few words of condolence, but he was also
too much mortified to be very able to administer consolation.
Andrea Barrofaldi, understanding the state of the case, now
interposed with his courtesies, and the two officers were
invited
to share his bachelor's breakfast. What followed, in
consequence of this visit, and the communications to which
it gave rise, will appear in the course of the narrative.